S.  HRG.  109–1099 

REVITALIZING  THE  ECONOMY  OF 

SOUTH  LOUISIANA:  EMPOWERING  THE 
REGION  FOR  RECOVERY  AND  GROWTH 

FIELD  HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

NOVEMBER  7,  2005 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

63–021 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2010 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office,

http://bookstore.gpo.gov. For more information, contact the GPO Customer Contact Center,

U.S. Government Printing Office. Phone 202–512–1800, or 866–512–1800 (toll-free). E-mail, gpo@custhelp.com.

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on November 7, 2005  ........................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................
Statement of Senator Vitter  ....................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Coleman, Elaine, Commissioner, Downtown Development District  ....................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Drennen,  Mark  C.,  President/CEO,  Greater  New  Orleans,  Incorporated;  on 
behalf of the Southeast Louisiana Business Coalition  ......................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Falgout, Ted M., Port Director, Port Fourchon  .....................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Francis,  Dr.  Norman  C.,  President,  Xavier  University;  Chair,  Louisiana  Re-
covery Authority  ...................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Guidry, David, President/CEO, Guico Machine Works Inc.  .................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Kennedy, Hon. John, State Treasurer, Louisiana Department of the Treasury 
LaGrange, Gary P., President/CEO, Port of New Orleans  ...................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
McDonald  Jr.,  Alden  J.,  President/Chairman,  Liberty  Bank  and  Trust  Com-
pany; Commissioner, Bring New Orleans Back  .................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Nagin, Hon. C. Ray, Mayor, City of New Orleans  ................................................
Olivier, Michael J., Secretary, Louisiana Economic Development  ......................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Perry, J. Stephen, President/CEO, New Orleans Metropolitan Convention and 
....................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Smith,  Ewell,  Executive  Director,  Louisiana  Seafood  Promotion  and  Mar-
keting Board  .........................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Thomas, Hon. Craig, U.S. Senator from Wyoming  ...............................................

Visitors Bureau 

APPENDIX 

Letter,  dated  November  7,  2005,  from  a  group  of  commercial  fishermen  and 
dock  dealers  to  the  Senators,  Congressmen,  and  State  Officials  of  Lou-
isiana  .....................................................................................................................
Morris,  Julie,  Council  Chairman,  Gulf  of  Mexico  Fishery  Management  Coun-
cil, letter with attachment dated October 7, 2005  .............................................

Page 
1 
1 
2 

56 
58 

24 
27 
28 
29 

12 
15 
60 
61 
5 
30 
32 

17 
19 
48 
7 
9 

49 
52 

34 
37 
4 

69 

70 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

REVITALIZING  THE  ECONOMY  OF 

SOUTH  LOUISIANA:  EMPOWERING  THE 
REGION  FOR  RECOVERY  AND  GROWTH 

MONDAY,  NOVEMBER  7,  2005 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  9  a.m.  in  Louisiana 
Supreme  Court  Chambers,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens,  Chairman  of  the 
Committee, presiding. 

U.S. SENATE, 

New Orleans, LA. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, thank you very much. Let me thank, on be-
half  of  the  Senate,  the  Chief  Justice  Calogero,  for  allowing  us  to 
use  this  court  room  and  for  meeting  with  us  this  morning  and  we 
are indebted to our colleague and good friend, David Vitter, for the 
invitation  to  bring  this  committee  down  here  to  really  inspect  the 
damages  and  to  determine  what  needs  to  be  done  for  this  area  to 
recover.  My  thanks  also  to  Senator  Thomas  of  Wyoming,  and  Sen-
ator Brownback is expected any time now. 

Alaskans are not in a different situation. We have an abundance 
of  wildlife  and  fishing  and  energy  production,  just  as  you  do.  We 
share,  we  literally  have  half  the  coastline  in  the  United  States.  If 
it  was  only  90  degrees  cooler  here  it  would  be  as  in  my  hometown 
today.  As  it  happens  you’d  have  to  throw  in  a  few  mountains  to 
keep us around. But we do enjoy being with you and have a chance 
to  tour  the  area.  The  Lakeview  areas  at  Ninth  Ward,  the  levee 
breach on the Inner Harbor Canal. 

We’ve  viewed  the  devastation  to  homes  and  talked  to  residents 
there about the challenge and uncertainties they face and we’ve lis-
tened  to  dozens  of  people  on  their  thoughts  about  the  actions  that 
Congress should take to assist in the recovery of this area. 

Let  me  make  one  point  very  strongly,  we’re  not  here  to  tell  you 
what to do. We’re here to conduct a hearing, which we have called 
‘‘Empowering  the  Region  for  Recovery  and  Growth.’’  We  want  to 
learn  from  you  what  you  feel  is  required  to  reestablish  a  new  and 
better  New  Orleans.  We  ask  questions  and  if  you  misinterpret 
them, that is your problem, not mine. The newspaper did. 

Just  last  week,  I  worked  with  Senators  Vitter  and  Landrieu,  to 
include  $1.2  billion  for  coastal  disasters  and  hurricanes  affecting 
the  States  in  this  area  in  our  budget  reconciliation  bill.  That  was 
in addition to the $200 million we had already earmarked from the 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

Commerce Committee. This portion of the bill was just an area af-
fecting  this  committee,  the  Commerce  Committee.  But  I  do  think 
your  delegation  is  working  very  hard.  They  are  making  progress, 
there’s  a  great  deal  to  be  done  and  I’m  confident  that  your  region 
will thrive again. 

We’re  here  to  hear  from  the  witnesses.  But  first,  let  me  see  if 

Senator Vitter has some remarks to make this morning. 

STATEMENT OF HON. DAVID VITTER, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM LOUISIANA 

Senator  VITTER.  Thank  you,  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  really 
do  want  to  thank  you  and  Senator  Thomas,  Senator  Brownback, 
who  will  be  with  us  later  today,  for  recognizing  the  importance  of 
being here today and for giving up a good part of your weekend to 
see firsthand, the devastation and the remaining challenges caused 
by Hurricane Katrina. 

As  we  saw  yesterday,  we’ve  really  moved  beyond  the  emergency 
response  phase,  to  rebuilding  and  recovering  and  that’s  what  this 
hearing  is  about.  The  decisions  we  make  now  are  the  most  impor-
tant  that  we  will  make  in  our  lifetime,  in  Louisiana,  in  terms  of 
our  future.  And  that’s  why  I  asked  you  to  bring  this  hearing  here, 
today. So, we can all hear ideas about how to empower our citizens 
and  businesses,  to  once  again  have  the  economic  security  and  cer-
tainty  we  all  desire,  so,  that  our  economy  can  get  back  on  track. 
I  would  tell  everyone  here,  there  is  no  one  more  appropriate  or 
more  useful  to  be  here,  than  the  Chairman.  He  is  the  Chairman 
of the Commerce Committee, President Pro Tem of the Senate, the 
most  senior  member  of  the  majority  party  there  and  also  a  very 
high ranking member of the Appropriations Committee. 

And  of  course,  I  deeply  appreciate  Senator  Thomas  being  here, 

as well. 

Before we get started, I would like to give a brief update on some 
of  the  actions  we’ve  already  taken  in  Congress  to  move  Louisiana 
forward, as a prelude, to where we need to go from here. First, we 
passed  two  emergency  appropriation  bills,  totaling  over  $62  billion 
in emergency relief and recovery efforts for Hurricane Katrina. 

Today,  over  1.2  million  households  have  applied  for  individual 
assistance, and of course, all levels of government in the devastated 
area are taking advantage of public assistance. 

Second,  I’ve  worked  with  the  White  House  to  have  100  percent 
of the costs of many disaster activities covered by the Federal Gov-
ernment  for  an  extended  period  of  time,  the  most  extended  period 
of time ever in history. 

Third,  we  enacted  a  $6.1  billion  Katrina  tax  relief  package,  for 
virtually  everyone  affected  by  the  storm,  to  give  them  some  imme-
diate individual tax relief. 

Fourth,  we  provided  an  additional  $2  billion  for  the  National 
Flood  Insurance  Program  to  ensure  the  money  is  there  to  pay  out 
benefits under the current program. 

Fifth,  we  passed  $300  million  in  additional  funds  for  food  and 

health benefits for those unable to afford those necessities. 

Sixth,  students  and  those  paying  off  student  loans  were  given 
significant Pell Grant relief. That was important, we certainly need 
more relief for higher education in those students. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

Seventh,  the  President  recently  signed  into  law,  my  bill  to  pro-
vide $1 billion in assistance to parish and local governments to pro-
vide essential services. And as I committed on the Senate floor dur-
ing the debate of that bill, we’re going to work to ensure that these 
loans have the ability to be forgiven, if circumstances require that. 
The  city  of  New  Orleans  for  instance,  had  to  lay  off  nearly  one- 
half  of  its  workforce  and  there  are  vital  services  that  our  parish 
and  local  governments  must  provide.  So,  we  need  to  continue  to 
work on that CDL program and improve it. 

Eighth,  we  work  closely  with  the  President  to  ensure  that  100 
percent  of  the  cost  of  restoring  our  hurricane  protection  system,  to 
at  least  category  three  levels,  to  begin  with.  One  hundred  percent 
of  that  will  be  paid  entirely  by  the  Federal  Government,  which  is 
unprecedented.  This  allows  our  state  and  local  governments  to 
focus the hundreds of millions of dollars that they would otherwise 
have  to  devote  to  their  match,  to  other  important  recovery  prior-
ities.  And  of  course,  this  category  three  protection  is  not  enough. 
I’ll  be  introducing  a  new  program  to  provide  an  even  greater  level 
of hurricane protection, up to category 5, urging the Corps to form 
an integrated program for the entire region. 

Louisiana  already  receives  more  Corps  of  Engineers  funds  than 
any  other  state,  despite  our  small  size.  So,  we  need  to  make  sure 
these  dollars  and  others  are  spent  wisely,  in  terms  of  a  fully  inte-
grated plan, moving forward. 

Ninth,  as  Senator  Stevens  mentioned,  we  just  added  $1.2  billion 
to the already $200 million that his Commerce Committee included 
in the budget package, for help to coastal states dealing with coast-
al  restoration  and  related  issues.  And  as  we  heard  in  our  Corps 
briefing  this  morning,  that  is  directly  related  to  hurricane  protec-
tion. Very, very important. 

Tenth,  in  that  same  budget  package  passed  through  the  Senate 
last week, there was a significant Medicaid piece, that will be very 
important, in terms of health care in Louisiana. 

Eleventh, in that same budget package, there was a very signifi-
cant  education  piece,  to  fund  the  education  of  evacuee  children, 
who have gone out of the New Orleans area to public and non-pub-
lic school systems all over the state and even more broadly, all over 
the country, particularly, in states like Texas. 

And  twelfth,  the  Senate  has  also  passed  hundreds  of  millions  of 
dollars  for  housing  assistance,  education  reimbursement,  funds  for 
the SBA, economic development administration and more. 

So,  that’s  a  lot  of  what  we  have  done.  Now,  clearly,  we  must  do 
more and we must march on from here with significant further ac-
tion.  But  to  allow  us  to  do  more  in  Congress  and  quite  frankly,  to 
build the consensus to allow us to do more, we also need to see im-
portant  progress  and  vision,  here  on  the  ground  in  Louisiana  and 
so many of our leaders who are providing that guidance and vision 
are here today. 

I  really  think  the  biggest  challenge  we  face  now,  is  convincing 
those in Washington, that we have a smart bold plan to rebuild in 
the  right  way  and  that  we  have  the  structure  that  can  pull  that 
rebuilding off. And I think, communicating that really involves two 
things. Number one, communicating that we are open to new ideas 
and bold proposals and in every area of the rebuilding. Whether it’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

hospitals  or  education  or  a  new  and  improved  flood  and  hurricane 
protection system. And number two, we also need to make sure we 
communicate that we are coming together with a single common vi-
sion, being developed on the ground in Louisiana. 

I think, there is more work to be done in that regard and I hope 
this hearing will help us pull together to do that. For instance, we 
have the Governor’s Commission, the Mayor’s Commission, numer-
ous  advisory  boards  at  all  levels.  In  addition,  there  are  a  number 
of  not-for-profit  commissions  and  many  in  the  private  sector  who 
are holding forums and providing ideas. 

And  just  last  week,  the  President  announced  a  council  to  assist 
the new Federal coordinator in overseeing Federal operations here. 
I’m  afraid  we  may  be  using  a  model  I  saw  in  the  U.S.  House  of 
Representatives.  There,  we  had  so  many  committees,  that  we  es-
tablished a committee on committees. I’m not sure that’s the model 
we  want  to  follow  on  the  ground  in  Louisiana  and  so,  I  think,  a 
big part of our work now, is to pull all of this very important work 
and  thinking  together,  to  develop  a  truly  common  vision,  to  move 
forward. 

I  hope  that  the  President’s  recent  appointment  of  a  single  Fed-
eral coordinator, Don Powell, will help us do that. In my hour and 
a  half  meeting  with  him,  last  week,  I  urged  him  to  be  a  catalyst, 
to help bring everyone together on the ground, with that single uni-
fying bold vision for rebuilding and reconstruction. 

So,  Mr.  Chairman,  that’s  my  hope  and  certainly,  the  witnesses 
you’re  going  to  hear  from  today,  are  a  big  part  of  developing  that 
bold common, unifying vision. I thank you again, for allowing them 
to testify. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Senator Thomas, do you have comments to make? 

STATEMENT OF HON. CRAIG THOMAS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM WYOMING 

Senator  THOMAS.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  Very  briefly,  I  ap-
preciate  being  part  of  this  Senatorial  visiting  group.  It’s  amazing 
to  see,  actually  be  on  scene  and  the  difference  between  what  you 
hear  in  the  news,  of  course  and  so  on.  But  it’s  really  been  inter-
esting and what a devastating thing it’s been. 

I’m  really  pleased  with  the  hospitality  we’ve  had  and  certainly, 
everyone has gone out of their way to show us what we need to see, 
and  more  importantly  perhaps,  talk  about  their  plans  and  their 
ideas of what we can do about it. Everyone has great sympathy for 
the  people  of  New  Orleans,  of  course  and  of  the  Gulf  area  and  we 
want to do whatever we can. I’m just hopeful that what we do and 
our  plans  can  be  based  on  the  long  term  needs.  That  we  simply 
don’t  get  ourselves  back  in  the  same  position  we  were  in  before, 
that  rather,  we  have  changes  that  will  be  important,  in  terms  of 
avoiding  the  things  that  have  happened  here.  I  too,  hope  that  we 
can  have  a  balance  between  the  role  of  the  Federal  Government, 
the  state  government,  the  local  governments.  This  is  not  totally  a 
function of the Federal Government, as you know, and so, we need 
to work out that. 

So,  thank  you  very  much  for  the  opportunity  to  be  here,  Mr. 

Chairman. I look forward to hearing the participants. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

5 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  thank  you.  We’re  going  to  have  a  series  of 
witnesses  now.  Three  different  panels.  I  would  ask  the  witnesses 
to limit their comments to, not more than 8 minutes, so we can lis-
ten  to  everyone  and  still  make  the  helicopter  tour  we’re  going  to 
take  following  this  and  we  each  might  have  a  question  or  two. 
We’re going to want to listen to all of the witnesses who have come 
to testify. 

Our  first  panelist  is  the  Honorable  John  Kennedy,  the  State 
Treasurer  for  Louisiana;  Secretary  Michael  Olivier,  the  Secretary 
of  the  Louisiana  Department  of  Economic  Development;  Dr.  Nolan 
Francis,  President  of  Xavier  University  and  also  Commissioner  of 
Louisiana  Recovery  Authority;  and  Walter  McDonald,  President  of 
Liberty Bank and Trust, also, Commissioner of Bring New Orleans 
Back. 

We’ll first listen to Treasurer John Kennedy and each of the wit-
nesses  in  order  and  then  ask  questions  after  everyone  has  had  an 
opportunity to speak. So, Mr. Kennedy? 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN KENNEDY, STATE TREASURER, 

LOUISIANA DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY 

Mr.  KENNEDY.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman,  members  of  the  Com-
mittee  and  particularly  our  own  U.S.  Senator,  Senator  Vitter.  I 
want  to  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  talk  with  you  this  morn-
ing.  I  want  to  thank  you  for  your  presence  here  today.  I  want  to 
thank you for your past help. 

I  had  prepared,  as  you  can  see,  a  few  remarks  regarding  infra-
structure,  regarding  the  levee  system,  regarding  the  Small  Busi-
ness  Association.  But  I  think  in  light  of  Senator  Vitter’s  very  elo-
quent and relevant remarks, I’m going to put my prepared remarks 
aside  just  for  a  moment  and  talk  to  you  about  what  Louisiana  is 
prepared to do to help itself. 

Let  me  talk  about  our  budget  first.  We  all  know  that  Louisiana 
has  experienced  two  natural  disasters  of  epic  proportions.  It  has 
had  a  dramatic  impact  on  the  tax  base  of  our  state.  Both  at  the 
local  government  level,  particularly  at  the  local  government  level, 
but  also,  at  the  state  level.  Louisiana,  if  you  add  up  all  of  our  in-
come, our salaries, our dividends, our interest every year, we have 
about  $125  billion  in  state  personal  income.  Which,  in  my  judg-
ment, is the best indicator of economic activity. 

In the area impacted by Katrina and the area impacted by Rita, 
between  a  third  and  forty  percent  of  that  area  contributes  this  in-
come.  That’s  a  $125  billion  income.  Roughly,  $40–$45  billion  of  in-
come is contributed to our $125 billion in gross state product. That 
will have an impact on our budget. 

Our  budget  is  $19  billion.  We  are  estimating  an  impact  of  be-
tween  $1  and  $2  billion,  in  terms  of  lost  tax  base.  But  I  want  to 
emphasize to you, that the impact will be bigger. Because, in addi-
tion to addressing a budget deficit of between—let’s call it $1.5 bil-
lion, the State of Louisiana is prepared and indeed, must find addi-
tional  fundings  to  help  our  local  governments  pay  their  bonded  in-
debtedness,  to  help  our  local  governments,  particularly  in  Orleans 
and Saint Bernard and Cameron parishes, which have no tax base, 
and pay their operating expenses and Louisiana needs to find addi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

tional monies in its budget to help our businesses with bridge cap-
ital. 

6 

Let me tell you how I hope we will proceed to do that. Our Legis-
lature  convened  last  night  for  a  long  overdue  special  session.  I  am 
hopeful  that  our  Legislature  will  begin  by  looking  at  our  budget. 
Not  by  making  a  5  percent  or  a  10  percent  cut,  but  by  looking  at 
our  budget  line  by  line,  item  by  item,  project  by  project.  And  the 
question  that  we  have  to  ask  ourselves,  is  that  after  these  storms 
of epic proportions, given the demands on state government, finan-
cial and otherwise, what are the core functions of government that 
Louisiana is prepared to fund and that the Louisiana citizens actu-
ally need at this point? That has got to be our starting point. 

We know we have to make structural changes in our budget and 
I  hope  and  believe  that  our  Legislature  and  our  Governor  are  pre-
pared to do that and I think they are and will. After we have made 
the  necessary  adjustments  to  our  budget,  we  need  to  look  at  the 
other arsenals in the state’s tools of economic possibilities. We need 
to  look  at  advance  refunding  some  of  our  State  debt.  Authority, 
that I believe, will be given to us by the U.S. Congress, that allows 
us  to  basically  do  what  you  do  when  you  restructure  the  mortgage 
on  your  home.  If  you  go  from  a  15-year  mortgage  on  your  home  to 
a  30-year  mortgage  on  your  home,  you  lower  your  interest,  prin-
cipal and interest payments, your monthly payments, which freeze 
up cashflow. 

We  need  to  look  advance  refunding  our  tobacco  settlement  debt. 
We need to look at accessing our rainy day trust fund. We need to 
look  at  securitizing  the  additional  40  percent  of  our  tobacco  settle-
ment income streams. We do not need to look at raising taxes. Let 
me  say  that  again.  We  do  not  need  to  look  at  raising  taxes.  Our 
people have suffered enough. 

If  we  do  the  things  that  I  have  mentioned,  look  at  our  budget 
line by line, item by item, project by project, and I believe our Leg-
islature  is  prepared  to  do  that  and  make  the  necessary  adjust-
ments,  a  small  or  more  efficient  state  government.  And  then,  we 
are willing to look and I think we are, at the other tools in our eco-
nomic arsenal. Advance refunding of our debt, restructuring it. Our 
tobacco  settlement  revenue  possibilities,  the  purpose  of  which,  will 
be,  to  provide  a  pool  of  money,  from  which,  local  governments  can 
borrow to pay their bonded indebtedness, from which, local govern-
ments can borrow to pay their operating expenses; and from which, 
our businesses, our small businesses, can borrow for bridge capital. 
Many  of  which,  quite  frankly  and  I  say  this  respectfully,  can’t  get 
an  answer  from  the  Small  Business  Administration.  Thus,  the 
State of Louisiana needs to step in and help them. 

I  think,  if  we  do  that,  the  changes  will  be  dramatic,  in  terms  of 
Louisiana  State  Government.  But  the  changes  will  be  equally  dra-
matic  in  terms  of  the  help  that  we  will  provide  to  ourselves  and 
to  our  people.  After  we  do  that,  and  I  believe  that  our  Legislature 
will  do  that,  we  respectfully  ask  you  for  your  continued  help.  We 
thank you for your past help. But even with the dramatic measures 
that I have talked about, we cannot do it alone. We need your con-
tinued support. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

7 

A  person,  much  smarter  than  I  am,  once  said  that  perseverance 
is  not  a  long  race.  It’s  a  series  of  small  races,  run  one  after  the 
other. 

Thank you for being here with us today. We hope you’ll join with 

us in running the race to rebuild Louisiana. 

STATEMENT OF MICHAEL J. OLIVIER, SECRETARY, 

LOUISIANA ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT 

Mr.  OLIVIER.  Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee, 
thank  you  for  this  opportunity.  Thank  you  very  much  for  visiting 
our  state.  My  name  is  Michael  Olivier,  I’m  the  Secretary  of  Eco-
nomic Development for the State of Louisiana. 

Prior  to  Katrina  and  Rita,  these  storms  that  we’ve  suffered,  the 
main  mission  of  my  organization  was  to  recruit  new  diversified 
businesses  to  our  state  to  create  quality  jobs.  And,  more  impor-
tantly, the retention of existing business and industry, because you 
have  to  keep  what  you’ve  got  and  that’s  where  we  are  now,  trying 
to keep what we’ve got. 

Of  course,  our  mission  is  still  the  same.  New  business  recruit-
ment,  existing  business  and  industry  retention,  but  it’s  different. 
We’ve  expanded  because  our  role  to  respond  to  the  needs  of  these 
impacted businesses require a different approach. 

Much  of  what  we  are  going  to  be  talking  about  today,  is  dealing 
with  the  impacted  areas.  We  consider  that  there  are  13  parishes 
that  are  more  dramatically  impacted  than  the  other  36  or  37  that 
have  been  designated  as  impacted.  Of  course,  they  have  a  signifi-
cant  amount  of  impact  all  across  the  South  Louisiana  area,  the 
Gulf  of  Mexico  region.  But  more  specifically,  the  most  impacted 
parishes represent some 80,850 businesses that have been in some 
state  of  cessation.  This  represents  90  percent  of  those  of  being 
small  business  and  also,  represents  41  percent  of  the  entire  busi-
ness  community  in  the  State  of  Louisiana.  We  have  about  197,400 
businesses  in  our  state.  This  80,000,  almost  81,000  represents  41 
percent of all the businesses in our state. 

Three  of  our  largest  industries,  oil  and  gas,  and  the  petro-chem 
area,  transportation  and  shipping,  and  agricultural  commodities 
and  timber,  have  been  severely  impacted,  among  others.  In  the  oil 
and  gas  and  petrochemical  area,  three  major  refineries  are  out-of- 
service through the New Year. 

Only  now  are  we  seeing,  as  our  refineries  come  back  online,  our 
gasoline prices coming back to pre–Katrina rates. This is 10 weeks 
later.  It’s  interesting  that  some  people  would  wonder,  what  is  the 
impact of Louisiana and the Gulf of Mexico region and these states 
that have been impacted by these storms, on the national economy. 
I submit, this is one such impact. 

On  the  offshore  oil  and  gas  area,  our  pipelines  are  returning  to 
operation.  However,  only  32  percent  of  daily  oil  production  is  back 
online, 45 percent of natural gas production is back and 27 percent 
of manned platforms remain evacuated. A lot of people do not real-
ize  that  there  are  40,000  miles  of  pipelines  in  and  offshore  Lou-
isiana. 

In our ports and shipping and transportation segment, two of our 
deepwater  ports  suffered  extensive  damage  and  are  not  operating. 
Those are Plaquemines and St. Bernard, which, I know, you visited 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

those  areas.  We  don’t  know  when,  if  ever,  these  ports  will  open. 
Later, you’re going to hear more in detail about our other two ports 
that  have  been  impacted  in  the  immediate  area  from  Gary  La-
Grange  and  Ted  Falgout.  In  the  agricultural  area,  this  is  truly  a 
disturbing  area,  because,  the  total  agricultural  damage  from  both 
of  the  storms  is  over  $1.6  billion.  Timber,  is  where  we  suffered 
some of the greatest losses. Our combined timber losses, from both 
hurricanes, was $850 million. 

In  Katrina  alone,  in  three  parishes,  we  call  them  parishes  here, 
you  call  them  counties,  in  three  on  the  North  Shore,  we  lost  3  bil-
lion feet of timber, equating to two times the annual harvest. 

For  the  houses  that  we’ve  lost,  we’ve  lost  some  205,000  homes 
that  have  been  destroyed  and  another  45,000  that  have  been  se-
verely damaged. It will take 5 billion board feet of timber to recon-
struct these houses. So, you can see, just comparing that, the mag-
nitude. 

Now,  since  this  committee’s  topic  is  revitalization,  I’ll  tell  you 
something  about  the  view  of  what  can  revitalize  Louisiana.  Right 
now,  it’s  access  to  capital.  In  our  businesses,  if  our  businesses  can 
have access to capital, we can rebuild not only the individual busi-
nesses,  but  the  entire  economy.  If  lack  of  access  to  capital  con-
tinues,  we’re  going  to  have  difficulties  and  we  will  be  facing  the 
largest default rate since the Great Depression. Insolvency is going 
to be ramped. 

We  ask  that  you  help  us  with  four  critical  recovery  priorities,  to 
provide  immediate  access  to  capital.  Those  are  one,  allocate  $200 
million  from  bridge  loans  to  continue  the  Louisiana  Bridge  Loan 
program.  Because  of  the  need  for  cash  infusion  to  our  small  busi-
nesses,  especially,  on  October  17,  Governor  Blanco  allowed  for  us 
to  use  a  reallocated  $10  million  fund,  that’s  a  use  for  deal  closing, 
for a Bridge Loan Program. This is patterned after what was done 
in Florida and patterned after what Congress provided Manhattan 
in the Economic Recovery Act of 2002. This is intended for helping 
businesses  meet  the  immediate  needs.  It  was  only  $25,000  per 
business, up to $25,000 per business. Doing the math, out of 81,000 
businesses,  we  could  only  help  4,000  businesses.  In  10  business 
days, we’ve loaned all the money out. 

We  were  hoping  to  be  able  to  demonstrate  to  Congress,  that  we 
could  manage  such  a  fund.  That  we  knew,  that  you  gave  these 
kinds  of  funds  to  New  York  State,  lower  Manhattan  and  it  was 
managed  in  such  a  way  in  Florida,  that  over  80  percent  of  these 
funds,  short  term  180  day,  no  interest  loan  funds,  were  paid  back. 
80 percent were paid back. 

We’re out of funds now. So, we’re hopeful that Congress will, be-
fore  the  holiday  session  ends,  we  will  be  able  to  get  some  funding, 
just as you gave to New York State. 

Number  two,  direct  the  Small  Business  Administration  to  expe-
dite  loan  processing.  So  far,  we  have  received—the  SBA  from  this 
area,  have  gotten  over  136,000  loan  applications.  Of  these,  they 
had approved only 2,294 for $157 million. They’ve maintained over 
90 percent rejection rate. 

Of  the  157  million  approved,  only  $1.5  million  in  business  loans 
has  been  fully  disbursed.  Less  than  1  percent  has  been  disbursed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

9 

So,  in  other  words,  our  business  community  is  not  getting  access 
to capital. And this, I submit, is not acceptable. 
The CHAIRMAN. Which type of money is that? 
Mr.  OLIVIER.  That’s  Small  Business  Administration  Disaster 

Loan Program. 

Priority  number  three  for  us,  is  provide  $10  million  for  business 
grants  that  parallel  those  provided  to  the  lower  Manhattan  busi-
nesses after 9/11. Like the 9/11 recovery grants for Manhattan, this 
request  is  provided  for  programs  that  need  immediate  relief.  We 
have  a  great  deal  who  are  in  our  fishing  industry  who  need  relief. 
They probably won’t be able to qualify for loans, we’ll have to give 
them grants to get that industry sector cranked back up. 

Priority  number  four,  $30  billion  in  tax  exempt  private  activity 
bonds.  Again,  the  same  thing  that  would  turn  Liberty  Bonds  after 
9/11,  in  the  Economic  Recovery  Act  of  2002,  you  gave  them  $8  bil-
lion for that 16-acre area to be rebuilt. Just after Katrina, we have 
960 square miles, we submit that we could use and this is allowing 
for  businesses  to  get  to  business  by  encouraging,  not  only  redevel-
opment But new development and enhancement of new industry to 
come to the Gulf Coast region and we need the language. The lan-
guage needs to be broadened. That would allow for the construction 
and  reconstruction  of  rehabilitation  of  commercial  property.  Not 
only manufacturing property, refineries, ethanol refineries, residen-
tial property and residential rental property. 

Because in the New Orleans region alone, 60 percent of the peo-

ple rented their homes or apartments. 

In  addition  to  the  capital  request,  we  need  for  you  to  know  that 
we’re  currently  working  to  address  our  business  needs,  based  on 
our capacity to address that. We started a campaign, which we call 
LED  Forward,  Louisiana  Economic  Development  Forward,  and  we 
have moved forward on that, providing access to businesses. 

And  the  last  thing  I  want  to  say  to  you,  as  our  time  is  expiring, 
is that we’re focused on getting Louisiana back to business. And we 
are  doing  a  lot  of  things  as  our  treasurer  has  outlined.  And  our 
people  are  very  resilient,  absolutely  very  resilient.  And  the  help 
that you can provide, along with the help that we are providing to 
our  businesses,  will  help  give  a  lifeline  for  the  businesses  to  sur-
vive, thrive, and later, prosper. 

And  I  can  say  this  about  the  people  of  this  area,  they  are  very 
resilient.  You’ll  see  that  and  as  you’ll  know,  we’ve  demonstrated 
that resilience in many, many years. In fact, we’ve been pulling for 
the Saints for 35 years, that’s resilience. 

Thank you. 
[Laughter.] 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Olivier follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MICHAEL J. OLIVIER, SECRETARY, 

LOUISIANA ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT 

Mr.  Chairman  and  distinguished  members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  the 
invitation  to  speak  at  this  hearing.  My  name  is  Michael  Olivier  and  I  serve  as  the 
Secretary of Louisiana Economic Development, or as we call it, L.E.D. 

Prior  to  Katrina  and  Rita,  LED’s  primary  mission  was  recruitment  of  new  busi-
nesses to Louisiana, as well as retention and expansion of existing Louisiana-based 
operations.  In  spite  of  the  hurricanes,  this  is  still  our  mission.  However,  we  have 
expanded our role to respond to the needs of impacted businesses. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

LED  is  working  to  build  a  New  Louisiana—a  place  where  businesses  can  thrive 

and citizens willing to work can find quality jobs. 

This is no easy task. 
First, let me put the impact of both storms in perspective from a business stand-
point. Many of the parishes in the Katrina and Rita impact zone are so dramatically 
affected  they  require  substantial,  sustained  investment  by  Federal,  State  and  local 
Governments and the private sector. In the 13 parishes most dramatically impacted 
by  Katrina  and  Rita,  before  the  storms  there  were  80,850  businesses.  By  compari-
son, the entire state economy had 197,446 registered businesses. 

Although  only  13  of  64  parishes  were  severely  impacted,  they  represent  41  per-

cent of the state’s total businesses—90 percent of which are small businesses. 

Let  me  also  describe  the  damage  to  three  of  our  largest  industries  -  oil  and  gas/ 
petrochemical, transportation and shipping and agribusiness which includes agricul-
tural commodities and manufacturing and timber. 

In  oil  and  gas/petrochemical,  in  the  Katrina  impacted  area,  three  major  facili-
ties—Murphy  Oil  in  Meraux,  ConocoPhillips  in  Belle  Chasse  and  ExxonMobil  in 
Chalmette  will  remain  out  of  service  through  the  end  of  the  year.  In  the  Rita  im-
pacted  area,  the  three  Lake  Charles  facilities,  Citgo,  ConocoPhillips  and  Calcasieu 
Refining, are expected to be at full operation by mid-November—three months after 
Rita hit. 

On-  and  off-shore  pipelines  are  reporting  a  return  to  operation  following  shut- 

downs from Katrina, Rita and Wilma. As of October 28, MMS reports: 

• Only 32 percent of daily oil production is back online 
• Only 45 percent of natural gas production is back online 
• 27 percent (224 of 819) manned platforms remain evacuated 
Ports,  shipping  and  transportation  is  the  lifeblood  of  this  state.  Louisiana’s  ship-

ping activities are increasing: 

• 21 inland and shallow-water river ports remain fully operational 
• Eleven of twelve grain transit facilities are fully functional 
• The  Louisiana  Offshore  Oil  Port  (LOOP)  is  unloading  supertankers  at  70  per-

cent capacity 

However,  our  deepwater  ports  are  a  different  story.  Two  suffered  extensive  dam-
age  and  are  not  operating,  Plaquemines  and  St.  Bernard.  We  don’t  know  when,  if 
ever,  either  of  these  ports  will  reopen.  The  Port  of  New  Orleans  is  partially  oper-
ational, but it will be another six months before fully operational. The infrastructure 
(roads, rail) leading to the terminals are 90 percent operational. You will hear from 
Gary LaGrange later, so I’ll let him describe the port’s condition in more detail. The 
Port of South Louisiana, which is the Nation’s largest port by tonnage and essential 
to  the  Nation’s  agriculture  exports,  is  100  percent  operational.  The  Port  of  Lake 
Charles  remained  open  during  and  after  Katrina,  however  it  sustained  damages 
from  Rita.  It  is  again  operational,  but  will  require  some  reconstruction.  The  Port 
of  Baton  Rouge  was  the  only  Louisiana  port  to  remain  open  through  all  of  the 
storms and has been taking diverted cargo. 

However,  by  saying  fully  operational,  does  not  mean  that  ports  are  fully  func-
tional. The combined damage to our ports is in the billions of dollars. To bring them 
back  to  the  level  of  operation  that  the  Nation  relies  on  will  require  substantial  in-
vestment from the Federal Government. 

Agriculture  is  where  we’ve  seen  some  of  the  greatest  damage  to  business  inter-
ests.  In  the  area  of  commodities,  according  to  estimates  by  the  LSU  AgCenter, 
Katrina’s  total  agriculture  products  damages  are  approximately  $1  billion,  while 
Rita’s  are  $569  million.  For  many  commodities,  the  economic  impact  could  poten-
tially grow as delays in re-establishing infrastructure exist. 

While crop damage was significant on the manufacturing side, agribusiness manu-
facturing  and  processing  is  coming  back  online.  Sugar  and  rice  mills  are  all  fully 
operational.  Our  pulp  and  paper  mills  are  at  50  percent  capacity.  Food  processing, 
which is mainly New Orleans-based, is 50 percent online. Most processors have De-
cember  start-up  targets  because  of  mechanical/electrical  issues  from  water  damage. 
Timber is where we suffered some of the greatest losses. Louisiana is a major tim-
ber  supplier  and  manufacturer  of  wood  products.  The  combined  timber  loss  sus-
tained  by  both  hurricanes  is  estimated  to  be  approximately  $850  million.  Katrina 
alone  has  total  estimated  losses  of  $612  million.  In  that  storm  alone,  we  lost  over 
3 billion feet of timber equating two times annual harvest amount. 

We  estimate  in  Louisiana  alone  that  there  were  250,000  homes  impacted  by 
Katrina—meaning  either  totally  lost  or  substantially  damaged.  To  rebuild  and  re-
pair  these  homes  will  require  five  billion  board  feet  of  lumber  and  three  billion 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

square  feet  of  panel  products.  Rita’s  top  commodity  loss  was  timber  at  over  $227 
million in projected losses. 

Since  this  committee’s  topic  is  revitalization,  let  me  tell  you  my  view  of  the  one 

thing we need to revitalize the economy—access to capital. 

If our businesses can have access to capital, we can rebuild not only the individual 

businesses, but the economy as a whole. 

If  the  lack  of  access  to  capital  continues,  we  are  facing  the  largest  default  rate 
for  private  and  public  entities—including  local  governments—since  the  Depression. 
LED  is  currently  working  to  address  our  businesses  needs  in  the  ways  we  have 

capacity by: 

1. Connecting affected businesses with information and resources 
2. Securing financial assistance for business recovery 

Area 1: Connecting Affected Businesses With Information and Resources 

We started a campaign called ‘‘LEDforward.’’ Our goals were to register and assist 
impacted  businesses,  connect  businesses  with  immediately  available  resources  and 
facilitate  on-going  dialogue  with  business  owners  about  recovery  process.  Elements 
of  the  campaign  include  a  dedicated  website,  LEDforward.louisiana.gov,  and  a  toll 
free call center—866–310–7617. 

Both  provide  access  to  LED  personnel.  At  the  toll-free  number,  callers  make  spe-
cific  requests  that  are  not  addressed  online.  LED  staff  can  track  emerging  and 
unmet  needs,  create  business  database  for  follow-up  on  emerging  assistance  and 
counsel business people about program opportunities. 

We  have  established  business  counseling  centers  across  Rita  and  Katrina  zones. 
The  business  counseling  centers  are  funded  through  a  $4  million  EDA  grant.  They 
are  staffed  by  Federal  and  state  government  representatives,  local  economic  devel-
opment  professionals  and  private  volunteer  consultants.  Businesses  do  not  receive 
general  information,  they  receive  specific  program  information  that  applies  to  their 
business and long-term business planning assistance. 

This  is  a  prime  example  of  the  types  of  programs  that  LED  will  continue  to  ini-
tiate.  We  act  as  catalyst  and  lend  expertise.  We  partner  with  local  economic  allies 
to deliver locally appropriate information. We recognize and appreciate all economic 
development is local. 

We have also expanded accesslouisiana.com, a web portal that enables businesses 
to:  post  capabilities  for  sub-contracting  opportunities,  search  sub-contractors,  and 
retrieve  or  post  commercial  property  opportunities.  LED  utilizes  this  database  to 
find qualified Louisiana-based businesses for the recovery work. 

This points to one of the biggest gaps in FEMA services. There must be opportuni-

ties to facilitate local work for Louisiana businesses and their workforce. 

Since  the  beginning  of  the  reconstruction  phase,  LED  staff  have  been  working  at 
FEMA’s center in Baton Rouge to provide qualified sub-contractors to prime contrac-
tors. As of October 20 (the last period we could get figures for), FEMA contracts had 
been  awarded  to  Louisiana  companies  25  percent  of  the  time,  but  this  only  rep-
resented 4 percent of the actual dollars or $156 million of $3.7 billion awarded. 

Also  as  of  that  report,  all  other  Federal  agencies  had  awarded  Louisiana  compa-
nies  28  percent  of  the  time,  but  only  18  percent  of  the  dollars  or  $123  million  of 
$675 million. 

We need your help to improve these numbers. 
Finally, LED has played an important role in returning businesses and their em-
ployees  to  work.  Through  November  3,  LED  coordinated  delivery  of  3,477  mobile 
housing  units  purchased  by  FEMA  for  displaced  workers  at/near  their  worksite. 
After  a  brief  suspension  of  the  program  by  FEMA,  LED  has  resumed  deploying 
units  on  an  ongoing  basis.  The  program  initially  worked  in  heavy  industry  sectors, 
but now supports small businesses and ‘‘mom and pop shops.’’ 
Area 2: Facilitating Small Business Aid 

Under  Governor  Blanco’s  direction,  we  have  forwarded  a  comprehensive  aid  re-
quest  for  the  impacted  region  both  on  the  state  and  Federal  level,  as  well  as  with 
private capital providers. We implore you to help us with four critical recovery prior-
ities, we have to provide immediate access to capital for business recovery. 
Priority  1:  Allocate  $200  Million  for  Bridge  Loans  to  Continue  Existing  Louisiana 

Bridge Loan Program 

Because of the desperate need for cash infusion, Louisiana reallocated its $10 mil-
lion  Rapid  Response  Fund—a  fund  set  aside  for  business  recruitment—to  seed  this 
program.  This  program  provides  $5,000  to  $25,000  loans  for  up  to  180  days  at  zero 
interest  to  businesses  with  more  than  two,  but  less  than  100  employees.  We  work 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

in partnership with 17 regional banks and the Louisiana Public Facilities Authority, 
under the trusteeship of JP Morgan, to administer the program. 

We allocated the $10 million seed proportionally by region. By the end of the first 
week, there were no funds left for the Rita area. Within the first two weeks of oper-
ation,  the  fund  lent  $8.8  million  to  467  businesses.  We  conservatively  estimate  a 
need for 8,000 more of these bridge loans. 
Priority  2:  Direct  the  Small  Business  Administration  (SBA)  to  Expedite  Loan  Proc-

essing 

Through November 3, SBA has received 136,086 loan applications. Of these, they 

had approved only 2,294 for $157 million. They had rejected 11,703. 

They have maintained almost a 90 percent rejection rate. 
Of  the  2,294  approved,  only  282  for  $19.8  million  were  either  for  businesses  or 

economic injury. The others were home loans. 

Most disturbing, of the $157 million approved, only $1,518,000 are fully disbursed. 
We  have  no  report  from  SBA  whether  any  of  the  disbursements  made  to-date  were 
to businesses. 

This is not acceptable. 

Priority  3:  Provide  $10  Billion  for  Business  Grants  That  Parallel  Those  Provided  to 

Lower-Manhattan Businesses After 9/11 

Like the 9/11 recovery grants for Manhattan, this request is for programs to pro-

vide much needed relief and enable recovery. 

9/11 programs included small business recovery grants (similar to business inter-
ruption  insurance),  large  business  retention  grants,  technical  assistance  programs 
and worker training programs. 

Like the 9/11 program, initiatives would be designed with business input with tar-

geted growth/recovery goals. 
Priority  4:  Authorize  $30  Billion  for  Tax  Exempt-Private  Activity  ‘‘Hurricane  Recov-

ery Bonds’’ 

These bonds would be used to finance construction, reconstruction and rehabilita-
tion  of  nonresidential  (commercial)  property,  residential  property  and  residential 
rental property. 

In conclusion, we want for you to understand that LED and the Blanco Adminis-
tration  is  focused  on  ‘‘Getting  Louisiana  Back  to  Business’’—taking  steps  toward 
building  a  better  and  stronger  economy.  The  greatest  key  to  our  businesses  suc-
ceeding is access to capital. We need your help to continue to find grants, loans and 
other opportunities that will give all of our businesses the lifeline they need to sur-
vive, thrive and prosper. 

STATEMENT OF DR. NORMAN C. FRANCIS, PRESIDENT, XAVIER 

UNIVERSITY; CHAIR, LOUISIANA RECOVERY AUTHORITY 
Dr.  FRANCIS.  Good  morning  and  thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman  and 
Mr. Thomas and Senator Vitter for being here. There’s nothing like 
coming  and  seeing  things  for  yourselves.  The  press  and  the  pic-
tures  don’t  tell  the  whole  story  and  we’re  most  appreciative  that 
you are here. 

I  guess,  I  wear  so  many  hats  and  I’m  not  too  sure  to  which  one 
I  should  be  talking  from.  But  let  me  start  with  the  first  one  that 
I’ve just assumed—chairing the Louisiana Recovery Authority. Sen-
ator  Vitter,  you  just  covered  almost  all  the  major  parties  that  we 
chose  in  our  first  meeting,  and  there  are  a  number  of  others  that 
we will be addressing. 

The authority, Mr. Chairman, is intending to try to pull together 
and coordinate all of the various activities that will help us recover 
in  Louisiana,  from  coast-to-coast.  This  is  not  an  easy  job.  We  just 
had  our  first  meeting,  maybe  came  in  a  little  late.  But  when  you 
get hit with a hammer, as we did, before you get all the shock, you 
realize that you’ve got to start pulling things together and the one 
point  I  want  to  make  is,  that  we  are  working  together  now,  and 
we intend to continue to work together—and to work together with 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

parish  officials  and  city  mayors  and  the  like.  To  look  at,  what  are 
the major areas of their concern, how can we pull this together and 
how  can  we  bring  the  State’s  assistance,  in  a  way  that  we  speak 
at,  Senator  Vitter’s  saying,  with  one  voice,  so  there’s  no  confusion. 
I  must  say  that  there  has  been  some  confusion  about  what  is  in 
fact, our efforts and the like. I think, that should be considered, be 
behind  us  and  we  want  that  message  to  go  through  the  Congress, 
as  well.  In  particular,  we  chose  the  parties  that  everybody  is  talk-
ing  about.  And  the  first  one,  Senator  Vitter  covered,  was  coastal 
restoration  and  levees.  Levees,  levees,  levees.  We  aren’t  going  to 
get  any  money  back,  getting  money  to  build,  unless,  we  give  that 
comfort  level,  that  we  have  handled  the  levee  system  and  that’s 
going  to  take  a  while.  But  we  know  that  we  have  to  get  the  Cat-
egory 5 and we are supporting that, in total. 

The  same  thing  is  true  helping  small  and  large  companies  and 
businesses and the Governor last night, talked about how the State 
will react to that in providing incentives and the like. 

We, also, are going to ask the Congress to make amendments to 
the  Stafford  Act,  to  provide,  what  we  call  appropriate  support  for 
state  and  local  governments.  I  should  say  in  my  second  half,  that 
I’ll  talk  to  a  minute,  we  certainly  are  very  much  into—in  change 
of the Stafford Act, because apparently, some 5 years ago, the Con-
gress took out nonprofit institutions and limited us to only the first 
two  categories  in  the  Act  and  if  we  had  to  get  help,  we  had  to  go 
to  SBA  and  then  get  turned  down,  then,  go  back  to  FEMA.  We 
think that’s unwise, we think it’s somewhat unfair. So, we’re going 
to ask that the Stafford Act be looked at again. 

Senator  Vitter  also  covered  some  of  the  other  parties  that  we 
have.  Health  care.  The  Medicare  problems  that  we  are  going  to 
face,  and  of  course,  we  need  to  build  our  infrastructure  and  trans-
portation.  So,  in  covering  this  part  of  my  role  as  the  authority,  I 
want the Congress to know, that we have a number of great people, 
now, about 24 people from around the State, in task forces, at least 
eight  task  forces,  dealing  with  those,  what  we  call  quality  of  life 
issues  that  have  been  damaged  and  we  have  to  recover.  And  not 
just  recover,  enhance  in  Louisiana.  And  one  of  the  big  ones,  of 
course,  is  education.  And  the  Governor  now  has  the  authority  to 
take over the failing schools in New Orleans. 

Hopefully, in the response, that will come and with expert advice 
we  will  get  from  around  the  country.  We’re  not  seeking  to  do  all 
of this ourselves. We have to bring people in, who have had the op-
portunity  to  face  what  we  have  faced  and  to  rebuild  in  these  var-
ious areas. So, we bring in that, the experts. Thursday and Friday 
and  Saturday,  we  are  bringing  a  conference  where  architects  are 
going  to  come  and  talk  about,  how  do  you  start  from  scratch  and 
make  this  a  better  place.  Not  just  recover,  enhance.  And  so,  we’ll 
be meeting about that. 

The  second  half  of  what  I  would  like  to  comment  on,  because  it 
hasn’t gotten as much attention, although Senator Vitter, I’m much 
pleased  about  the  financial  aid  for  students  that  will  be  coming 
forth—higher  education.  One  of  the  jewels  in  Louisiana  and  this 
city,  had  been  higher  education.  In  this  city  alone,  we  have  nine 
institutes  of  higher  education  and  two  centers  for  health  care.  I 
would  suspect  estimate  it  to  be  about  $3  billion  annually  to  this 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

city,  for  what  we  employ  and  what  we  do  from  economic  develop-
ment  in  this  city.  And  as  we  look  to  the  future,  sure  that  we  have 
short-term concerns But we need to do the long-term. And the long- 
term, it’s education from K–12 to higher education and higher edu-
cation has to be, not only stabilized, it has to be enhanced, so that 
we  can  in  fact,  go  the  long  ways.  Mr.  Thomas  mentioned  this,  and 
I think that’s critical for us. 

Now,  I  come  here  this  morning  as  someone  who  has  been  in 
higher  education  for  a  long  time.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  have  been  a 
president  of  a  university  for  38  years,  Xavier  University.  I’m  here 
as  a  displaced  person.  I’m  here  as  a  President  of  a  university  that 
was  totally  flooded  and  we  expect  to  be  back  at  business  on  Janu-
ary 17. Are we going to make it? I’m not sure. But I think we will 
and are going to make it because, it is important that we continue 
to  serve  this  state  and  this  region.  We  were  founded  to  serve  and 
develop  leadership  in  the  African-American  community.  Our  insti-
tution  is  totally  diverse,  totally  integrated.  But  we  have  a  distinc-
tion and I speak now, as a one part of the higher education system, 
but  I  speak  because,  it  is  important  for,  I  think,  the  Nation,  the 
Congress  to  understand,  that  we  can’t  afford  not  to  have  quality 
education.  From  this  small  school  that  I  happen  to  have  the  privi-
lege  of  serving,  we  produce  the  largest  number,  number  one  pro-
ducer of African-Americans who are admitted to medical school and 
graduate from medical school. 

In  the  science  area,  we’re  the  number  one  producer  of  African- 
Americans  who  major  in  the  biological  and  the  physical  sciences. 
We’re  the  number  one  producer  of  African-Americans  who  get  doc-
tor  pharmacy  degrees.  We’re  the  only  College  of  Pharmacy  in  New 
Orleans.  We  are  high  in  not  only  science,  but  in  the  health  care 
side. And we are doing so in a population that has and needs more 
professionals, in a Nation that needs the care and counsel that we 
bring to the table. 

But  we’re  here,  asking  for  an  investment  in  continuing  what  is 
important to the common good and general welfare of this country, 
not simply this region. But we’re committed to this region and the 
question  is  always  asked,  what  are  you  doing  for  yourself  in  this 
devastation?  Well,  I  had  the  tough  decision  of  laying  off  one-third 
of  a  faculty,  fifty  percent  of  the  staff,  cutting  off  athletics  for  the 
coming year, in order that we might be able to start back, trim and 
tight,  and  then  we  would  be  able  to  maintain  our  record  of  con-
tributions. 

But  more  importantly  about  this,  you  know,  in  disasters,  as  you 
have seen, I have seen in the Lower Nine and St. Bernard Parish, 
unfortunate  disasters  impacting  the  people  who  could  least  afford 
to be hit. Not that anybody should be hit, but I’m in an institution 
where  I  have  a  $97  million  budget  and  a  $50  million  endowment 
and  75  percent  of  that  endowment  is  restricted.  So,  I  have  little 
cash-flow. 

In the semester before Katrina, we had the largest enrollment in 
our  history,  in  August  2005.  Today,  our  institution  has  students 
and faculty scattered all over the place and we are rebuilding, try-
ing to get back. 

What  are  we  asking  for  from  the  Congress?  Support  and  assist-
ance  and  that  is  to  help  us  maintain  the  faculty,  maintain  our 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

structure.  And  we  hope,  that  you  will  understand  and  help  us,  in 
that regard. 

Thank you for being here. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. Francis follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF NORMAN C. FRANCIS, PRESIDENT, XAVIER UNIVERSITY; 

CHAIR, LOUISIANA RECOVERY AUTHORITY 

Mr.  Chairman,  Co-Chairman  Inouye;  distinguished  members  of  this  committee, 
and  my  Senators,  the  Honorable  Mary  Landrieu  and  Senator  and  committee  mem-
ber David Vitter: 

I thank you for the opportunity to appear before you this morning! 
I  am  here  as  a  hurricane  displaced  person,  no  home  to  return  to  for  months;  a 
president  of  38  years  of  a  university  severely  damaged  by  wind  and  flooding,  and 
chair  of  the  Louisiana  Recovery  Authority,  an  individual  like  thousand  of  others 
who  are  working  under  unimaginable  circumstances  to  rebuild  our  state  and  cities. 
In  the  precious  minutes  available  before  you,  I  will  limit  most  of  the  broad  con-
cerns of the disaster recovery in this region—and these are real and daunting—but 
with  your  indulgence,  I  want  to  personalize—to  put  a  face  on  our  struggle.  Yes, 
there are the frustrations. However, our commitment to rebuild is firm and unwav-
ering. 
Economic Development 

Louisiana and New Orleans, in particular, are witnessing the greatest challenges 
ever  faced  in  the  history  of  this  Nation  by  a  region.  The  devastation  has  impacted 
virtually every aspect of the quality of life measures for people, all of which adversi-
ties  reduced  resources  and  added  enormous  expenses  to  the  public  fisc.  Louisiana’s 
Governor Kathleen Blanco cut $315 million last night from her budget. The ultimate 
total  will  be  $1  billion.  To  meet  one  of  these  challenges,  to  recover  financially,  we 
must continue to enhance our total educational system. To the state’s credit, higher 
education  has  been  one  of  this  state’s  jewels,  and  a  major  economic  provider,  rep-
resented  in  New  Orleans,  alone  by  fourteen  (14)  institutions,  including  two  Health 
Sciences Centers. All of these entities have been impacted by this large natural dis-
aster in some way shape or form. And as it happens far too often in disasters, those 
least  able  to  afford  the  impacts,  are  the  ones  which  were  hit  the  hardest.  Three  of 
the institutions including my own were totally flooded. 

What  has  happened  to  all  of  us  is  a  horrific  nightmare,  but  one  very  real.  Let 
me now personalize this presentation as one example of what is being currently ex-
perienced by individuals and institutions in this state. 
Pre-Katrina 

Post-secondary education was the largest employer in New Orleans—$3 billion an-
nually  to  the  city—and  largest  intellectual  importer  providing  the  bulk  of  health 
care and the scientific professionals. 

Statewide  we  enrolled  244,608  students  and  today  83,821  are  displaced  (34  per-

cent); with 15,163 displaced faculty. 

Xavier is an 80-year-old private, Catholic, historically Black institution, relatively 
small—4,000  students—serving  a  student  body,  85  percent  of  whom  require  finan-
cial assistance for a tuition that is 1/3 less than the average cost of private institu-
tions,  nationally.  Xavier  is  first  in  this  Nation,  however,  graduating  African-Ameri-
cans: 

major in the sciences)—1,100 biology majors; 

• Who  major  in  the  natural  and  physical  sciences  (62  percent  of  our  enrollment 
• Number  1  for  African-Americans  who  are  admitted  to  medical  schools  in  the 
U.S.,  and  the  producer  of  25  percent  of  African-American  pharmacists  in  this 
country; 
• Xavier  is  the  only  College  of  Pharmacy  in  this  city  and  southern  region  of  the 

state. 

Like  other  higher  education  institutions,  we  are  critically  important  to  the  city, 
state and Nation’s scientific and health care industry; and our resources are limited. 
We  have  virtually  no  endowment,  $50  million,  for  an  annual  $97  million  budget. 
Yet  we  have  had  no  deficits  in  40+  years.  Like  most  Americans,  we  are  prudent  fi-
nancially and fiscally responsible. Disasters exacerbate our financial challenges. 

When we opened in August 17, 2005, we had our largest student enrollment ever. 
On August 29, Katrina closed our institution; students, faculty and staff scattered 
to  the  four  corners  of  this  nation;  our  campus  was  flooded  by  7  feet,  wherein  every 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

building  was  impacted  in  some  way;  we  lost  virtually  all  income  on  a  budget  pro-
jected  for  the  first  semester  and  we  are  faced  now  with  reconstructing  and  remedi-
ating  physical  structures  and  equipping  laboratories,  which,  in  the  past  10  years, 
we had invested $100+ million to serve this high achieving student body. 

In the past 9 weeks, like thousands of citizens and businesses, we have been seek-
ing resources to rebuild and thus far, in this transition period, the only support we 
have  received  has  come  from  several  concerned  foundations  and  modest  contribu-
tions from alumni and individuals, like the old lady in Salt Lake City who sent me 
$25 after my interview on NPR. 

Our recovery, like the two other flooded campuses—Dillard and Southern New Or-
leans, will be costly, and we have started; we could not wait. However, we have not 
received Federal dollars, as yet. Again like individuals, who have lost homes, includ-
ing  our  faculty  and  students,  our  insurance  coverages  will  not  cover  the  cost  to  re-
build. 

What have we done? 

1.  Reduced  our  faculty  by  1/3  as  we  attempt  gallantly  to  re-open  in  January 
2006; 
2.  Furloughed,  without  pay,  60  percent  of  our  staff,  awaiting  the  enrollment 
numbers for January; 
3. Eliminated all athletic participation for the coming year; 
4.  Sought  Board  permission  to  borrow  from  our  small  endowment  to  meet  cash 
calls on current remediation work by contractors; 
5.  Sought  funds  to  retain  faculty,  now  and  the  future,  to  maintain  the  high 
quality achievements of our institution’s legacy. 

What  assistance  and  support  are  we  asking  of  the  executive  and  legislative 

branches of our government? 

puses; 

their families’ economic circumstances; 

• Resources to retain our faculty to maintain our services to this Nation; 
• Immediate  matching  support  to  rebuild  the  capital  infrastructure  of  our  cam-
• Additional  financial  assistance  to  students  who  are  further  impacted  now  by 
• Amendments  to  the  Stafford  legislation  which  treats  private,  nonprofit  institu-
tions different from our state supported universities in disaster relief resources 
support; 
• Support  for  housing  needs  of  faculty,  staff  and  students  at  a  time  when  many 
• Eliminate  the  ‘‘road  blocks’’  that  use  normal  responses  to  what  are  totally  ab-

are virtually homeless; 

normal circumstances, today. 
Lastly,  I  would  ask  you,  collectively  and  individually,  to  stay  with  all  of  us  in 
this  Gulf  Coast  region  as  we  work  to  rebuild  our  communities,  various  institu-
tions and economic development efforts. Not one of us has gone untouched, and 
neither  will  this  nation  be,  ultimately,  by  this  tragedy.  The  human  suffering 
and  long  lasting  trauma  are  real  and  unimaginable.  This  Nation  has  gone  to 
the aid of countries around the world in difficult circumstances. We are now in 
desperate need at home. 

For  us  in  Louisiana,  it  has  not  been  easy  or  simple  in  these  past  difficult  weeks 
to answer all the cries and pleadings for help, information and resources in an effec-
tive coordinated manner. This is not an excuse, but a fact brought about by the mas-
siveness  of  the  disaster.  However,  the  efforts  of  working  and  coordinating  together 
priorities are taking place, region and statewide. 

What  I  have  tried  to  present  to  this  committee  is  a  microcosm,  a  model  of  the 
related challenges represented in our devastated region. If my colleagues, neighbors 
and  other  citizens  were  sitting  in  this  chair  their  refrains  would  be  the  same.  We 
are  hardworking,  compassionate,  honest  and  committed  people  who  have  faith  and 
courage  that  we  will,  indeed,  rebuild  and  welcome  back  so  many  who  have  lost  so 
much. 

Please  do  not  be  persuaded  by  those  who  would  use  excuses  or  distortions  to 
abandon us in our time of need. When this country called us, we saluted and served 
this nation well over our long history. We are doing for ourselves, but we need your 
support!  We  entreat  you  to  treat  us  with  the  same  fairness  and  compassion  shown 
to others. It is in this Nation’s best interest to do so. It is the American way. 

We  are  comforted  in  these  times  by  the  spiritual,  ‘‘His  eyes  are  on  the  sparrow 

and we know He watches over us.’’ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

Thank you for your indulgence and patience. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. 
Mr. Alden McDonald, President of Liberty Bank and Trust. 

STATEMENT OF ALDEN J. MCDONALD, JR., PRESIDENT/ 

CEO, LIBERTY BANK AND TRUST COMPANY; 
COMMISSIONER, BRING NEW ORLEANS BACK 

Mr. MCDONALD. Good morning, Gentlemen, Mr. Chairman, mem-
bers  of  the  Committee  and  Senator  Vitter.  Thank  you  for  being 
here  today.  We  really  appreciate  you  taking  time  out  of  your  busy 
schedule to visit our city, firsthand. 

I  will  represent  three  hats,  this  morning.  One,  as  President  and 
CEO of Liberty Bank, which is a small community bank and we’ve 
been  in  business  since  1972.  The  second  hat  I  will  wear,  is  Chair 
of  the  Board  of  Directors  of  the  local  Chamber  of  Commerce.  And 
the third hat, would be a member of the Mayor’s Rebuild Commis-
sion. 

I’d  like  to  first,  start  off  by  giving  you  a  feel  for  small  business 
and what our small business, our small bank is going through with 
Hurricane  Katrina.  You  have  copies  of  this  map  in  a  packet  that 
is  presented.  But  if  you  just  take  a  look  at  the  green  areas,  these 
are  the  areas  that  include  the  water  and  you  can  see,  by  looking 
at  the  map,  there  was  a  significant  amount  of  the  water  in  the 
area, in which, we are located. 

Our  businesses  in  New  Orleans  East,  primarily  servicing  that 
particular part of the community. All of the individuals, all 100,000 
of  the  individuals,  had  to  relocate  to  other  parts  of  the  State  and 
many  other  states.  As  a  result  of  that,  my  35,000  customer  base, 
primarily is gone out of state. This is an example of what has hap-
pened  to  the  small  business,  as  well,  in  that  area.  This  is  only 
100,000  of  an  area  that  was  flooded,  that  really  affected  close  to 
300,000  people,  in  the  New  Orleans  area.  So,  if  you  just  take  that 
particular area and multiply it out, you can see the devastation. 

Our  business  lost  all  of  our  background  files,  all  of  our  credit 
files, all of our collateral notes, all of the records of the institution, 
was  lost  in  the  storm.  So,  we  have  to  start  from  the  rebuild  point 
of  view,  which  we  are  in  the  process  of  doing  and  making  pretty 
good progress. 

I also lost almost 50 percent of my staff, who cannot relocate, be-
cause of a lack of housing. This story doubles, for every small busi-
ness in this particular area. We have the ability to really start the 
process  and  to  really  get  the  process  going,  if  a  number  of  things 
were to happen. 

I  have  basically,  some  short-term  goals  and  some  long-term 
goals,  I  would  like  to  present  to  the  Committee.  One  goal,  would 
be  for  your  committee  to  really  have  the  insurance  companies  to 
become  accountable.  We  have  not  received  payment  to  people  who 
paid  for  insurance  coverage.  The  payment  is  very  slow  coming  in. 
And  I  wear  the  Chamber  hat,  because  a  lot  of  these  small  busi-
nesses  cannot  function  without  the  capital.  This  is—they  are  not 
asking  for  a  handout  here,  they  are  asking  for  the  protection  that 
they’ve  paid  for  and  if  we  can  get  the  insurance  companies  to  step 
up  the  process  and  processing  in  paying  these  claims,  we  can  get 
a lot of businesses restarted quickly. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

The  CHAIRMAN.  That  business  interruptions  insurance,  is  that 

what you are talking about? 

Mr.  MCDONALD.  I’m  just  talking  about,  sir,  the  insurance,  not 
only the business interruption insurance, but insurance claims that 
would  pay  to  get  the  businesses  rebuilt,  that  was  damaged  from 
the  hurricane.  We  are  talking  about  the  inventory,  we  are  talking 
about machinery, et cetera. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Property  damage  and  inventory  insurance,  is 

that what you are talking about? 

Mr. MCDONALD. Yes, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Would  you  furnish  us  the  names  of  those  insur-

ance companies? 

Mr.  MCDONALD.  Yes,  sir.  The  same  thing  exists  with  residents. 
The  insurance  companies  are  not  sending  the  checks.  A  lot  of 
claims  have  been  taken,  but  payment  on  those  claims  are  not  oc-
curring. And as a result of that, people cannot move forward in re-
building their homes. Once we repopulate the homes, business can 
function.  Once  business  functions,  we  have  our  economy  going 
again. 

The  second  piece,  which  was  already  talked  about,  is  the  Cham-
ber would like to endorse the concept of the $10 billion in business 
grants,  similar  to  what  was  given  for  the  9/11  recovery,  that  was 
already talked about earlier. So, I will not go over that again. 

The housing, for our area, is much needed. We have a lot of peo-
ple  who  want  to  return,  who  can  return  for  jobs.  But  because  of  a 
lack of housing at this particular time, they can’t return. And I ex-
plained to you, that we also experience this in our business. 

To  give  you  an  example,  we  have  opened  two  of  our  eight 
branches that were affected in New Orleans. We cannot bring more 
individuals  back,  because  of  a  lack  of  housing,  not  being  available 
to house the employees. We have businesses who are paying higher 
rate,  higher  wages,  offering  benefit  packages,  but  again,  they  are 
operating  with  a  skeleton  staff  and  limited  hours  of  operation,  be-
cause of the need for employees. 

Under the long-term solutions we’d like to put on the table, infra-
structure  is  very  important.  Dr.  Francis  spoke  to  one  of  the  items 
that I was going to mention and that is education and our airport. 
Those  are  two  main  major  factors  that  we  need  to  really  put  in 
place.  Because  the  airport,  we  need  to  get  going  again,  because  of 
our  tourism  base  and  our  economy.  We  have  to  be  able  to  get  peo-
ple in and out, in order to get things moving. 

And  on  the  education  level,  the  higher  education  level,  we  must 
get those universities back in commerce, as quickly as possible and 
we must do things, in order to help them attract the students, that 
they  used  to  attract  from  other  communities.  The  universities  in 
this  area  provide  a  huge  number  of  jobs  and  the  much  needed 
brain  talent  that’s  necessary,  not  only  for  our  community,  but  for 
our country. 

The second long-term piece we would like to endorse, is that this 
community  put  together  a  very  successful  and  unique  bid,  to  help 
keep  the  military  here  and  that  was  part  of  the  Federal  City  for 
the  BRAC  Commission.  If  Congress  or  other  powers  to  be  were  to 
bring  that  back  to  New  Orleans,  we  could  also,  again,  provide  a 
number  of  long-term  jobs.  This  year  is  very,  very  important  to  our 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

community,  and  our  city  and  our  state  agreed  to  fund  the  Federal 
City.  So,  we  are  trying  to  help  ourselves  and  with  an  expedited 
piece  for  our  BRAC  Commission  to  look  at,  perhaps  helping  us  to 
move that a lot faster. 

I  see  that  my  time  has  expired,  but  I  have  two  other  industries 
that  I  think  are  very  important.  We,  in  the  city,  we  put  together 
biotech  district.  One  common  piece,  one  small  thing  that  we  could 
do, is to have the Congress or our leadership, in our country to per-
haps,  invite  the  CEOs  of  pharmaceutical  companies,  our  medical 
companies,  to  come  for  a  one-day  visioning  to  look  at  how  they 
could tie in with our universities and look at the possibility of jump 
starting  our  biotech  industry.  Or,  I  should  say,  increasing  our 
biotech  industry.  It  will  bring  employees  in,  it  will  bring  business 
in and it will help us in a lot of ways. 

The last piece would be tourism. Tourism is a major driver of our 
community and one small piece that could be done perhaps, in one 
of the grants and one of the economic pieces, would be to perhaps, 
give incentives to companies, to nonprofits, to associations to bring 
their conventions back to New Orleans, in an earlier way than our 
rebuilding process may call for. 

For  example,  over  the  next  24  months,  if  there  is  some  type  of 
incentive that can actually be put in place, that would be very ben-
eficial to us. 

With  that,  Mr.  Chairman,  Senators,  I  appreciate  you  giving  us 
the  opportunity  to  talk  with  you,  today  and  in  my  comments,  I’ll 
go into more detail. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. McDonald follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ALDEN J. MCDONALD, JR., PRESIDENT/CEO, LIBERTY BANK 

AND TRUST COMPANY; COMMISSIONER, BRING NEW ORLEANS BACK 

Allow me to introduce myself: 
I serve as President and CEO of Liberty Bank and Trust Company headquartered 
in  New  Orleans.  Liberty  Bank,  founded  in  1972,  is  the  third  largest  African-Amer-
ican-owned  banking  institution  in  the  United  States  with  over  35,000  customers  in 
both Louisiana and Mississippi. 

I  am  also  here  as  the  Chair  of  the  Board  of  Directors  of  the  New  Orleans  Cham-
ber  of  Commerce  whose  membership  employs  approximately  20,000  individuals  in 
the metropolitan area. 

And  finally,  I  am  a  member  of  the  Mayor’s  rebuild  commission . . . Bring  New 
Orleans  Back,  serving  on  the  Economic  Development  Committee,  and  chairing  the 
Subcommittee on Federal/Military/Aerospace. 

New Orleans East, where I have raised my family and which is the headquarters 
of Liberty Bank, constitutes half of the land base for the City of New Orleans, popu-
lation  96,400,  with  an  average  income  of  $42,000,  and  homes  owned  by  African- 
Americans that exceed $1 million in value, as well as a significant Asian population, 
many of whom are small business owners. 

New  Orleans  East  also  includes  some  of  our  major  industries.  To  name  a  few: 
Folger’s  coffee  owned  by  Proctor  &  Gamble,  Budweiser,  Trinity  Yachts,  the  Lake-
front Airport, Northrop Grumman, and our Michoud facility that has been and con-
tinues  to  be  central  to  building  the  rocket  boosters  for  the  NASA  space  program. 
New  Orleans  East  is  also  a  major  tourist  destination,  containing  the  Six  Flags 
amusement  park,  Bally’s  Casino,  the  Bayou  Sauvage  National  Wildlife  Refuge,  the 
Audubon Institute Nature Center, swamp tours, fishing and Fort Pike. 

This  is  a  city  historically  built  and  maintained  by  small  to  medium-sized  busi-
nesses,  whose  ability  to  rebuild  and  to  recover  is  being  severely  hampered  by  the 
magnitude of the disaster. 

Unlike 9/11, the Chicago fire or the earthquake in San Francisco, all of which af-
fected  a  section  of  the  city  it  was  within,  this  devastation  is  total—throughout  the 
region, affecting all of the surrounding ten parishes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

Many  business  owners,  myself  included,  took  a  double  hit—our  homes  were  de-
stroyed  and  simultaneously  our  businesses.  Municipalities  are  unable  to  provide 
basic services and are subject to bankruptcy. The tax base has been completely erod-
ed.  $4.2  billion  in  buying  power  has  been  lost  among  African-Americans  in  Orleans 
Parish  alone.  It  is  estimated  that  the  current  level  of  debris  that  the  city  has  to 
contend  with  now  is  the  equivalent  of  what  would  have  been  accumulated  over  the 
next ten years. 

In  this  midst  of  what  is  mind-boggling,  we  need  fast  action  to  address  very  tar-

geted and specific needs. I have both short and long term recommendations: 
Short-term 
1)  Our  Small  and  Medium  Sized  Businesses  in  Particular  Need  an  Immediate 
Response  in  the  Form  of  Checks  From  the  SBA,  From  FEMA  and  From  the 
Insurance Industry 

This  is  proving  to  be  an  extremely  slow  and  torturous  process.  Over  71,000  busi-
nesses  were  affected  in  this  area  and  we  are  subject  to  lose  two-thirds  of  these  in 
the next 30–60 days if they are unable to get immediate financial assistance. Many 
are  surviving  now  literally  out-of-the  pockets—committed  owners  who  are  dipping 
into  savings  and  retirement  to  renovate  their  property,  keep  the  employees  they 
have, in many cases pay for housing for these employees, and build back inventories 
and customers. 

FEMA and SBA funds are available and need to be released without bureaucratic 
red  tape.  The  insurance  industry  needs  to  be  called  to  task  and  held  accountable 
for  releasing  insurance  claim  money  with  all  due  haste,  once  the  adjuster  has  filed 
a report. We understand insurance companies are sitting on reports filed weeks ago. 
2) Interim Grants 

The  New  Orleans  Chamber  wholeheartedly  endorses  ‘‘KEEP’’—Katrina  Emer-
gency Employment Program, requesting that Congress authorize $10 billion in busi-
ness  grants,  similar  to  the  recovery  grants  made  available  to  businesses  in  New 
York  after  9/11.  This  has  been  endorsed  and  recommended  by  the  Southeast  Lou-
isiana  Business  Coalition  that  represents  our  major  business  organizations  in  the 
ten-parish area. 
3) Housing and Transportation 

On equal status as the money that is needed to rebuild, we need housing and re-
turn transportation back to New Orleans for our employees that are currently evac-
uated to just about every state in the Nation. They took with them the institutional 
knowledge and the skills upon which our businesses operate. 

We want our citizens and our employees back. 
Our businesses that are open have jobs and are offering higher wages and benefit 
packages.  They  are  operating  with  a  skeleton  staff  and  limited  hours  of  operation. 
They have the ability to fully open, generate revenues and tax dollars, but they need 
employees. 

We have nowhere to house anybody. It is estimated that during the day the city’s 
population  is  around  150,000  and  at  night  we  are  at  half  of  that.  The  traffic  jams 
back to Baton Rouge and across the lake are testimony to the fact there is nowhere 
for anyone to stay within the City of New Orleans. 

The  New  Orleans  Chamber  and  its  sister  Chambers  through  the  Metro  Chamber 

Alliance in this ten-parish area can coordinate this three-prong approach: 

Job/Housing/Transportation 
The  Chambers  are  the  connection  to  the  business  community.  We  urge  you  to 
have FEMA work with and through these valuable organizations to expedite getting 
our  residents  and  our  employees,  in  essence  our  business  families  back.  The  New 
Orleans Chamber will gladly coordinate this effort. 
Long term: 
1) Infrastructure 

Louisiana, particularly this region, as the Nation has learned, is a significant con-
tributor  to  the  national  and  global  economy.  We  have  to  be  whole  and  functional 
to  maintain  our  economic  viability.  To  that  end  we  need  funding  for  our  port,  for 
the Louis Armstrong Airport, our highways, and our schools. 
2) Federal City/BRAC Commission 

We have very successfully presented a unique concept to the Defense Department 
in  order  to  retain  our  military  bases.  The  military  is  a  $10  billion  industry  to  the 
City  of  New  Orleans.  We  are  committed  to  Federal  city,  our  city,  and  state  role  in 
creating a unique community for our military and enhancing our port activity. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

21 

We ask, as a vote of confidence, that the Defense Department returns its military 
personnel,  re-ignites  the  national  call  center  in  New  Orleans  and  follows  through 
on  its  commitment  to  work  with  our  BRAC  Commission  in  making  that  a  reality. 
This in itself can serve as a catalyst to this economy by creating jobs, by expanding 
our  economic  base,  and  by  creating  what  we  would  hope  to  be  a  permanent  home 
for our military personnel in the area upon their retirement. 
3) Biotech Industry 

Last year the business community in New Orleans, with the help of our legislative 
delegation  and  Mayor  Nagin,  successfully  passed  two  significant  pieces  of  legisla-
tion: 

The  biotechnology  district,  which  will  enable  our  nationally  recognized  univer-
sities—Tulane  University,  Xavier  University  and  Delgado  Community  College  to 
partner  with  the  business  community  for  research  and  business  creation  in  the 
biotech,  pharmaceutical  and  medical  industries.  If  we  can  create  products  here  at 
our  local  universities  then  certainly  we  can  manufacture  and  distribute  them  here 
also. 

We  ask  for  your  assistance  in  convening  the  top  CEOs  in  these  respective  fields 
to  come  to  New  Orleans  and  to  explore  and  invest  in  the  possibilities.  We  believe 
the  future  of  the  biotech,  pharmaceutical  and  medical  fields  are  right  here  in  our 
backyard, only steps away from downtown New Orleans. 

The  second  piece  of  legislation,  a  Senate  resolution  to  explore  the  governance  of 
Charity  Hospital,  has  many  more  implications  than  just  the  governance  of  Charity 
in  New  Orleans.  Our  healthcare  system  statewide  is  outdated.  Louisiana  has  the 
only charity hospital system in the Nation. 

We  have  been  overly  reliant,  as  with  other  states,  on  the  Federal  Medicare/Med-
icaid  system  to  bail  us  out.  We  cannot  continue  as  I  am  sure  you  would  agree. 
Healthcare is already at a crisis in the City of New Orleans, and as we rebuild, we 
do not want to be constrained by an outdated system and a system that does specifi-
cally focus on the needs of citizens in New Orleans and surrounding parishes. 

Again,  we  would  ask  for  seed  money  to  objectively  assess  the  healthcare  system 
currently  under  the  governance  of  Louisiana  State  University  and  for  the  Federal 
Government  to  provide  some  of  their  greatest  minds  to  assist  in  restructuring 
healthcare in New Orleans into a model. 
4) Last and Finally, Levee Protection and Coastal Restoration 

I  would  be  remiss  if  as  president  of  Liberty  Bank,  with  six  of  our  eight  branches 
affected  by  the  flood,  and  as  chair  of  the  New  Orleans  Chamber  of  Commerce,  to 
not  also  emphasize,  if  not  respectfully  demand,  that  funds  are  made  available  to 
adequately safeguard southeast Louisiana by building a levee system that can with-
stand a category 5 hurricane and restoring our coastline. 

Let’s understand this is a national crisis, not just a local one. 
A category 5 levee system may end up being the eighth wonder of the world, but 
as  other  nations  and  civilizations  have  risen  to  the  challenge,  we  would  expect  no 
less,  from  the  United  States  of  America,  that  one  of  its  own,  with  a  city  that  is  re-
nown  worldwide,  with  historical  connections  that  go  back  to  the  beginning  of  time, 
that  was  in  fact  one  of  the  largest  ports  in  the  United  States  at  one  time,  that  the 
Federal  Government,  would  not,  as  the  world  watches,  safeguard  one  of  its  treas-
ures for future generations to enjoy. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. We appreciate all of your 

statements. Do you have any questions Senator? 

Senator  VITTER.  I  just  wanted  to  follow  up,  really,  for  your  and 
Senator Thomas’ information on three points that Secretary Olivier 
made. 

First  of  all,  the  SBA  process  being  way  too  slow  and  unsuccess-
ful,  in  terms  of  approving  loans.  That  seems  to  be  a  fair  and  uni-
versal judgment, and in fact, Chairman Snowe is having a hearing 
because of that tomorrow morning. It is a very slow and frustrating 
process  and  I  appreciate  her  leadership,  pushing  them.  Hopefully, 
we’ll see some results out of that discussion and that hearing. 

Second, bridge loans. Even if the SBA were working at a reason-
able  speed,  there  is  really  a  gap,  in  terms  of  their  normal  menu 
and  we  need  these  additional  bridge  loans  to  help  fill  that  gap. 
Again,  Chairwoman  Snowe  has  passed  out  of  her  committee,  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

small business package, including these business loans. In fact, we 
passed that package on to one of the appropriation bills on the Sen-
ate floor. So, I am hoping we can continue to advance that. 

And  third,  Liberty  bonds.  That  is  in  both,  the  Senate  finance 
package  and  the  House  Ways  and  Means  package.  Although,  the 
House  Ways  and  Means  package  is  much  more  robust,  in  terms  of 
allowing  expanded  uses  of  those  Liberty  bonds,  as  the  Secretary 
discussed  and  I’d  love  for  the  Senate  Finance  Committee  to  follow 
suit. 

So,  I  just  wanted  to  make  those  comments,  flushing  out  those 

three ideas. 

Mr. MCDONALD. Mr. Chairman, if I might, also, one of the other 
issues  that’s  really  big  and  proven  to  be  a  benefit  in  the  recovery 
for  Manhattan,  was  the  accelerated  depreciation  provision.  That  is 
something that would spur industrial and economic development in 
the impacted areas. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Senator Thomas? 
Senator  THOMAS.  Just  very  briefly,  I  know  you  want  to  go  on. 
Mr. Olivier, you mentioned $40 billion in commercial loans, is that 
what you suggested? 

Mr.  OLIVIER.  No,  sir.  We  asked  for  $30  billion.  What  was  ap-
proved in the Economic Recovery Act of 2002 was $8 billion for that 
16-acre area of Manhattan. We have, just after Katrina, 960 square 
miles  of  economic  impact.  Over  81,000  businesses  in  those  37  par-
ishes,  that  are  included  in  the  impact  area,  so,  we  have  a  much 
larger—the  magnitude  is  much  greater.  And  so,  the  need  is  going 
to be much greater. 

These  would  be  private  activity  bonds,  that  would  be  able  to  re-

cover and encourage more business—— 

Senator THOMAS. What would be the cost to those, do you know? 
Mr. OLIVIER. No, sir. I do not know what the cost of those would 

Senator  THOMAS.  Their  bonds,  I  would  presume  there  would 

be. 

be—— 

Mr. OLIVIER. They would be tax exempt. That’s correct, sir. They 
would  be  tax  exempt,  private  activity  bonds.  It  would  be  based  on 
the  full  faith  of  credit  of  the  company.  Just  as  you  have  industrial 
revenue bonds today. 

Senator THOMAS. Mr. McDonald, you mentioned $10 billion busi-

ness grants? 

Mr.  MCDONALD.  Yes,  sir.  The  $10  billion  business  grants,  rep-
resents, I believe, the amount that was given for the 9/11 recovery 
and we’re suggesting that something similar to that recovery piece, 
be  done  for  this  impacted  area.  It  would  help  jump  start  a  lot  of 
the small businesses. 

Senator  THOMAS.  Do  you  have  any  idea,  I  mean,  I  understand 
your  needs  and  so  on.  But  on  the  other  hand,  you  have  to  under-
stand  that  we  have  to  look  a  little  bit  at  spending,  as  well.  What 
would  be,  do  you  think,  the  total  amount  that  you  are  going  to— 
you have $60 billion already there. You’re talking about $40 billion, 
you’re talking about $40 billion, do you have any idea what the to-
tals would be? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

23 

Mr.  MCDONALD.  No,  sir.  I  don’t.  But  some  of  the  same  funding 
that I made reference to, in the $10 billion, which was the example 
for  the  9/11  recovery,  is  some  of  the  same  money  that  Mr.  Olivier 
is  talking  about,  as  well.  It  just  so  happened  that  my  comments 
were overlapping. 

Senator  THOMAS.  I  understand.  We  need  to  be  a  little  concise 
about  it,  as  people  hear  about  how  much  we  are  spending,  so  that 
there is some consolidation. 

I  don’t  understand  your  comments  about  BRAC,  what  is  that 

have to do with it? 

Mr.  MCDONALD.  OK,  the  BRAC  Commission  reviewed  the  base 

closing for this particular area. 

Senator THOMAS. For all areas. 
Mr.  MCDONALD.  Yes,  sir.  The  City  of  New  Orleans  and  the  sur-
rounding  parishes,  put  a  committee  together  to  fund  a  project 
called the Federal City, where the state, the city would put new in-
frastructure  in  for  the  military,  if  they  were  to  bring  back  some  of 
the  cuts  that  they  made,  in  the  local  military  presence  here,  in 
New Orleans. 

My  comment  and  my  suggestion  is,  that  perhaps,  they  could  re- 
look  at  that  and  perhaps,  return  some  of  the  military  that  was  re-
moved  from  this  particular  area,  since  this  Federal  City  has  al-
ready  been  committed  and  it  would  help  our  economy  by  moving 
more jobs into the community. 

Senator  THOMAS.  I  understand  that.  But  you  know,  you  need  to 
understand  that  BRAC  is  to  talk  about  the  efficiency  of  the  mili-
tary. It’s not an economic development activity. 

Mr. MCDONALD. Yes, sir? 
Senator THOMAS. So, that’s really the basis of it, yes. 
Senator  VITTER.  And  just  to  further  clarify,  the  BRAC  Commis-
sion, in fact, recommended that a large portion of the Federal City 
proposal,  be  used.  And  so,  in  fact  the  Marine  Reserve  Command, 
will stay here under this Federal City concept. The BRAC Commis-
sion  basically,  adopted  it.  Assuming,  the  State  meets  its  commit-
ments to build out the Federal City. 

Senator THOMAS. That’s fine. 
Senator VITTER. It did not adopt the same recommendations with 
regard  to  the  Naval  Reserve  Command.  Which  unfortunately,  is 
still slated to get an offer. 

Senator THOMAS. I understand that and that’s fine. I just wanted 
to  make  the  point  that  BRAC  and  the  military  reorganization,  is 
not an economic development activity. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  We  really  got  to  move  on  now,  I’m  sorry,  But  I 
have  one  question.  Are  you  talking  about  guaranteed  loans  or  are 
you talking about direct loans from the Federal Government? 

Mr.  OLIVIER.  May  I  answer  that?  The  loan  program  that  was 
done  for  9/11  was  a  short-term  loan.  This  is  not  to  supplant  the 
SBA  loans  that  are  taking  quite  a  long  time.  As  a  matter  of  fact, 
as  was  pointed  out,  less  than  2  percent  of  the  loans  have  been 
made—the  loans  applied  for,  have  been  made.  And  less  than  one 
percent  have  even  been  disbursed  and  this  is  in  the  10  weeks.  So, 
obvious,  that  the  SBA  loan  program,  whether  it’s  a  disaster  loan 
program or an economic injury loan program, they are not working 
fast enough. And we need a bridge loan program, just as was done 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

24 

in Manhattan and what we are asking for is a $200 million bridge 
loan program, which is comparable to the bridge loan program that 
was  offered  in  New  York  State  and  managed  by  the  Empire  State 
Group and the Lower Manhattan Economic Development. 

The CHAIRMAN. You mentioned $10 billion? 
Mr. OLIVIER. No, sir. I don’t think that figure is correct. The $10 
billion that you are referring to, was in Mr. Alden McDonald’s com-
ments.  I  believe,  that  number  is  $500  million  for  grants.  He  was 
talking about a total package. 

There were $20 billion totally authorized by the Economic Recov-
ery  Act  of  2002.  $8  billion  of  it  was  private  activity  bonds,  that 
were  referred  to  as  Liberty  bonds,  we’re  asking  for  $30  billion.  Of 
that, about $500 million were used for grants. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  You  know,  we’re  also  dealing  with  disasters  in 
Mississippi, Alabama, Florida and Texas. Are you talking about au-
thorization just for this area? 

Mr.  OLIVIER.  Yes,  sir.  $30  billion  is  what  is  requested  for  Lou-
isiana. Mississippi is asking for $15 billion and the other two states 
are asking for smaller amounts. 

Senator VITTER. And again, just to clarify. Although there would 
clearly  be  cost  to  the  Federal  Government,  it  wouldn’t  be  that 
whole amount. 

Mr. OLIVIER. No, sir. 
Senator  VITTER.  And  the  cost  would  be  well  below  that.  You’re 

talking about the entire capacity for the bonding. 

Mr. OLIVIER. Correct, just as you have industrial revenue bonds, 

the cost to the—— 

cally, the—— 

Senator  VITTER.  The  cost  would  be  the  forgone  revenue  for  basi-

Mr. OLIVIER. Forgone revenue for the taxes, correct. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  All  right,  we  appreciated  very  much  your  state-
ment.  We  thank  you  for  appearing,  we’re  going  to  have  another 
panel  now  and  we’ll  take  about  a  5-minute  recess  to  change  and 
call Mark Drennen, the President and CEO of the Greater New Or-
leans Regional Business Organization, Ted Falgout, Director of the 
Port Fourchon, Gary LaGrange, President of the Port of New Orle-
ans  and  Ewell  Smith,  President  of  Louisiana  Seafood  Promotion 
Board. Will you put the signs up please? Take about a 5-minute re-
cess. 

[Recess]. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you,  very  much.  This  panel,  as  I  indi-
cated, four additional people, we urge you to keep your eye on that 
clock, if you will. We’ve allotted 8 minutes for each witness. 

Mr.  Drennen,  Mark  Drennen,  President  and  CEO,  Greater  New 

Orleans, incorporated. We’d be pleased to have your statement. 
STATEMENT  OF  MARK  C.  DRENNEN,  PRESIDENT/CEO, 
GREATER  NEW  ORLEANS,  INCORPORATED;  ON  BEHALF  OF 
THE SOUTHEAST LOUISIANA BUSINESS COALITION 
Mr. DRENNEN. Yes, sir. Good morning, Mr. Chairman. I want to, 
like  everyone  else  here,  I  want  to  truly  thank  you  for  taking  the 
time  out  of  your  schedules  to  come  and  see  this  region.  I  grew  up, 
unlike  most  of  the  panel  people  today,  I  am  not  a  native  of  Lou-
isiana. I grew up in upstate New York. I moved to Louisiana, some 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

30  years  ago,  for  a  job  opportunity.  I  stayed  in  Louisiana  because 
I  fell  in  love  with  the  people  in  the  state  and  the  community  and 
all the—as you have probably seen already, in your short stay here, 
the  wonderful  people  and  customs  that  are  here.  So,  I  have  made 
this my home. 

I’ve had an interesting career. I’ve worked both for the legislative 
branch here in Louisiana, I’ve worked for the executive branch and 
I’ve  worked  for  the  private  sector.  My  current  hat  is  with  the  pri-
vate sector, running a newly formed, 18 months ago, Regional Eco-
nomical  Development  Agency.  We  started  out  with  a  goal  of  cre-
ating new jobs in the region, of establishing business plans on how 
we  were  going  to  accomplish  that  and  in  fact,  have  made  a  lot  of 
progress.  We,  of  course,  like  everyone  else  in  the  region,  have  had 
to  change  our  focus  and  our  focus  now,  is  on  bringing  back  the 
businesses that we had. 

In  an  effort  to  do  that  and  hearing  messages  that  we  got  from 
Senator Vitter and others in Washington, we wanted to do what we 
could  as  a  regional  group,  to  bring  together  the  business  commu-
nity with a common message, to make it consistent with what oth-
ers  are  talking  about.  We  wanted  you  to  know  that  at  the  Federal 
level,  not  only  are  we  asking  for  some  help  and  normally  business 
is  not  asking  government  for  help,  we’re  normally  saying,  just  let 
us do what we do best. But in this case, as you’ve seen the devasta-
tion, you know that we do need some help. Short-term help. 

You’ve  heard  already  about  a  lot  of  the  problems.  We  won’t  talk 
to  you  today  about  the  SBA  problems  anymore,  FEMA  problems, 
our  housing  issues  are  severe.  I  want  you  to  know,  that  we  have 
set up a Regional Task Force and would like the opportunity to get 
back  with  you  later,  as  we  try  to  solve  some  issues  with  housing, 
that  nobody  in  this  country  has  ever,  ever  faced  before  and  there 
aren’t any good answers out there. You’ve heard about the devasta-
tion to our colleges and vo-tech schools. 

You  have  not  heard  so  much  about  some  of  the  other  problems 
with  our  health  care.  Our  health  care  system  was  severely  dam-
aged.  Our  hospitals,  our  teaching  hospitals  and  others  are  hurting 
as  we  speak  today,  and  those  are  other  issues  that  we’re  going  to 
have to work our way through. 

Tourism,  you  will  hear  in  a  little  while  from  Mr.  Steven  Perry, 
head  of  the  Tourism  group.  And  you  will  recognize  from  his  com-
ments  how  serious  the  problems,  and  complicated  the  issues  are. 
But tourism is extremely important to our recovery. In bringing to-
gether a Southeast Louisiana Business Coalition, though we want-
ed to make sure that our message to you was not only are we doing 
everything at home to help ourselves, but there are areas where we 
need  help.  You’ve  already  heard  about  two  of  them  from  Senator 
Vitter  and  others.  Number  1,  for  every  business  leader,  every 
small, medium and large business, is our levee system. We felt and 
we  made  plans  for  the  success  of  our  future,  based  on  our  belief 
that  we  had  a  category  3  level  protection.  It  is  now  becoming  evi-
dent  as  the  Corps  of  Engineers  know,  they’ve  studied  the  issues 
that  we  did  not  have  category  3  protection.  And  we  sincerely  be-
lieve,  as  for  us  to  be  able  to  come  back,  that  we’re  going  to  need 
that protection. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

In  the  long  term,  meeting  with  the  Corps  of  Engineers  we  hope 
that you will be able to finance and find a way to finance category 
5 hurricane protection. 

Number  2,  is  our  coastal  restoration.  Louisiana  has  now  been 
working with the Federal Government for decades, we have a plan, 
the  scientific  studies  have  been  done.  We  know  how  to  restore  our 
coastal  wetlands.  And  certainly  the  destruction  that’s  been  done 
over decades was partly responsible for Hurricane Katrina’s devas-
tation. 

Again working through our Senators, Senator Vitter and Senator 
Landrieu  ,  there  are  a  number  of  bills  and  issues  before  you  and 
again we respectfully request your help in funding some of the res-
toration of our wetlands. 

It  was  also  of  course  important  in  Florida,  it’s  equally  more  im-
portant,  we  believe—equally  or  more  important  in  Louisiana  for 
coastal protection. 

Number 3 and 4 on our coalition of business leaders representing 
over  2,000  businesses  that  have  come  together  are  the  issues  as 
Secretary Olivier talked to you about, we like Secretary Olivier got 
with  the  Empire  State  Development  Corporation  to  talk  about 
what  were  the  lessons  learned  after  9/11.  What  was  it  that  you 
folks  used  that  most  enabled  you  to  bring  your  businesses  back. 
And they told us three things. 

Number  1,  it  was  paramount  that  their  governor,  their  mayors, 
and  local  officials  work  together.  That  is  our  issue  here,  and  that 
will  happen.  Number  2,  they  talked  about  the  immediate  need  for 
some  grants.  We  are  asking  for  a  proportionate  response  to  Lou-
isiana,  as  was  done  for  New  York  City  in  9/11  in  the  grant  pro-
gram. Quite frankly you’ve heard about the SBA loans, and the so-
lution  to  some  of  our  businesses  coming  back  will  not  simply  be 
borrowing  more  money.  There  are  cases  especially,  mostly  in  the 
small  and  medium  size  businesses  where  there  will  have  to  be 
some  bridge  grants  for  them  to  come  back.  Their  insurance  is  not 
going to cover their issues, and again borrowing more money won’t 
solve  all  their  problems.  But  they  can  come  back  with  a  little  as-
sistance. 

The  other  one  Secretary  Olivier  talked  about  that  was  so  impor-
tant to New York’s City recovery was the issue of the Liberty Loan 
Program.  Those  loans,  low  interest  loans  will  also  be  important  in 
our long term recovery. So, number 1, the levees; number 2, coastal 
restoration;  and  numbers  3  and  4  are  those  9/11-type  programs 
that were so helpful to New York City. 

And  finally  if  I  could  conclude  my  comments  by  talking  about 
Federal programs that were already in the New Orleans region. We 
have  a  service  economy  for  example,  our  IT  industry  services  a  lot 
of the Federal programs. We respectfully ask that the Federal Gov-
ernment give us an opportunity to bring some of our infrastructure 
back, and not make any long term decisions about taking out Fed-
eral programs that are already in our region that have had to move 
because of some of the destruction, but we ask that those programs 
be returned to New Orleans as soon as possible. 

With that I conclude my comments Mr. Chairman, and again, we 
truly  appreciate  you  taking  the  time  to  come  visit  us  in  the  New 
Orleans region. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

[The prepared statement of Mr. Drennen follows:] 

27 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARK C. DRENNEN, PRESIDENT/CEO, GREATER NEW ORLE-
ANS,  INCORPORATED;  ON BEHALF OF THE SOUTHEAST LOUISIANA BUSINESS 
COALITION 
Southeast  Louisiana  Business  Coalition,  a  group  of  business  leaders  representing 
thousands  of  small,  medium  and  large  employers  from  the  hardest  hit  areas  of  the 
New Orleans region have united for three primary purposes: 

of failure. 

the regional economy. 

economic impact of the Southeast Louisiana region. 

• to  educate  Congress  and  Federal  agencies  as  to  the  vital  pre-Katrina  national 
• to alert Congress and Federal agencies about the severity of the devastation to 
• to propose a post-Katrina Congressional relief package. 
Critical to our message are some startling facts and figures. To date: 
• 80,000  businesses  have  been  disrupted  by  the  hurricane  and  are  in  severe  risk 
• 438,000 new claims for unemployment have been filed since Hurricane Katrina. 
• The  State  of  Louisiana  anticipates  $1  billion  in  lost  revenue  for  Fiscal  Year 
• 200,000 homes have been substantially damaged. 
• basic  infrastructure  necessary  for  economic  recovery,  including  schools,  hos-
• tax bases for governmental operations have been lost. 
The  Southeast  Louisiana  Business  Coalition  representing  businesses  from  a  vari-
ety of sectors such as banking, law, information technology and telecommunications, 
and  engineering  are  requesting  critically  needed  help  through  appropriations  re-
quests,  an  economic  stimulus  package  and  a  call  for  a  federally  appointed  figure  to 
direct recovery efforts. 

pitals, colleges and roads have been severely damaged or destroyed. 

2005/06. 

Appropriations requests include: 
• (our  top  regional  priority)—-essential  infrastructure  help  on  an  aggressive 
schedule  to  rebuild  the  levees  to  real  Category  3  strength  to  provide  disaster 
mitigation,  structural  stability,  and  psychological  reassurance  for  businesses 
and residents to return to the area. 
In  addition,  we  respectfully  request  long  term  funding  to  implement  plans  de-
veloped  by  the  Corp  of  Engineers  and  other  experts  to  protect  the  area  from  a 
Category 5 hurricane. 
• (our  second  regional  priority)—the  allocation  of  25  percent  of  revenues  derived 
from Louisiana offshore mineral production to implement our already developed 
coastal  restoration  plan.  A  significant  contributor  to  the  devastation  caused  by 
Katrina  was  the  previous  loss  of  much  of  our  coastal  wetlands,  which  are  also 
vital to the national economy. 
• a  grant  program  to  provide  vital  immediate  cash  for  businesses,  similar  to  the 
recovery  grants  provided  to  Manhattan  businesses,  by  Congress,  following  the 
September 11th disaster. 
• low  interest  loan  programs  for  commercial  and  residential  development  similar 
• funding  to  repair  damages  to  key  infrastructure  for  our  ports,  the  airport  and 
• a  comprehensive  economic  stimulus  package  authorizing  various  tax  relief 

to the post-9/11 plan for Manhattan. 

highways. 

measures and incentives, including a combination of 
—Relocation Tax Credits and Employment Credits targeted at stimulating busi-
ness re-entry into the market at pre-Katrina employment levels. 
—Accelerated  Depreciation  and  Tax  Exempt  Bonds  to  provide  an  incentive  for 
increased capital projects. 
—Personal  Tax  Relief  and  Tax  Credits  for  those  in  the  affected  region  in  order 
to entice back individuals, business owners and corporate managers. 

The Southeast Louisiana Business Coalition has recommended that the President 
and  Congress  create  a  single  regional  board  to  be  directed  by  a  person  of  national 
prominence to coordinate the recovery and rebuilding efforts in Southeast Louisiana. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

The  group  believes  that  relief  coordination  must  occur  at  the  Federal,  state  and 
local levels in order to maximize resources, execute effective planning, and expedite 
implementation for post-Katrina recovery. 

We fully understand that Louisiana must take every action possible to help itself. 
With  this  in  mind,  our  local  governments  are  proceeding  with  the  development  of 
action plans for recovery of their respective areas. Parish presidents and mayors are 
including  business  leaders  in  their  recovery  plans.  Outside  expertise  from  national 
groups  such  as  the  International  Economic  Development  Council  (IEDC),  the  U.S. 
Chamber  of  Commerce  and  American  Institute  of  Architects  (AIA)  are  actively  in-
volved. Governor Blanco has convened a special session of the Louisiana legislature 
to address budget issues and state incentive programs as well as convened the Lou-
isiana Recovery Authority to coordinate the state efforts. 

We  have  convened  a  regional  housing  task  force  group  to  devise  short  and  long- 
term  solutions  to  this  severe  problem.  Without  housing  for  our  citizens,  we  will  be 
unable  to  provide  a  workforce  to  re-open  our  businesses.  As  recommendations  are 
developed, we will share them with Congress. 

In  conclusion,  time  is  of  the  essence  for  our  successful  recovery.  We  request  your 
thoughtful  consideration  of  our  proposed  solutions.  With  the  temporary  assistance 
of the citizens of the United States, we will be successful. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Falgout. I’m not going to mispronounce that 

Port name again. 

Mr. FALGOUT. No, I’ll say it for you. 

STATEMENT OF TED M. FALGOUT, PORT DIRECTOR, 

PORT FOURCHON 

Mr.  FALGOUT.  Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman,  Senator  Thomas,  Sen-
ator Vitter. I am Port Director of Port Fourchon Louisiana. We are 
the  southern  most  port  on  the  Gulf,  some  60  miles  south  of  New 
Orleans.  And  perhaps  you’ve  never  heard  of  this  port,  it’s  not  that 
well  known,  but  like  Alaska,  much  of  this  country  should  think  of 
us as they turn on their light switch each morning. 

It’s  by  far  this  Nation’s  most  significant  energy  port.  Playing  a 
key  role  in  support  of  18  percent  of  this  country’s  oil  supply.  I’ve 
had  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  several  committees  and  sub-
committees  over  the  years  about  the  significance  of  coastal  Lou-
isiana, and I’ve generally told the same story. I’d like to read to you 
a  closing  statement  I  made  in  July  2004,  to  the  Subcommittee  on 
Water Resources and the Environment of the House Committee on 
Transportation and Infrastructure. The statement read like this. 

With  the  level  of  land  loss  that  exists  today,  a  well  placed  cat-
egory 4 hurricane would cause the price of gasoline to go up a dol-
lar,  double  the  price  of  natural  gas,  cause  huge  loss  of  life,  this 
would  throw  this  country  into  an  immediate  recession,  and  its  im-
pacts would dwarf the cost of protection. 

I  pray  that  the  next  time  I  testify  it’s  not  to  say  I  told  you  so. 
Well,  now  I  get  to  say  it,  I  told  you  so,  but  what  a  hollow  feeling. 
Unfortunately this country historically hasn’t reacted until a crisis 
occurs, well we have our crisis, and now’s the time for action. 

This is truly an issue of National significance. An astounding 87 
percent  of  the  oil,  and  80  percent  of  the  natural  gas  from  Federal 
offshore  waters  is  coming  from  offshore  Louisiana.  In  additional 
LOOP  this  Nation’s  only  offshore  oil  port  which  handles  about  15 
percent of this country’s foreign oil and is connected to over 30 per-
cent  of  U.S.  total  refining  capacity  sits  just  18  miles  offshore  of 
Port  Fourchon.  Gentlemen,  much  of  the  support  infrastructure  for 
nearly a third of this country’s oil and gas supply is located in the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

most  rapidly  deteriorating  and  vulnerable  areas  of  the  Louisiana 
coast. 

The  recent  storms  have  further  exacerbated  our  vulnerability  to 
a  point  of  crisis.  Today  over  half  the  oil  and  gas  production  in  the 
Gulf  of  Mexico  remains  shut  in  as  a  result  of  Katrina  and  Rita. 
Over 1 million barrels of oil and 5.6 billion cubic feet of natural gas 
per  day.  Since  August  26,  2005,  over  75  million  barrels  of  oil  and 
400  billion  cubic  feet  of  natural  gas  from  the  Gulf  is  unavailable 
to the U.S., that’s almost $10 billion of product. 

By  the  end  of  the  year,  the  Gulf’s  annual  production  could  very 
well have been reduced by 25 percent. We should all be very thank-
ful  that  Port  Fourchon  and  New  Orleans  did  not  receive  a  direct 
hit  from  either  storm.  If  either  had  just  been  a  few  miles  closer, 
my  dire  projections  of  2004  would  have  been  grossly  underesti-
mated, and my recession prediction much closer to reality. 

I commend this committee’s actions of last week, which amended 
the  Budget  Reconciliation  Act,  which  could  add  $1.2  billion  to  our 
coastal efforts. This is definitely a step in the right direction. 

The recent energy bill included a coastal impact assistance provi-
sion, which is a start, but fell short of direct offshore revenue shar-
ing  that  is  needed.  We  must  approach  a  level  of  revenue  sharing 
which  is  at,  or  near  that  which  currently  exists  on  Federal  lands 
within a state. 

We  have  a  plan  to  build  a  sustainable  coast.  It  must  include 
levee  protection,  coastal  restoration,  and  critical  energy  infrastruc-
ture  support.  To  fund  one  without  the  others  will  not  yield  the 
needed results. 

This  plan  could  have  been  implemented  at  a  fraction  of  what 
these  storms  have  cost  this  country.  Until  this  Nation  truly  comes 
to the realization of what’s at stake here in coastal Louisiana, and 
makes the proper investment to sustain America’s wetland, we will 
most likely remain on a collision course with an unprecedented en-
ergy shortage in this country. 

And  my  greatest  hope  is  that  I  do  not  have  to  return  and  say 

I told you so. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Falgout follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF TED M. FALGOUT, PORT DIRECTOR, PORT FOURCHON 

Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Committee,  I  am  Port  Director  of  Port 
Fourchon,  Louisiana’s  southern  most  port  on  the  Gulf,  some  60  miles  due  south  of 
New  Orleans.  Perhaps  you  have  never  heard  of  this  Port;  it’s  not  well  known,  but 
believe  me,  you  should  think  of  us  every  time  you  turn  on  your  lights.  It  is  by  far, 
this  nation’s  most  significant  energy  port,  playing  a  key  role  in  support  of  18  per-
cent of this country’s oil supply. 

I  have  had  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  several  committees  and  subcommit-

tees over the years, and I have generally been telling the same story. 

I  would  like  to  read  to  you  a  closing  statement  I  made  in  July  2004  to  the  Sub-
committee  on  Water  Resources  and  the  Environment  of  the  House  Committee  on 
Transportation  and  Infrastructure.  My  closing  statement  of  2004  read  like  this: 
With  the  level  of  land  loss  that  exist  today,  a  well  placed  Category  4  Hurricane 
would  cause  the  price  of  gasoline  to  go  up  $1.00,  double  the  price  of  natural  gas, 
and cause huge loss of life. This would throw this country into an immediate reces-
sion  and  its  impacts  would  dwarf  the  costs  of  protection.  I  pray  that  the  next  time 
I testify it is not to say, ‘‘I told you so.’’ 

Well, now I get to say it, I told you so. What a hollow feeling! 
Unfortunately,  this  country  historically  hasn’t  reacted  until  a  crisis  occurs.  Well, 
we have our crisis and now is the time for action. This is an issue of national signifi-
cance. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

An  astounding  87  percent  of  the  oil  and  80  percent  of  the  natural  gas  from  Fed-
eral offshore waters is coming from offshore Louisiana. In addition, LOOP, this na-
tion’s only offshore oil port which handles about 15 percent of this country’s foreign 
oil and is connected to over 30 percent of the U.S.’s total refining capacity, sits just 
18 miles offshore of Port Fourchon. 

Much  of  the  support  infrastructure  for  nearly  one-third  of  this  country’s  oil  and 
gas  supply  is  located  in  the  most  rapidly  deteriorating  and  vulnerable  areas  of  the 
Louisiana  coast.  The  recent  storms  have  further  exacerbated  our  vulnerability  to  a 
point of crisis. 

Today,  over  half  the  oil  and  gas  production  in  the  Gulf  of  Mexico  remains  shut- 
in,  over  1  million  bbls  of  oil  and  5.6bcf  of  natural  gas  per  day.  Since  August  26, 
2005  over  75  million  bbls  of  oil  and  400bcf  of  natural  gas  was  made  unavailable  to 
the U.S. That’s almost $10 billion of product. By the end of the year, Gulf’s annual 
production could very well have been reduced by 25 percent. 

We  should  all  be  very  thankful  that  Port  Fourchon  did  not  receive  a  direct  hit 
from  either  storm.  If  either  had  been  just  a  few  miles  closer,  my  dire  projections 
of 2004 would have been grossly underestimated. 

I commend this committee’s actions of last week which amended the Budget Rec-
onciliation Act, which could add $1.2 billion to our coastal efforts. This is definitely 
a  step  in  the  right  direction.  The  recent  Energy  Bill  included  a  Coastal  Impact  As-
sistance provision which is a start, but fell far short of direct offshore revenue shar-
ing  that  is  needed.  We  must  approach  a  level  of  sharing  Federal  OCS  revenues 
which is at or near that which currently exists on Federal lands within a state. 

We  have  a  plan  to  build  a  sustainable  coast;  it  must  include  levee  protection, 
coastal  restoration,  and  critical  energy  infrastructure  support.  It  could  have  been 
implemented at a fraction of what these storms have cost this country. 

Until this Nation truly comes to the realization of what’s at stake here in coastal 
Louisiana,  and  makes  the  proper  investment  to  sustain  it,  we  will  most  likely  re-
main  on  a  collision  course  with  an  unprecedented  energy  shortage  in  this  country. 

My greatest hope is that I do not have to return and say, ‘‘I told you so.’’ 

The  CHAIRMAN.  You  sound  like  me  when  it  comes  to  drilling  in 
the  North  country.  Mr.  LaGrange,  President  and  CEO  of  the  Port 
of New Orleans. 

STATEMENT OF GARY P. LAGRANGE, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

PORT OF NEW ORLEANS 

Mr.  LAGRANGE.  Thank  you  Mr.  Chairman,  and  Senators  Vitter 
and Thomas. Thank you for being here with us today, we truly ap-
preciate  it.  I’m  going  to  briefly  wear  a  second  hat,  in  addition  to 
President of the Port of New Orleans is Immediate Past Chairman, 
of  the  American  Association  of  Port  Authorities,  which  is  all  the 
Ports  of  the  Western  Hemisphere.  You  know,  Katrina  and  Rita  to-
gether,  actually  a  number  that  has  not  been  talked  about  quite  a 
bit,  but  22  Ports  on  the  Gulf  coast  were  detrimentally  affected  by 
both of those storms. 

From  the  Golden  Triangle  area  of  southeast  Texas,  all  the  way 
across  Louisiana,  Mississippi,  and  over,  including  Mobile  to  some 
extent. So we thank you for all of your efforts to this point. 

The Port of New Orleans is not just a Louisiana Port, or it’s not 
just  the  Port  of  New  Orleans,  and  for  that  matter  it’s  not  even  a 
Mississippi River Port, it’s a national port. It’s a port that services, 
62  percent  of  the  consumer  spending  public  of  America,  and  prob-
ably  the  most  unique  port  in  the  United  States,  because  it’s  con-
nected  directly  to  15,000  miles  of  inland  navigable  waterways,  in-
cluding the Ohio, the Tennessee, the Missouri, the Mississippi, and 
so on and so forth. 

Ports  like  Pittsburgh,  Memphis,  St.  Louis,  Chicago,  Little  Rock, 
Tulsa, and Oklahoma, all are very very dependent on the products 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

31 

that come into the Port of New Orleans and the Lower Mississippi 
River, and on the export side, the opposite is very true as well. 

We  want  to  look  at  a  plan  to  redevelop  Louisiana  and  we  cer-
tainly  propose  and  ask  your  cooperation  and  your  assistance  but 
not only from a navigation standpoint, as our other colleagues have 
mentioned  here  this  morning,  from  a  coastal  restoration  stand-
point,  and  certainly  from  a  flood  protection  standpoint,  first  and 
foremost. 

So we don’t want to overlook the entire package. I talk about the 
inter-connectivity  of  the  Port  of  New  Orleans  to  the  rest  of  Amer-
ica,  you  know  and  it’s  no  wonder  that  the  Port  of  New  Orleans  is 
the largest importer of steel, it’s the largest importer of rubber, it’s 
the  largest  importer  of  plywood  and  forest  products.  We’re  second 
now  to  New  York,  but  we’ll  be  first  again  next  year  in  coffee  im-
ports.  And  we’re  the  largest  certified  London  metal  exchange  port 
for precious metals in the United States. And we’re the largest ex-
porter  of  poultry  in  the  United  States.  All  of  that  said,  being  lo-
cated where we are in the lower Mississippi River, we also see over 
60  percent  of  the  grain  exports  from  mid-America  and  America’s 
bread  basket  come  right  through  the  lower  Mississippi  River  and 
right  through  New  Orleans  and  the  other  ports  on  the  river  as 
well, from the Port of South Louisiana. 

New  Orleans  also,  according  to  the  International  Council  of 
Cruise  Lines,  was  the  fastest  growing  cruise  port  in  the  world.  In 
the world. And had Katrina not come along, we’d have gone 90,000 
passengers  in  1993  to  over  850,000  cruise  passengers  this  year  in 
2005. That’s all been put on hold now unfortunately. 

The  Port  of  New  Orleans  sustains  an  employment  nationally  ac-
cording to studies that were recently completed by Martin and As-
sociates, 380,000 United States jobs are a result of the Port of New 
Orleans and the Louisiana purchase, 202 years ago. That accounts 
to roughly 28 states, as I said 62 percent of the consumer spending 
public  of  America.  That’s  $37  billion  annually  in  economic  benefits 
and  $2.8  billion  annually  in  Federal  income  tax  paid.  All  of  this 
said,  the  Port  in  the  storm  itself  sustained  publicly  and  privately, 
a  little  over  $1  billion  in  damages.  Thirty  percent  of  the  Port  of 
New  Orleans  as  we  knew  it  on  August  28,  does  not  exist  today. 
Thirty  percent  is  gone.  The  public  side  of  that  number  is  roughly 
$275 million of the little over $1 billion. So that to the Dock Board 
and  to  the  Port  of  New  Orleans,  we  are  looking  at  relocation  and 
rebuilding, not covered by insurance and not covered by FEMA our 
exposure  is  roughly  $275  million.  And  quite  honestly  it’s  going  to 
be  a  huge  task  and  a  huge  chore.  And  somebody  said  earlier  we 
need  to  think  out  of  the  box,  I  think  we  need  to  create  a  new  box. 
And  we  certainly  are  going  to  need  your  help  and  your  assistance, 
as  I  said  it’s  not  a  local  Louisiana,  New  Orleans  thing,  it’s  a  na-
tional thing, it’s a national situation. 

I  think  the  long  and  the  short  of  it  all,  is  that  we  will  bounce 
back,  we  are  back  at  a  50  percent  level  roughly,  almost  approach-
ing  50  percent  today.  The  day  after  Katrina,  we  were  told  that  it 
would  be  6  months  before  a  ship  came  back  into  the  Port  of  New 
Orleans, in 8 days we off-loaded our first container ship, the Lykes 
Flyer, a CP and that was quite a memorable day. The three things 
that  we  knew  we  needed  were  electrical  power,  certainly  man-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

32 

power,  and  intermodal  connectivity.  The  roads  need  to  be  rebuilt, 
the  bridges  needed  to  be  rebuilt,  but  first  and  foremost  was  man-
power.  And  I  want  to  take  my  hat  off  to  Secretary  Minetta,  and 
John Jamian of the Maritime Administration for in quick order de-
ploying  some  of  your  ready  deployment  vessels  to  New  Orleans,  to 
serve  as  cranes  to  help  us  off-load  cargo  while  our  gantry  cranes 
were  down  in  those  early  days,  to  serve  power  while  we  had  no 
power, while we had no generators, and more importantly to house 
port related personnel that we desperately needed to bus and truck 
back  into  the  area,  to  work  those  ships  so  vital  to  America’s  econ-
omy. 

So  we  thank  the  Federal  Government  for  moving  expeditiously. 
I know we hear all too often about the complaints of somebody not 
moving  fast  enough.  But  this  is  certainly  a  case  where  we  can  fly 
the banner and we were really, really happy with that display and 
that effort. 

NOAA  was  great,  the  Corps  of  Engineers  were  great  in  getting 
the  river  opened  up  the  day  after  the  storm.  Albeit  with  a  curfew 
in one way, the Coast Guard was there, aids to navigation were put 
back  into  place  quite  quickly  and  quite  readily.  And  we  certainly 
appreciate all of those many, many fine efforts. 

The  story  certainly  is  a  bleak  one.  But  as  I  said  we  thank  you, 
we’ll persevere through the efforts of our Congressional Delegation, 
including  Senator  Vitter,  we’ll  continue  to  put  one  foot  in  front  of 
the  other  and  we’ll  make  this  thing  happen,  and  we’ll  bring  New 
Orleans back to the level that it once was, and hopefully bigger and 
better, but not without your assistance gentlemen, thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. LaGrange follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF GARY P. LAGRANGE, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

PORT OF NEW ORLEANS 

My name is Gary P. LaGrange, President and Chief Executive Officer of the Port 
of  New  Orleans  and  immediate  past  Chairman  of  the  American  Association  of  Port 
Authorities  (AAPA).  I  am  grateful  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today 
to  discuss  the  future  of  New  Orleans  as  a  major  port  and  transportation  hub  for 
our Nation. 

Within a one-month span, Hurricanes Katrina and Rita have impacted over twen-
ty AAPA-member ports and many other private and public ports in the Gulf of Mex-
ico  region.  The  impact  of  these  hurricanes  has  varied,  with  the  largest  impact  on 
the ports of Louisiana, Texas, Alabama and Mississippi. For several ports, including 
New Orleans, the impact has been considerable; some port facilities may need to be 
relocated, and it will take months if not years to fully recover. Concerning the Port 
of New Orleans, that recovery process is underway—the Port is now operational up 
to 40 percent of its full pre-Katrina capacity. 

Though  I  am  here  to  specifically  address  issues  and  opportunities  at  the  Port  of 
New Orleans, I would like to note that the Port is working closely in a coordinately 
manner  with  interested  stakeholders  to  convey  a  united  vision  for  the  restoration 
of coastal Louisiana. To that end, the Port strongly shares the view that the future 
of  Louisiana  is  absolutely  dependent  upon  the  proper  and  immediate  execution  of 
a coordinated program that enhances navigation, coastal restoration, and flood pro-
tection measures. 
Value of Maritime Trade to This Nation 

The  business  and  economic  health  of  this  Nation  is  heavily  dependent  on  mari-
time trade. America’s ports are our gateways to the world and a critical component 
in  the  Nation’s  economic  health  and  national  defense.  When  ports  are  impacted, 
there  is  a  quick  and  sizable  ripple  effect  throughout  the  economy.  U.S.  ports  and 
waterways  handle  over  2  billion  tons  of  cargo  annually.  Much  of  that  commerce 
flows  through  the  impacted  ports  in  Louisiana,  Texas,  Alabama  and  Mississippi. 
These ports are heavily linked to this Nation’s petroleum, grain and farm products, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

fruit,  poultry,  coffee,  chemical  and  steel  trades.  Through  its  critical  location  on  the 
inland  waterways  system,  the  Port  of  New  Orleans  alone  serves  as  the  focal  point 
for  waterborne  transportation  of  cargo  to  28  states.  That  cargo  activity  supported 
$37 billion in economic benefits to the country and generated $2.8 billion in Federal 
tax revenue. 

In  the  post-Katrina  environment,  examples  of  affected  cargo  activity  include  the 

following: 

Agricultural  products  from  17  midwestern  states  flow  through  the  Mississippi 
River. Over half of the grain exports for this Nation depart from ports impacted 
by  Katrina.  Oil,  agriculture  and  chemicals  rely  heavily  on  the  infrastructure 
provided in these port areas. 
Gulf ports serve as one of the Nation’s largest gateways for poultry exports, and 
the  inability  to  handle  frozen  poultry  products  through  unique  dockside  facili-
ties would affect the industry worldwide. Estimates for the Port of New Orleans 
show  that  relying  on  less  efficient  means  to  transport  these  products  would  in-
crease  costs  by  $7–$8/ton,  thus  making  U.S.  poultry  products  extremely  non-
competitive in the international marketplace. 
Steel  is  another  critical  commodity  handled  by  the  Port  of  New  Orleans.  The 
cost of diverting steel imports from New Orleans would increase the cost of such 
products  by  an  estimated  $80–$90/metric  ton  because  of  reduced  access  to  in-
land barge and rail transportation systems and associated delay costs. 
Disruptions in the delivery of natural rubber products through the Port of New 
Orleans  are  creating  raw  material  distribution  and  supply  problems  for  tire 
manufacturing facilities in the U.S. 
Passenger cruise operations are also an important economic component at many 
U.S. ports, including the Port of New Orleans. Prior to Katrina, the Port of New 
Orleans  was  the  fastest  growing  cruise  port  in  the  world.  Cruises  provide  sig-
nificant tourist trade, jobs and income for New Orleans and the region, and the 
rebound  of  passenger  cruise  operations  will  depend  heavily  on  the  ability  of 
New Orleans to rebuild. 

Should Port of New Orleans services not be completely restored, any rerouting of 
traditional  port  cargoes  would  increase  related  supply  chain  costs,  including  those 
associated  with  trucking  and  rail  services,  barging,  distribution  and  warehousing, 
and ocean freight. 
Importance of Federal Assistance 

Catastrophic  events,  whether  natural  or  man-made,  can  greatly  impact  maritime 
trade.  Hurricanes  are  especially  dangerous  and  are  the  most  frequent  threat  since 
ports are located in affected coastal areas. Ports also are impacted by other disasters 
such  as  earthquakes  and  terrorist  events.  The  impact  on  New  Orleans  from  Hurri-
canes  Katrina  and  Rita  has  been  considerable.  There  are  several  key  actions  that 
are  important  to  the  port’s  recovery:  quickly  reopening  and  maintaining  shipping 
channels;  restoring  communications,  electrical  power  and  other  utility  services;  ob-
taining a readily available workforce; and repairing facilities and intermodal connec-
tions (reliable truck and rail services). 

Concerning Federal assistance provided to the Port of New Orleans, the Maritime 
Administration  (MarAd)  is  to  be  especially  commended  for  its  efforts.  The  agency 
took the historic step of diverting military ready reserve ships to help ports quickly 
reopen.  MarAd  provided  a  vessel  in  New  Orleans  for  use  as  housing  for  Port  work-
ers.  The  vessel  also  had  cranes  for  recovery  and  cargo  operations  and  provided  the 
ability to generate power for the Port. 

Several  other  Federal  agencies  stepped  in  quickly  to  help  out  affected  ports,  and 
were  critical  to  the  ports’  ability  to  reopen  quickly.  The  Coast  Guard,  the  Army 
Corps  of  Engineers,  and  the  National  Oceanic  and  Atmospheric  Administration 
should  especially  be  commended  for  their  vital  and  timely  assistance  provided  to 
ports  by  surveying  channels,  identifying  any  obstructions,  reinstalling  aids  to  navi-
gation, and providing emergency dredging. These agencies worked quickly and coop-
eratively to reopen the shipping channels. 

FEMA  has  also  been  an  important  partner.  It  has  directed  many  of  the  Federal 

recovery activities for the Port and is helping to facilitate rebuilding activities. 
Future of New Orleans as a Transportation Center 

It  is  clear  that  the  Port  of  New  Orleans  serves  as  one  of  the  Nation’s  key  inter-
modal gateways for domestic and international trade. The very geographic proximity 
of  the  Port  to  the  Gulf  of  Mexico  and  the  mouth  of  the  Mississippi  River  makes  it 
the  ideal  and  central  location  for  the  inbound  and  outbound  shipment  of  cargo.  As 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

34 

a  key  transportation  focal  point  on  the  Mississippi  River,  the  Port  of  New  Orleans 
serves  as  the  primary  hub  for  the  shipment  of  cargo  on  the  Nation’s  inland  water-
ways system. Given the regional access to major road systems, including Interstates 
I–10, I–55 and I–59, the Port is perfectly situated to facilitate the highway transport 
of goods flowing through the New Orleans port region. Finally, the Port of New Or-
leans provides immediate rail access for six major national railroads, namely Union 
Pacific,  Burlington  Northern/Santa  Fe,  Kansas  City  Southern,  Norfolk  Southern, 
Canadian  National,  and  CSX.  No  port  in  the  Nation  is  more  ideally  located  for  the 
intermodal inbound and outbound movement of domestic and international cargo by 
ocean-going vessels, trucks, railroads, or barges. That is why the Port of New Orle-
ans  is  so  vital  to  the  business  and  economic  health  of  the  region  and  our  Nation. 
The  operations  of  the  Port  must  be  fully  restored  in  order  to  continue  to  reap  the 
trade and other vital economic benefits that accrue from such operations. 
Katrina Impact and Recovery 

Hurricane  Katrina  completely  shut  down  the  Port  of  New  Orleans.  The  Port  is 
only now beginning to restore full electricity, water, sewage and other services, and 
its  terminals  and  facilities  were  severely  damaged  by  both  storms  and  subsequent 
flooding.  The  total  closure  of  the  Port  not  only  affected  the  economy  of  Southeast 
Louisiana, but also the entire Nation. In 2004 alone, more than 380,000 jobs in the 
U.S. were dependent on the cargo activity at the Port. 

In the immediate aftermath of Hurricane Katrina and Rita, the Port of New Orle-
ans has been working non-stop to restore its facilities and services. As noted above, 
the Port is currently operating at only 40 percent of its pre-Katrina level. The Port 
of  New  Orleans  is  still  struggling  with  a  limited  workforce  and  the  ability  to  move 
the  cargo  in  and  out  of  the  Port.  Damaged  terminal,  warehouse  and  other  Port  fa-
cilities  need  to  be  repaired  and/or  replaced.  Mississippi  and  some  Texas  ports  face 
similar  problems.  Intermodal  connections,  such  as  truck  and  train,  are  still  a  chal-
lenge.  Highways  and  rail  tracks  need  to  be  repaired  and/or  rebuilt,  and  workers 
need basic housing in order to continue any long-term employment. The recovery of 
the Port of New Orleans is tied to the problems of restoring the entire city. Without 
adequate infrastructure for longer term housing and family needs, workers will not 
be able to return. Cruises will wait to return until hotels and tourist attractions are 
restored. 

The Port is a major economic engine for New Orleans and the region. Quickly re-
storing the Port to full operation will help return economic vibrancy to the area. The 
Port  will  also  be  a  critical  part  of  rebuilding  the  city.  It  can  provide  a  means  of 
bringing in the materials needed for the major repair and reconstruction efforts. 

Based upon post-Katrina engineering and other studies, the Port of New Orleans 
estimates  that  funding  of  approximately  $275,000,000  for  unrecoverable  damages 
will  be  required  to  rehabilitate  Port  facilities  damaged  or  affected  by  Hurricanes 
Katrina  and  Rita.  Other  ports  in  Louisiana,  Alabama,  Texas  and  Mississippi  also 
will incur costs to repair facilities. If the Port returns to full operation, the New Or-
leans region will soon follow. With repaired port and intermodal infrastructure and 
a  return  of  the  workforce,  the  Port  will  be  a  major  factor  in  the  business  and  eco-
nomic  revitalization  so  desperately  required  for  the  Gulf  Coast  region  and  our  Na-
tion. 
Conclusion 

I thank you again for the opportunity to address this committee today. I look for-
ward  to  working  with  you  and  your  fellow  committee  members  on  the  recovery  of 
the Port of New Orleans and other affected Gulf Coast ports. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  And  thank  you  for  this 
comprehensive  statement.  We’re  going  to  print  all  the  statements 
that  were  presented  to  us  in  the  record,  fully  as  though  read.  I  do 
appreciate your comments. Now Mr. Ewell Smith, please. 

STATEMENT OF EWELL SMITH, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

LOUISIANA SEAFOOD PROMOTION AND MARKETING BOARD 
Mr. SMITH. Thank you Mr. Chairman, I want to thank you, Sen-
ator  Vitter,  Senator  Thomas  and  the  other  members  of  the  Com-
mittee.  As  a  child  growing  up  New  Orleans,  my  mom  made  craw-
fish  etouffe  and  shrimp  etouffe  just  about  every  other  day  it 
seemed  like.  It  was  so  special  cooking  that  and  trout  almondine. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

35 

It’s  something  we  take  for  granted  in  New  Orleans,  and  the  rest 
of  the  country  comes  to  New  Orleans  to  enjoy  it  and  hopefully 
while  you’re  all  here,  you’ll  get  to  enjoy  some  of  our  seafood,  and 
understand the importance of our natural resource. 

I serve as Executive Director of the Louisiana Seafood Promotion 
and Marketing Board. We represent over 16,000 commercial fisher-
men,  and  the  board  markets  the  state’s  commercial  seafood  prod-
ucts, both to consumer and to trade. 

Louisiana seafood industry is primarily made up of five different 
sectors:  shrimp,  oysters,  crawfish,  blue  crabs,  and  finfish.  Lou-
isiana  is  second  only  to  Alaska  in  total  seafood  landings,  while  we 
lead the Nation in shrimp, oysters and crawfish production. Louisi-
ana’s  seafood  industry  is  the  fuel  that  drives  our  restaurant  and 
tourism  industries  with  over  $2.8  billion  in  retail  sales.  Prior  to 
Hurricanes  Katrina  and  Rita,  our  seafood  industry  was  struggling 
with high fuel prices and imports. 

Hurricanes Katrina and Rita have impacted our industry in ways 
unimaginable.  Three  of  the  six  largest  docks  in  the  U.S.  by  land-
ings  are  in  Louisiana:  Empire,  Venice  and  Cameron.  The  infra-
structure  in  these  areas  are  completely  destroyed.  As  a  whole,  our 
fishing  communities  east  of  the  Mississippi  River  are  out  of  busi-
ness.  There  are  no  docks  to  land  the  product,  no  lighthouses,  no 
fuel,  no  electricity,  no  cold  storage,  no  marinas,  no  bait  and  tackle 
shops, no communities, meaning no welders, no mechanics, no deck 
hands, and on. West of the Mississippi, our shrimping industry has 
lost  2  of  its  largest  shrimping  docks  which  land  about  30  percent 
of  all  our  product.  Seventy  percent  of  our  wholesale  retail  dealers, 
licensed  in  Louisiana,  based  in  the  parishes  impacted  by  Hurri-
canes Katrina and Rita. Our oyster industry is operating at a frac-
tion of 40 percent, the crops for finfish, shrimp and crabs, just like 
you would see in the movie Forest Gump after the storm. However 
current estimates are approximately 15 to 25 percent of our fisher-
men  are  actually  out  there  fishing.  Over  3,000  of  our  commercial 
vehicles  are  on  land  where  they  don’t  belong.  Even  though  the  re-
source is strong, this may be a false positive. 

The  marshes  washed  away  during  the  hurricanes  released  some 
nutrients which helped the crops to flourish, so those who can fish 
right  now  are  doing  well.  But  next  year  will  be  uncertain,  for  100 
square miles of our marshes have been lost. Areas that are needed 
for resources to grow. 

Between  Katrina  and  Rita,  we  lost  more  marshland  in  less  than 
a month, than we were projected to lose over the next 45 years. We 
have also what I call a crisis on top of a crisis. 

More than likely you saw the dewatering of New Orleans on tele-
vision  and  the  press  labeled  our  waters  as  toxic  soup,  killing  sea-
food  sales  across  the  board.  We  have  fought  this  battle  vigorously 
working with the Department of Health and Hospitals, Department 
of Environmental Quality, LSU Food Science, the FDA and NOAA, 
and the good news is there are no toxins in the water. And the sea-
food is safe to consume. 

However  the  damage  is  done,  we  will  fight  this  seafood  safety 
challenge  for  the  foreseeable  future.  The  double  whammy  for  our 
industry is that Wildlife and Fisheries has already estimated a loss 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

36 

of over $2.2 billion in retail sales just from the damage of the hur-
ricanes, much less the perception challenge we have. 

If you look out these windows, about seven or eight blocks is one 
of  the  biggest  shrimp  processors  in  our  state,  and  probably  in  our 
country. The biggest challenge they’re going to have—they were se-
verely  damaged  during  the  hurricane  not  by  the  hurricane  itself, 
but by looters. 

Looters  got  into  their  facility,  destroyed  their  administrative  of-
fices,  some  of  their  equipment  and  ripped  the  doors  off  of  their 
freezer  coolers  destroying  over  2  million  pounds  of  product.  But 
that’s  the  short  term  challenge  for  them.  The  long  term  challenge 
for them is going to be getting labor. Right now labor in Lakeview, 
the  area  where  you  may  have  visited  yesterday,  are  getting  paid 
up to $15 to $20 an hour to tear our sheetrock. Burger King’s pay-
ing  $8.50  an  hour  and  a  $6,000  signing  bonus,  and  our  processing 
plants are losing their laborers that they have right now, and hav-
ing  a  hard  time  replacing  them.  This  gentlemen,  Paul  Piazz  and 
Sons, six or seven blocks over is going to have a difficult time come 
May season. 

So, where do we begin? The first issue is the fishermen, without 
our fisherman, nothing else matters. We need to provide the funds 
necessary for the fishermen to get up and going, the seafood vessels 
and  the  oyster  farmers.  We  need  to  help  the  fishermen  get  their 
boats  back  in  the  water  as  soon  as  possible  and  put  them  back  to 
work  cleaning  the  water  of  debris.  We  need  to  rebuild  the  infra-
structure  as  soon  as  possible.  That  means  boats,  docks,  fuel,  ice 
houses,  cold  storages,  marinas,  bait  and  tackle  shops,  oyster  reefs 
and  on.  We  need  to  rebuild  the  markets  lost  through  marketing 
and promotions. If you ask any of the seafood dealers around town, 
or around the state, if they’ve lost market share, they will tell you 
,yes.  We’ve  lost  we  estimate  $2.2  billion  in  sales  this  coming  year. 
Those markets losses are probably gone. 

As  you  know  our  shrimping  industry  alone,  10  percent  of  the 
shrimp  consumed  in  the  United  States  is  imported.  We’ve  given— 
these  hurricanes  have  given  those  industries  a  perfect  opportunity 
to  slip  into  our  shoes.  Into  our  markets  that  we  had.  Rebuilding 
those markets will be critical. And of course, you’ve heard we need 
to  rebuild  our  coastlines,  not  only  to  save  the  lives  of  the  people 
of our state and in New Orleans, but we also need that habitat for 
our natural resource for our seafood. 

In closing, it’s my understanding that you all will be doing a heli-
copter  tour  today.  We—this  past  Friday,  my  Louisiana  Seafood 
Board  organized  an  event  that  took  our  Natural  Resource  Com-
mittee  down  to  Lower  Plaquemine’s  Parish.  Now  I  grew  up  in 
Lakeview,  around  the  corner  here,  and  I’ve  helped  gut  a  few 
houses,  and  I  thought  that  area  looked  bad  until  I  went  to  Lower 
Plaquemine’s  Parish.  Lower  Plaquemine’s  Parish  makes  Lakeview 
look 
like  paradise.  The  challenges  there  are  great.  Lower 
Plaquemine’s  Parish  is  home  to  two  of  our  biggest  fishing  commu-
nities  and  symbolic  of  the  rest  of  our  coastal  communities  around 
the state. 

Hurricane  Katrina  was  the  right  hook,  and  Rita  was  the  left 
hook. Every part of coastal community has been affected. Never in 
the  history  has  the  entire  oyster  industry  been  completely  shut-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

down,  as  it  has  been  for  the  passed  few  months.  It  just  recently 
opened up. The thing that I want to leave you with is this. 

When  we  visit  with  our  fishermen  in  these  coastal  communities, 
they’ve  been  knocked  down  before,  they’re  used  to  it.  They’re  not 
a  city  boy  like  me,  they  can—they’re  used  to  fighting  back  very 
quickly  and  getting  up  on  their  feet  again.  They  need  assistance. 
That  is  for  certain.  They  need  that  bridge  to  get  them  going.  They 
are ready to rebuild their lives, they are ready to get back to work. 
They’re not looking for handouts, they do need assistance, but they 
need  the  help,  and  they  need  help  soon.  They’re  dying  down  there 
and there’s a world hurt. 

And  they’re  ready  to  help  rebuild  Louisiana.  So  there  is  a  sense 
of hope among them and it inspires me, and we just need your help 
and we appreciate you all coming down. Thank you very much. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Smith follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF EWELL SMITH, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

LOUISIANA SEAFOOD PROMOTION AND MARKETING BOARD 

I  am  Ewell  Smith  and  serve  as  Executive  Director  of  the  Louisiana  Seafood  Pro-
motion  and  Marketing  Board.  Representing  over  16,000  commercial  fishermen,  the 
Board markets the state’s commercial seafood products both to consumer and trade. 
Louisiana seafood industry primarily is made up of five different sectors: shrimp, 
oysters,  crawfish,  blue  crabs  and  finfish. *  Louisiana  is  second  only  to  Alaska  in 
total  seafood  landings,  while  we  lead  the  Nation  in  shrimp,  oysters  and  crawfish 
production.  Louisiana’s  seafood  industry  is  the  fuel  that  drives  the  restaurant  and 
tourism industries with over $2.8 billion in retail sales. 

Prior  to  Hurricanes  Katrina  and  Rita,  our  seafood  industry  was  struggling  with 

high fuel prices and imported products being dumped in our marketplace. 

Hurricanes  Katrina  and  Rita  have  impacted  our  industry  in  ways  unimaginable. 
Three  of  the  six  largest  docks  in  the  U.S.  by  landings  are  in  Louisiana:  Empire, 
Venice, and Cameron; the infrastructure in these areas is completely destroyed. 

As a whole, our fishing communities east of the Mississippi River are out of busi-
ness.  There  are  no  docks  to  land  the  product,  no  ice  houses,  no  fuel,  no  electricity, 
no  cold  storage,  no  marinas,  no  bait  and  tackle  shops,  no  communities  meaning  no 
welders, no mechanics, no deckhands and on. West of the Mississippi our shrimping 
industry lost its two largest shrimp docks. 

Seventy percent of the Wholesale/Retail Seafood Dealers licensed in Louisiana are 
based  in  the  parishes  impacted  by  Hurricanes  Katrina  and  Rita.  Our  oyster  indus-
try  is  at  40  percent.  The  crops  for  finfish,  shrimp,  and  crabs  are  strong;  however 
current  estimates  are  approximately  15  to  25  percent  of  our  fleet  across  the  state 
is  actually  fishing—over  3,000  commercial  vessels  are  on  land  where  they  don’t  be-
long. Even though the resource is strong, this may be a false positive. The marshes 
wash  away  during  the  hurricanes  releasing  nutrients  which  help  the  crops  flourish 
so  for  those  few  who  can  fish  now  are  doing  well;  but  next  year  will  be  uncertain 
for  100  square  miles  of  our  marshes  have  been  lost—areas  that  are  needed  for  our 
resources to grow. Between Katrina and Rita, we lost more marshland in less than 
a month than we were projected to lose over the next 45 years. 

We have also what I call the crisis on top of the crisis. More than likely you saw 
the  ‘‘dewatering  of  New  Orleans’’  on  TV,  and  the  press  labeled  our  waters  ‘‘Toxic 
Soup’’  killing  seafood  sales  across  the  board.  We  have  fought  this  battle  vigorously 
working  with  DHH,  DEQ,  LSU  Food  Science,  FDA,  and  NOAA  and  the  good  news 
is  there  are  no  toxins  in  the  water;  the  seafood  is  safe  to  consume.  However,  the 
damage  is  done;  we  will  fight  this  seafood  safety  challenge  for  the  foreseeable  fu-
ture. The double whammy for our industry is that wildlife and fisheries had already 
estimated  a  loss  of  over  $2.2  billion  in  retail  sales  just  from  of  the  damage  of  the 
hurricanes much less the perception challenge.JLW 

One  final  issue  our  industry  is  dealing  with  is  labor  shortages.  Existing  labor  is 
going to relief workers making $15 an hour cash or you may have heard that Burger 
King  was  paying  $8.50  an  hour  plus  a  $6,000  dollar  signing  bonus.  Processing 
plants  are  losing  the  workers  they  did  have  to  these  wages  and  can’t  find  other  to 
fill in. 

* Finfish: tuna, shark, mullet, black drum, menhaden, snappers, groupers, etc. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

put them to work clearing the waters of debris. 

funds to fishermen, seafood vessel owners, oyster farmers. 

houses, cold storage, marinas, bait and tackle shops, oyster reefs and on). 

So where do we begin? 
• The first issue is the fishermen! 
• Rebuild  fishing  communities!  Without  them  nothing  else  matters!!  Provide 
• Help  the  fishermen  get  their  boats  back  in  the  water  as  soon  as  possible  and 
• We need to rebuild the infrastructure as soon as possible (boats, docks, fuel, ice-
• We need to rebuild markets lost through marketing and promotions. 
• Rebuild our coastlines to save lives. 
In  closing  it  is  my  understanding  that  this  committee  will  be  taking  a  helicopter 
tour  today.  Seeing  the  damage  from  the  air  will  not  suffice  and  I  urge  you  to  land 
in  the  affected  areas  and  see  up  close  and  personal  the  devastation.  Once  you  see 
this devastation you will understand the funds requested outlined in the full written 
testimony are just enough to get the industry going on the path to recover. I would 
like to thank all of you for taking the time to understand our challenges and oppor-
tunities. 

Next  is  information  provided  by  the  Louisiana  Department  of  Wildlife  and  Fish-

The Louisiana Department of Wildlife and Fisheries estimates that storm -related 
fisheries  losses  at  the  retail  level  could  exceed  $2  billion  over  the  next  year.  The 
latest  estimates  combine  $981  million  in  production  losses  for  parishes  affected  by 
Hurricane  Rita  with  the  $1.29  billion  losses  projected  for  areas  damaged  by  Hurri-
cane  Katrina  for  a  total  of  $2.27  billion.  That  number  represents  80  percent  of  the 
total  commercial  and  recreational  retail  harvest  values  in  2003,  based  on  sales  lev-
els of $2.85 billion. 

eries. 

Summary: Preliminary Louisiana fishery losses caused by 

Hurricanes Katrina and Rita (10/12/2005) 

Hurricane Katrina affected Orleans, Jefferson, St. Bernard, Plaquemines, St. Tammany, Tangipahoa, Livingston, Ascension, St. 

James, St. John the Baptist, St. Charles, and  1⁄2 of Lafourche parishes. 

Hurricane Rita affected  1⁄2 of Lafourche, Terrebonne St. Martin (for 6 month each), Assumption, Iberville, Point Coupee, St. 
Landry,  Acadia,  Avoyelles,  St.  Mary,  Iberia,  Jefferson  Davis,  Vermilion,  Calcasieu,  and  Cameron  (for  12  months  each)  par-
ishes. 

Category 

Potential direct loss 
of available resource 
(Hurricane Katrina) 

Potential direct loss 
of available resource 

(Hurricane Rita) 

Potential direct loss 
of available resource 

(Total) 

Crab 
Freshwater Fish 
Oysters* 
Saltwater Fish** 
Shrimp 
Wild Crawfish 
Recreational Fisheries 
Freshwater Fish Loss 

$ 206,811,000 

N/A 
N/A 

N/A 
N/A 
N/A 
N/A 
N/A 

N/A 
N/A 

N/A 
N/A 
N/A 
N/A 

N/A 
N/A 

N/A 
N/A 
N/A 
N/A 

$25,103,235 

$231,914,235 

$ 7,323,128 

$7,323,128 

Total 

$206,811,000 

$32,426,363 

$239,237,363 

Category 

Crab 
Freshwater Fish 
Oysters* 
Saltwater Fish** 
Shrimp 
Wild Crawfish 
Recreational Fisheries 
Freshwater Fish Loss 

Potential production 

loss at dockside 

(Hurricane Katrina) 

$12,297,617 

$189,019 

$ 44,577,072 
$ 25,887,471 
$81,054,864 

N/A 
N/A 
N/A 

Potential production 

loss at dockside 
(Hurricane Rita) 

$10,264,261 
$2,859,492 
$12,374,438 
$ 27,428,103 
$57,198,057 
$4,166,514 

N/A 
N/A 

Potential production 

loss at dockside 

(Total) 

$22,561,878 
$3,048,511 
$56,951,510 
$53,315,574 
$138,252,921 
$4,166,514 

0 
0 

Total 

$164,006,043 

$114,290,865 

$278,296,908 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

Category 

Potential production 
losses at retail level 
(Hurricane Katrina) 

Potential production 
losses at retail level 

(Hurricane Rita) 

Total potential 

production losses at 

retail level 

Crab 
Freshwater Fish 
Oysters* 
Saltwater Fish** 
Shrimp 
Wild Crawfish 
Recreational Fisheries 
Freshwater Fish Loss 

$81,776,427 
$1,256,934 

$296,427,648* 
$172,145,944** 
$538,996,879 

N/A 

$199,517,744 

N/A 

$68,255,059 
$19,014,988 
$82,287,284 
$182,390,804 
$380,354,398 
$27,706,395 
$221,383,678 

N/A 

$150,031,486 
$20,271,922 
$378,714,932 
$354,536,748 
$919,351,277 
$33,691,720 
$420,901,422 

N/A 

Total 

$1,290,121,576 

$981,392,606 

$2,271,514,182 

* Oyster losses are for two (2) years. 
** Includes Gulf Menhaden. 

Rationale and Recovery Implementation Summary 

S. 1765 FEDERAL APPROPRIATION REQUEST 

Fisheries  Disaster  Assistance—Hurricane  Katrina:  $134  million;  Hurricane  Rita: 

$114 million. 

This  request  is  based  upon  the  estimated  production  loss  in  terms  of  dockside 
value  for  crabs,  shrimp  and  saltwater  fish  excluding  menhaden  for  a  twelve  month 
period  and  oyster  production  over  a  twenty-four-month  period.  This  estimate  uses 
LDWF trip ticket landings and value data averaged over the past five years (2000– 
2004) from the impacted parishes. In consideration of the damages and loss of infra-
structure  supporting  these  fisheries,  we  have  estimated  a  minimum  of  one  year  for 
most coastal areas before significant harvest resumes. 

Since 1999, the LDWF has maintained trip ticket report records which in addition 
to  dealer  and  fisherman  names  and  license  numbers,  transaction  date,  area  fished, 
trip  length,  etc.,  capture  information  on  the  species,  amount  and  value  of  seafood 
products landed and sold to wholesale/retail seafood dealers and retailed to the pub-
lic by individual fishermen. With the support of the Louisiana shrimp industry, the 
LDWF has successfully used its trip ticket data to identify and qualify shrimp fish-
ers  for  direct  financial  assistance  payments  under  U.S.  Department  of  Commerce 
NOAA Grant NA03NMF4520310, administered by the LDWF. Trip ticket data could 
be again used to identify eligible fishers and vessel owners for potential distribution 
of replacement dockside values. 

Under  direct  lump-sum  grants,  the  LDWF  could  use  trip  ticket  data  to  form  the 
basis of identifying and certifying Louisiana harvesters and vessel owners qualified 
to  receive  potential  direct  grants.  The  database  could  be  used  to  partition  these 
grants  into  tiers  or  levels  linked  to  reported  individual  landings  histories.  Grants 
to  harvesters  and  vessel  owners  could  be  used  as  direct  assistance  for  personal 
needs  or  to  repair  and/or  replace  damaged  vessels,  fishing  and  navigational  equip-
ment. 

Menhaden Fisheries Recovery—Hurricane Katrina: $14 million; Hurricane Rita: no 

separate request for menhaden. 

This  request  represents  30  percent  of  the  average  annual  dockside  value  of  the 
Gulf  menhaden  landings  over  the  last  5  years.  A  menhaden  plant  in  Plaquemines 
Parish  was  severely  impacted  by  Hurricane  Katrina.  They  report  that  they  land 
about 30 percent of the total Gulf menhaden landings. Using information from a re-
cent  LDWF  economic  impact  study,  they  estimate  that  their  total  economic  benefit 
to Louisiana is $155 million, with $116 million in retail sales, $25 million in wages 
and earnings, $17 million in total landings. The plant was flooded with several feet 
of water, and the fleet of 11 boats was beached. Based on a report published by the 
company, they employ approximately 270 personnel, mainly in Plaquemines Parish. 
Funding could be applied toward uninsured losses of the facility, vessels or fishing 
equipment.  It  could  also  be  used  to  support  personnel  and  infrastructure  needs 
while harvest vessels boats and processing plant were refurbished. 

Fisheries  Infrastructure  Recovery—Hurricane  Katrina:  $154  million;  Hurricane 

Rita: $114 million 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

This  request  is  based  on  the  average  annual  (2000–2004)  dockside  value  of  all 
commercial  species  harvested  within  the  affected  parishes  and  the  estimated  costs 
to replace boat launching facilities in these areas. The infrastructure within the im-
pacted  area  appears  to  have  been  totally  destroyed.  We  estimate  that  there  will  at 
minimum be a need for investing at least one year of dockside value into rebuilding 
at  least  some  infrastructure  components.  Infrastructure  losses  include  lost  or  dam-
aged vessels, docks, ice plants and processing facilities but also include cold storage 
facilities,  boat  ramps,  launches,  marinas,  bait  and  tackle  shops.  Seventy  percent  of 
the  Wholesale/Retail  Seafood  Dealers  licensed  in  Louisiana  are  based  in  the  par-
ishes  impacted  by  Hurricanes  Katrina  and  Rita,  as  are  79  percent  of  the  licensed 
commercial fishers. 

Funding could be used by NOAA to fund grants that help local governments who 
own ramp facilities restore them. In the same way, monies may also be used to help 
local  governments  and  private  interests  provide  emergency  services  to  set  up  tem-
porary  dock  facilities  including  fuel  and  ice  docks,  unloading  facilities,  and  fishing 
equipment  and  supply  stores  which  will  enable  local  fishers  to  begin  landing  their 
catches as soon as they are able to fish again. 

The  Department  maintains  a  directory  of  Louisiana  licensed  charter  vessels  used 
to conduct dockside and telephone interviews and develop estimates of fishing effort 
and recreational harvest from that sector. The granting process would use the data 
in the directory to identify vessel owners/operators who would be potentially eligible 
to receive direct grants for losses of vessels and other facilities. Other facilities could 
include  live  bait  holding  tanks,  land-based  or  houseboat  overnight  accommodations 
for clients and possibly other land-based infrastructure necessary for the rehabilita-
tion of the charter industry in the affected parishes. 

Louisiana  Oyster  Recovery—Hurricane  Katrina:  $94.25  million;  Hurricane  Rita: 

$10 million 

The reef rehabilitation request was derived from estimates of the value of lost reef 
habitat  using  pre-storm  and  post-storm  surveys  of  oyster  mortality  and  the  benefit 
to  costs  ratios  of  past  rehabilitation  projects  using  Federal  grant  funding  in  re-
sponse  to  past  hurricanes  by  combining  estimates  of  oyster  reef  acreage  from  both 
the public oyster seed grounds and private oyster leases. 

The LDWF would utilize rehabilitation funding to enhance oyster habitat by con-
tracting  and  planting  cultch  material  such  as  limestone,  recycled  oyster  shell,  or 
crushed  concrete  over  suitable  supporting  bottom  substrates  within  the  impacted 
public seed grounds. Based upon the percentage difference between impacted oyster 
reefs on the public seed grounds and private oyster leases, approximately $29.5 mil-
lion of the $104.25 million requested for reef rehabilitation would fund rehab efforts 
on the public seed grounds with $66.2 million used to fund rehab efforts on private 
leases. Using Federal grant funding, the LDWF has completed a number of projects 
such as these and all have proven to be highly successful with benefit to cost ratios 
ranging  as  high  as16:1,  but  averaging  around  10:1.  The  value  of  lost  reef  habitat 
was  estimated  at  nearly  $960  million  following  Hurricane  Katrina.  With  a  benefit- 
cost ratio of 10:1, it is estimated to take a 10 percent rehabilitation effort to replace 
the  value  of  the  lost  habitat.  Therefore,  the  $96  million  used  to  rehabilitate  reef 
habitat  on  both  public  grounds  and  private  leases  is  anticipated  to  yield  a  future 
return  of  the  $960  million  worth  of  reef  habitat  lost  to  the  storm.  Private  oyster 
lease  holders  could  employ  similar  habitat  enhancement  efforts  but  may  choose  to 
use funding to cleanse their reefs by towing sediment removal devices such as bag- 
less oyster dredges over them. Federal funds were used following Hurricane Andrew 
to compensate oyster lease holders for expenses associated with cleansing their own 
oyster  leases.  Funding  would  also  be  used  to  resurvey  and  mark  all  oyster  leases 
within  the  impacted  area.  In  addition,  funds  would  be  used  to  replace  an  existing 
oyster hatchery which was located on Grand Isle and totally destroyed by Hurricane 
Katrina and to repair, replace and modernize LDWF oyster lease survey equipment 
and facilities, allowing more efficient services to this user group. 

Louisiana  Marine  Research  Recovery—Hurricane  Katrina:  $14  million;  Hurricane 

Rita: $0.4 million 

The Marine Fisheries Division suffered losses or damage at most of its coastal fa-

cilities: 

force winds. The structure, boats, and equipment were destroyed. 

• The Slidell field facility was totally destroyed as it was in the path of hurricane 
• The New Orleans leased office is located in the Central Business District, near 
the  interstate.  The  offices  were  not  flooded  beyond  the  first  floor,  however, 
floors  above  that  lacked  power  for  a  month  and  records,  equipment,  and  office 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

equipment were damaged by heat, humidity, and mold and the building still re-
mained closed as of November 7th. 

• The field facility at Pointe a la Hache was totally destroyed, as were the vessels 

and equipment stored there. 

• Most buildings at the Marine Laboratory on Grand Terre Island were destroyed. 
• The  field  facility  at  Sister  Lake,  a  designated  public  oyster  seed  ground  was 

damaged by Hurricane Rita. 

Monies  appropriated  would  be  used  to  replace  and  repair  these  coastal  facilities. 
All  of  Louisiana’s  fisheries  require  intensive  monitoring  and  assessment  to  ensure 
that management programs and practices are effective in ensuring recovery. 

Seafood Marketing—$35 million 
As  a  result  of  extensive  media  coverage  of  the  aftermath  of  the  flooding  of  New 
Orleans following Hurricane Katrina, public perception about the wholesome nature 
of seafood from the affected areas has been damaged. Although no additional fishery 
closures beyond the precautionary closure of oyster growing areas have been imple-
mented, and although ongoing tissue assays of fish and crustaceans taken from area 
waters  have  shown  no  levels  of  concern  for  potential  contaminants;  local,  regional 
and  national  markets  for  Louisiana  seafood  have  been  severely  impacted  by  both 
product availability and public perceptions concerning seafood safety. These monies 
would be spent on promotional and marketing campaigns aimed at recapturing lost 
and  developing  new  markets,  enhancing  quality  assurance  and  certification  stand-
ards  and  assuring  national  confidence  in  the  continued  safety  of  Louisiana  seafood. 
Louisiana License Renewal—Hurricane Katrina: $14 million; Hurricane Rita: $2.5 

million 

This  request  is  based  upon  the  costs  of  recreational  and  commercial  fishing  li-
censes purchased within the impacted area for a two-year period, oyster lease rental 
fees  over  a  two-year  period  and  oyster  lease  renewal  fees  over  the  full  renewal  pe-
riod.  One  way  for  the  state  to  keep  the  public  engaged  in  fishing,  both  commercial 
and  recreational,  is  to  forgive  fees  for  licenses  for  two  years.  Seventy-nine  percent 
of  commercial  fishing  licenses  were  issued  in  the  parishes  impacted  by  Hurricanes 
Katrina and Rita. In addition, about 369,500 recreational licenses were sold in those 
parishes, and all of the state’s privately held oyster leases are also located in those 
impacted  parishes.  This  appropriation  would  provide  licenses  and  leases  to  affected 
fishers  and  lessees  for  two  years.  The  state  has  approximately  400,000  acres  of 
water  bottoms  under  private  lease  for  oyster  cultivation.  The  monies  would  cover 
the  annual  lease  rental  for  2  years  and  associated  costs  of  oyster  lease  renewals. 

Fisheries Habitat—Hurricane Katrina: $5 million; Hurricane Rita: $5 million 
Nursery habitats include coastal wetlands, grass beds and beach foreshores. Mon-
ies  could  be  expended  as  grants  to  survey,  assess  damage,  and  rehabilitate  these 
habitats  in  the  affected  areas.  Addition  of  hard  structures  may  provide  important 
habitat  for  some  species.  Additional  funds  could  be  used  to  coordinate  Department 
priorities  for  fish  and  wildlife  resources  with  other  State  and  Federal  priorities  re-
garding coastal restoration such as flood protection and navigation. 
Subtitle L—Department of the Interior. 

Freshwater  Fisheries  Recovery—Hurricane  Katrina:  $2  million;  Hurricane  Rita: 

$5.3 million 

Numerous  freshwater  water  bodies  in  southeast  Louisiana  experienced  fish  kills 
due  to  saltwater  intrusion  and  poor  water  quality.  Additionally,  most  of  the  water 
bodies  designated  as  Gulf  Sturgeon  (a  federally-listed  fish)  critical  habitat  in  Lou-
isiana  were  significantly  impacted  by  Hurricane  Katrina.  The  Mermentau  River, 
prime  paddlefish  habitat,  also  experienced  fish  kills  following  Hurricane  Rita.  An-
other species of fish, the Rio Grand Cichlid, is an exotic, invasive species of fish that 
can replace native fish. Although its range was slightly expanding each year, it was 
limited to only several water bodies. Katrina may have further expanded the range 
of this fish. The Department’s fish hatcheries near Lacombe, Woodworth, and facili-
ties near Beechwood were damaged by the hurricane and the fish in the ponds were 
lost.  Hurricane  Rita  spread  common  Salvinia  and  possibly  giant  Salvinia  to  areas 
throughout coastal Louisiana. Additional spray efforts with relative expensive herbi-
cides will be made in an effort to control it. Boating access has been greatly reduced 
in  the  impacted  areas  due  to  downed  trees,  residential  debris  and  the  spread  of 
aquatic vegetation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

The  Department  proposes  designing  and  implementing  monitoring  programs  to 
determine  the  impact  to  freshwater  fish,  including  Gulf  Sturgeon,  paddlefish,  and 
the spread of Rio Grand Cichlids. Results from these studies will assist the Depart-
ment in determining what management options may be necessary. Options may in-
clude  habitat  modifications,  fish  stocking,  fish  eradication  (for  exotic  species)  and 
management regulations. Boating access in rivers will be improved by removing fall-
en trees and other debris. We will expand our spraying activities in impacted areas 
to reduce nuisance aquatic vegetation. 
USGS  Reports  Preliminary  Wetland  Loss  Estimates  for  Southeastern 

Louisiana From Hurricanes Katrina and Rita 

Hurricanes Katrina and Rita transformed some 100 square miles of marsh to open 
water  in  southeastern  Louisiana,  according  to  preliminary  estimates  by  U.S.  Geo-
logical  Survey  (USGS)  based  on  an  analysis  of  Landsat  satellite  data  from  Sep-
tember and October. 

Future  observations  of  Landsat  imagery  over  the  upcoming  year  will  allow  sci-
entists  at  the  USGS  National  Wetlands  Research  Center  (NWRC)  in  Baton  Rouge 
and Lafayette, Louisiana, to determine how much of the loss is permanent and how 
the  marsh  recovers.  Although  this  early  analysis  of  wetlands  does  not  take  into  ac-
count  some  marsh  recovery,  indications  are  that  much  of  the  loss  may  be  perma-
nent. Some of the new areas of open water will likely become new lakes. 

Most of the loss east of the Mississippi River is attributed to the effects of Hurri-
cane  Katrina’s  storm  surge,  although  Hurricane  Rita’s  surge  appears  to  have  rear-
ranged some of the wrack, or marsh debris, left behind by Hurricane Katrina in the 
upper Breton Sound area. 

Substantial  marsh  loss,  primarily  from  Katrina,  occurred  east  of  the  Mississippi 
River  in  St.  Bernard  and  Plaquemines  parishes.  Approximately  39  square  miles  of 
marsh  around  the  upper  and  central  portions  of  Breton  Sound  were  converted  to 
open  water  by  ripping  of  the  marsh  or  by  marsh  submergence.  Large  compressed 
marsh features several thousand feet long are evident in Breton Sound. Most of the 
loss was concentrated in an area bounded by the Mississippi River levee to the west, 
the Delacroix Ridge to the east, and State Highway 300 to the north. Follow-up im-
agery  and  aerial  photography  will  be  used  to  determine  if  some  of  the  submerged 
marshes reemerge over time. 

An  additional  47  square  miles  of  marsh  were  lost  throughout  the  Pontchartrain, 
Pearl River, Barataria, and Terrebonne basins. The active Mississippi Delta also in-
curred approximately 14 square miles of loss. The lower Pearl River basin contains 
numerous marsh rips south of Highway 90. 

Direct impacts from Hurricane Rita were not as severe as Hurricane Katrina’s im-
pacts  in  southeastern  Louisiana.  For  example,  rips  in  marshes  from  Rita  were  not 
nearly  the  size  of  rips  from  Katrina  in  upper  Breton  Sound  although  they  are  no-
ticeable  in  the  Barataria  and  Terrebonne  basins.  Rita’s  surge  caused  new  tears  in 
fresh  and  intermediate  marshes  within  Barataria  and  Terrebonne  basins  and  reac-
tivated  older  hurricane  scars  attributable  to  Hurricane  Lili  (2002)  in  western 
Terrebonne and the East Cote Blanche Bay area. 

Rita’s  surge  caused  detectable  marsh  loss  west  of  the  Mississippi  River  to  the 
Texas border that could not be attributable to Katrina based on analysis of satellite 
imagery obtained a week after Katrina’s landfall, but prior to Rita’s landfall. 

Now  that  the  compounded  effects  of  the  storms  on  Southeastern  Louisiana  have 
been  analyzed,  NWRC  scientists  are  analyzing  Landsat  imagery  to  quantify  Rita’s 
impacts in southwestern Louisiana. 

To  perform  satellite  analysis,  USGS  scientists  in  Louisiana  used  remote  sensing 
technologies  and  geographic  information  systems.  They  compared  land  and  water 
areas  identified  by  using  Landsat  5  Thematic  Mapper  satellite  imagery.  Landsat 
data  from  November  11,  2004  were  compared  to  data  acquired  on  September  7, 
2005, September 16, 2005, October 9, 2005, October 18, 2005, and October 25, 2005 
to identify potential wetland loss. 

The imagery was collected by the USGS National Center for Earth Resources Ob-

servation and Science in Sioux Falls, South Dakota. 

The  USGS  serves  the  Nation  by  providing  reliable  scientific  information  to  de-
scribe  and  understand  the  Earth;  minimize  loss  of  life  and  property  from  natural 
disasters; manage water, biological, energy, and mineral resources; and enhance and 
protect our quality of life. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much. You know your group has 
probably the most independent people, individually owned boats in 
you  know  really,  it’s  a  different  part  of  the  economy.  We’re  ex-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

tremely  interested  in  trying  to  help  you  restore  that  fishing  com-
munity.  And  we’ll  be  very  much  open  to  suggestion  about  how  to 
have  some  sort  of  a  conference  with  NOAA  and  your  state  people 
and  your  business  associations  and  your  Senators,  but  I  think 
we’ve got some ideas up our way about how to help fishermen, and 
we’ve  used  them  in  the  past.  We’d  like  to—really  like  to  explore 
that,  because  this  is  going  to  be  the  toughest  area.  The  rest  of  the 
people have more infrastructure to support them to start with, but 
fishermen by definition are solo operations and—but they all collec-
tively  come  back  to  your  ports,  and  this  is  a  tremendous  problem 
here in terms of how to make sure those fisheries can—the species 
themselves  can  be  restored  after  the  damage  that’s  has  been  re-
ported to us. 

So  I  want  to  urge  you  to  contact  our  people,  and  let’s  see  if  we 
can  get  some  meetings  here  before  we  close  down  this  year,  make 
sure we understand where there are any gaps in existing law that 
would prevent us from helping your area. 

As  I  said  all  your  statements  will  appear  in  the  record.  I’m  at 
a loss on one thing. Mr. Falgout, what’s the income stream to your 
area from all the products that are coming down and leave through 
your port. 

Mr.  FALGOUT.  The  income  stream  directly  through  our  port, 

The CHAIRMAN. You and Mr. LaGrange both point out how much 
comes  down  through  mid-continent  and  comes  through  and  leaves 
through  your  port  here.  Your  ports,  more  than  one  port.  But  to 
what  extent?  Is  there  any  income  stream  there  that  comes  to  you 
now? 

Mr.  FALGOUT.  Business  coming  through  coastal  Louisiana  is  a 

or—— 

$100 billion business, and am I answering you? 

The CHAIRMAN. That’s products coming in, I understand that. 
Senator  VITTER.  I  think  what  the  Senator  is  saying,  if  we  don’t 
get  any  significant  cut  of  royalties,  then  what  if  any  income  do  we 
get from that activity? 

Mr.  FALGOUT.  On  shore  and  out  the  three  miles,  of  course  the 
state gets a share, but offshore of that, outside of six miles, we get 
zero.  We  do  not  receive  any  of  the  offshore  revenue  sharing.  Prior 
to  the  last  5  years,  it  was  not  that  significant  because  most—the 
state was producing considerable amount of oil and gas on its own 
lands  offshore.  And  the  deep  water  Gulf  of  Mexico  has  not  yet  de-
veloped.  But  now  the  shift  has  gone  to  deep  water  Gulf  of  Mexico. 
The overwhelming majority of production now is coming from Fed-
eral  OCS  lands,  the  state  is  carrying  the  burden  of  infrastructure 
and  supporting  that  without  any  revenues  coming  back  from  that. 
And  the  state  revenues  have  dwindled  because  the  production  is 
now in deep water. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  You  may  be  interested  to  know  that  twice  the 
Senate passed a bill to give coastal communities a revenue sharing. 
And  twice  the  House  has  refused  to  pass  it.  We’re  still  trying  to 
work  with  your  Senators  and  Congressional  Delegation  again,  but 
the  difficulty  is,  had  we  passed  those  bills,  they  were  back  in  the 
1970s and 1980s, all of the wells that have been drilled since then 
you would have had a revenue base from. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

Mr.  FALGOUT.  Had  you  passed  that,  we’d  have  golden  highway 
down  to  Port  Fourchon,  because  we’d  be  sharing  in  about  $2.5  bil-
lion a year in revenues from that, and we would have built the lev-
ies ourselves and more than likely restored Coastal Louisiana. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  But  we  have  the  same  problem.  There  are  nine 
villages  that  were  destroyed  in  October  of  2004,  they’re  still  wait-
ing  for  even  Environmental  Impact  Statements  to  be  completed  on 
how to help them. Because we don’t have the revenue share coming 
back  from  the  activities  either,  so  we  share  your  point  of  view  on 
that. 

I do think though that the question now is how we look to some 
of these structures. It’s been mentioned about the money that went 
to  New  York,  the  Liberty  Bonds  were  a  product  of  the  state  and 
City  of  New  York,  not  the  Federal  Government.  The  Federal  Gov-
ernment  made  a  $10  billion  grant  to  the  whole  area,  and  turned 
over  $10  billion  to  the  National  Administration  to  help.  But  as  a 
practical matter, the Liberty Bonds as I understand were a product 
of  the  monies  that  were  granted  to  the  City  and  the  State  of  New 
York to recover from that incident. 

We may have to look to a similar process here, to determine pri-
orities  as  to  where  money  goes  after  we  do  get  the  support  to  get 
additional monies to come your way. 

Senator Vitter. 
Senator  VITTER.  First,  just  a  comment,  I  want  to  point  out.  I 
want  to  thank  Mr.  Smith  from  the  Louisiana  Seafood  Promotion 
and  Marketing  Board.  He  helps  represent  the  commercial  fishing 
industry.  In  addition,  there’s  a  very  important,  very  vibrant  rec-
reational  fishing  industry.  And  certainly  in  future  hearings  and 
meetings,  particularly  as  we  lead  up  to  the  reauthorization  of  the 
Magnuson-Stevens  bill,  we’re  going  to  include  the  CCA  and  other 
recreational fishing groups as well as the commercial side. 

So,  I  just  wanted  to  point  that  out.  In  terms  of  this  discussion 
of revenue sharing from offshore production, I would also note that 
this  not  a  one-way  street  in  terms  of  it  representing  Federal  loss, 
but  revenue  loss  to  the  Feds,  this  could  avoid  a  lot  of  what  would 
otherwise  be  an  up-front  payment  directly  from  the  Feds  in  terms 
of  investment  in  both  hurricane  and  flood  protection,  and  coastal 
restoration. 

So,  if  we  had  a  fair  long-term  revenue  share,  this  would  avoid 
a  significant  amount  of  up-front  costs  from  the  Feds  in  terms  of 
those projects. So, it would be a very significant and in some ways 
attractive  tradeoff  for  the  Feds  as  well  particularly,  now  that  we 
have  this  obvious  need.  And  with  that,  Mark  Drennen  was  real 
good  at  identifying  top  four  or  so  things  to  do.  I’d  like  to  ask  each 
of you if you would identify, three top priority actions for Congress 
to take. 

Mr.  FALGOUT.  In  general,  of  course  the  restoration  of  our  levee 
system, upgraded to a category 5 is paramount. And you know how 
to fund all that. As you just said, if we could share close to 50 per-
cent  as  state’s  inland  share  with  the  Federal  Government  on  Fed-
eral lands, on mineral production, we could get there. The wetland 
restoration, we have to attain a sustainable coast, it will not be the 
coast  you  saw  before  Katrina,  it  won’t  be  the  coast  you  saw  after 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

Katrina  and  Rita,  but  at  some  level  we  can  sustain  coastal  Lou-
isiana. 

Third, outside of that there will be some areas south such as Port 
Fourchon,  such  as  Venice,  such  as  areas  in  St.  Bernard  that  can 
sustain themselves. There are sediments available and the interior 
area  between  that  site  and  the  mainland  is  not  sustainable,  and 
you’re  going  to  have  to  have  support  infrastructure  that  connects 
you  to  the  mainland,  whether  that  be  an  elevated  highway,  a 
bridge  for  instance,  that  will  allow  these  areas  to  continue  to 
produce  the  Nation’s  energy.  You  cannot  move  that  infrastructure 
farther  inland,  because  you’ll  be  moving  200  large  vessels  a  day, 
you’ll be moving thousands of people inland each day, causing huge 
amounts  of  energy  usage  and  environmental  impact,  instead  of 
having  them  on  the  best  place  as  they  should  be  on  the  coast,  but 
you’re  going  to  have  to  build  a  bridge  to  get  there  unfortunately. 
Mr. LAGRANGE. Well, I would hate to be redundant, but Ted’s ab-
solutely correct, category 5 level protection first and foremost. And 
I lump coastal restoration in with that because the two are directly 
related. Second, is infrastructure rehabilitation and relocation. And 
I’m  thinking  specifically  in  terms  of  the  Port  of  New  Orleans,  in 
that  30  percent  part  of  the  infrastructure  that  we  totally  lost. 
That’s an absolute must. And we can’t do that fast enough if we’re 
going  to  maintain  the  competitive  rates  that  we  have  on  an  inter-
national  trade  level,  with  the  importation  and  the  exportation  of 
products that we were alluding to. 

And the third one, thank you. You’re already doing it quite nice-
ly,  and  that’s  a  navigation  maintenance  through  the  Army  Corps 
of Engineers, we appreciate that. 

Senator  VITTER.  And  Ewell,  from  the  seafood  perspective,  what 

are the top three tasks? 

Mr.  SMITH.  I  asked  that  same  question  to  our  fishermen  and 
processors  when  he  had  them  on  this  tour  this  past  Friday.  And 
the first thing is to get the help to the fishermen. 

Second,  is  to  get  the  infrastructure  up  and  going.  And  I’m  being 
redundant  as  well.  And  third,  is  to  have  the  funds  to  market  and 
promote  our  product  so  we  can  get  our  market  share  back  and 
these guys get their lives back in order. 

The CHAIRMAN. I got severely criticized for such a fund for Alas-
ka,  but  it  has  worked  out,  and  it  has  increased  the  market  share 
for  Alaska  products,  and  I  think  you’re  right.  It’s  one  thing  to  get 
the business going, but you have to recover this market share now 
with  aggressive  action  of  those  foreign  nations  that  are  producing 
particularly the farm-raised fish. It’s very difficult to compete with 
them  to  begin  with.  But  we  have  to  get  the  American  product  out 
there and emphasize what it means. 

We’ve  utilized  the  activities  of  Dr.  Wile,  the  nutritionist,  trying 
to  keep  people  informed,  really  a  quality  concept  of  American  fish 
as  opposed  to  farm-raised  foreign  fish.  But  we’ll  work  with  you  on 
that too. I look forward to that. 

Anything further, Senator Thomas? 
Senator THOMAS. Very briefly. 
The CHAIRMAN. He doesn’t have much fishing in his area. 
Senator  THOMAS.  I  was  going  to  say,  we  need  to  get  our  share 
of  that  fish  promotion  in  Wyoming.  Oysters  particularly,  we  need. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

I  was  going  to  ask  Mr.  Falgout,  do  you  ever  talk  about  the—we 
hear a lot about the over concentration of energy facilities, particu-
larly  refining  here.  Does  that  ever  occur,  that  maybe  there’s  some 
reason  not  to  continue  to  have  such  a  concentration  of  refining  in 
a territory that’s subject to this sort of storm. 

Mr.  FALGOUT.  Well,  the  last  time  I  checked,  there  was  nobody 
waiting to take Louisiana’s role in the oil and gas business. Florida 
and  California  would  be  the  most  likely  candidates  and  have  pro-
duction off their coasts, certainly—— 

Senator THOMAS. I’m not talking about production. I understand 
that. But I must tell you there is a good deal of talk about offshore 
production  now  in  the  Atlantic  Coast.  Not  Florida,  but  the  others. 
But  you  can  move  products  you  know,  you  don’t  have  to  refine 

them right on the coast. 
Mr. FALGOUT. Correct. 
Senator THOMAS. They have pipelines they’re called. 
Mr.  FALGOUT.  And  specifically,  my  comments  on  Port  Fourchon. 
Port Fourchon has no refinery, and that should not be on the Gulf 
of  Mexico,  those  should  be  protected  farther  inland,  and  certainly 
we  ought  to  look  at  moving  our  refining  capabilities  into  very  well 
protected  areas.  But  the  support  services  that  are  essential  for 
turning  on  the  oil  fields  after  a  hurricane,  for  the  daily  movement 
of  cargo  to  support  this  activity,  need  to  be  on  the  Gulf  of  Mexico. 
Senator THOMAS. Very quickly, because I know you talked about 
the  royalty  costs,  and  I  understand  and  that’s  a  big  issue.  But 
when  you  bring  oil  products  through  your  port,  if  there’s  a  cost  to 
you,  as  there  obviously  is,  why  doesn’t  that  product  pay  for  the 
cost? 

Mr.  FALGOUT.  I  don’t  know  if  I  follow  that  question.  But  I  mean 

we are unable to assess a tax. 

Senator  THOMAS.  I’m  not  talking  about  a  tax,  I’m  talking  about 
a  commercial  charge.  If  you’re  going  to  handle  a  product,  all  these 
ships  and  all  that  sort  of  stuff,  why  isn’t  there  just  a  charge  then 
to support your port? 

Mr.  FALGOUT.  Of  course  the  port  does  charge,  it  does  very  well, 
OK.  But  when  you’re  talking  about  moving  much  of  the  product 
through  this  coast  by  pipeline,  we  are  not  able  to  charge  a  tax  on 
the  commodities  coming  in  by  pipeline.  And  we  don’t  specifically 
need that amount of money. 

Senator THOMAS. No, you don’t. 
Mr.  FALGOUT.  It  needs  to  be—go  to  the  State  of  Louisiana  to 

make those improvements. 

Senator THOMAS. And I think you have to keep in mind at some 
point  there  is  a  limit  to  how  far  the  jurisdiction  goes  out  in  the 
ocean are you going to be out a 150 miles, I don’t think so. 

So  you’re  going  to  have  to  be  a  little  careful  about  how  far  you 

go, you already can go out six miles. 

Mr.  FALGOUT.  No,  we  only  are  allowed  three  miles  in  Louisiana, 

and we share out to six miles a lesser percentage than—— 

Senator  THOMAS.  No,  I  understand,  but  it’s  not  just  a  clear  cut 
issue I’m afraid, and it needs to be talked about, the royalty thing. 
Mr. LaGrange, just one final question. I misunderstood you. You 
were  talking  about  the  cost  to  your—the  cost  to  be  maintained  by 
your port. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

Mr. LAGRANGE. The $275 million figure? 
Senator THOMAS. Million, was it million? 
Mr. LAGRANGE. Million with an M, yes sir. It’s a little over a bil-

lion public and private. 

Senator  THOMAS.  I  thought  you  said  B,  and  I  was  a  little  sur-

prised. 

thority. 

Mr.  LAGRANGE.  No  sir,  it’s  $275  million  for  the  Public  Port  Au-

Senator THOMAS. I understand. Thank you, sir. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  I  don’t  want  to  belabor  it,  but  the  real  problem 
here  is  that  we’re  reaching  a  60  percent  importation  right  now  for 
foreign  oil.  That  oil  doesn’t  have  any  sharing  of  anything.  And  it 
comes  in,  and  the  price  is  set  by  foreign  producer.  And  we’ve  tried 
to  put  some  level  of  import  duty,  or  whatever  you  want  to  call  it 
on  it.  I  really  think  we  should.  But  it’s  been  very  difficult  to  do. 
Senator  THOMAS.  Mr.  Chairman,  I  wasn’t  talking  about  that.  I 
was  talking  about  the  cost  that  he’s  seeing  going  to  the  port,  and 
I’m saying those costs incurred can be charged commercially. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, that’s true. But here they’ve got one of the 
major  offshore  ports  for  imported  oil,  and  it’s  not  contributing  at 
all  to  the  economy.  But—and  that’s  a  national  problem  I  think.  I 
do think what we ought to put on table and start thinking about— 
and I think that’s where the Senator from Wyoming is going. We’re 
committed  to  do  everything  we  can  to  restore  this  area,  but  the 
problem  is—the  probabilities  of  another  Katrina  are  pretty  great. 
We  ought  to  start  thinking  about  establishing  funds  and  reserves 
so  that  you  don’t  really  have  to  have  you  know,  massive  change, 
and a loss to take care should it happen again, God forbid. 

But  you  know  there  is  a—when  I  was  in  the  State  Legislature 
I helped create a disaster fund after our 1964 earthquake, and that 
has been—we pay into that disaster fund on an annual basis. And 
it’s been used because of disaster that have come along. 

I  think  we  all  have  to  start  thinking  about  how  do  we  treat  dis-
asters,  and  where  do  we  get  the  revenue  flow  into  that  fund  that 
will  continue  to  build  and  be  available  for  disasters  nationally. 
There’s a serious problem here about that, as far as I’m concerned. 

Senator VITTER. Chairman, if I could—— 
The CHAIRMAN. Yes sir. 
Senator VITTER.—make just three other comments responding to 
some  of  the  discussions,  in  terms  of  refining  capacity,  which  Sen-
ator Thomas brought up. We have a desperate need in this country 
for additional refining capacity, but we need to do that, not to move 
the  capacity  out  of  here,  we  just  need  to  do  it,  to  add  capacity  to 
what we have nationally. Because we are topping out right now, in 
terms of refinery capacity, and reaching a real crisis level. 

So we really need to do both, we need to maintain and grow what 
we have here, but we need to grow it in addition anywhere we can, 
around  the  country.  And  I’m  afraid  we’ve  built  up  over  the  last  30 
years  a  regulatory  environment  that  makes  it  virtually  impossible 
to open a new refinery in this country. 

So  that’s  a  real  national  priority  that  I  think  we  share.  Second, 
in  terms  of  your  comment  about  a  disaster  fund,  I  agree  with  you 
completely.  In  terms  of  future  disasters  in  this  area  though,  the 
best fund and the best investment in my opinion is heightened cat-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

egory  5-type  protection.  Because  that’s  what’s  going  to  avoid  an-
other  $100  billion  event  in  the  future,  or  in  inflated  dollars,  who 
knows what it would be in 10 or 20 years, $200, $300 billion event. 
If we’re really going to be fiscally responsible about this, the first 
thing I hope we’re going to do is make sure that hit to the national 
economy  and  the  national  taxpayer  never  happens  again.  And 
when you talk about the investment needed to avoid that, it dwarfs 
the  loss  and  the  expense  of  having  another  one  of  these  over  $100 
billion events. 

The CHAIRMAN. Any other comments gentlemen? 
Very well. We do thank you all very much for your contribution, 
all  of  these  hearings  will  be  printed  and  will  be  available  to  the 
Members  of  the  Senate  and  the  public  obviously.  I  do  think  we’ve 
just  got  a  lot  of  questions  to  ask.  And,  again  as  I  opened,  I  would 
say  unfortunately  people  take  too  many  inferences  from  the  ques-
tions we ask. 

We’ll call the next panel after a 5-minute break. 
I see that Mayor Nagin is here. 
I’m  glad  to  give  you  a  seat  at  the  table  and  listen  to  your  com-

ments if you’d like to give them. 

Mr. Mayor, would you like to make comments on the record here 

Mr.  NAGIN.  I  will  do  whatever  the  Committee  would  like  me  to 

this morning? 

do. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  could  tell  a  joke  I  heard  once  but  it’s  not  the 

time for it. But this is professional courtesy Mr. Mayor. 

STATEMENT OF HON. C. RAY NAGIN, MAYOR, 

CITY OF NEW ORLEANS 

Mr.  NAGIN.  Well,  I  appreciate  that  members  of  this  committee 
and  you  know  it’s  a  pleasure  to  see  you  in  the  wonderful  city  of 
New  Orleans,  I  hope  that  you  are  getting  a  good  feel  for  some  of 
the challenges that we have in this wonderful city. 

I think when you come down and you see exactly what has hap-
pened,  and  our  opportunities,  I  think  it  gives  you  a  different  per-
spective. 

I’ve been on—in D.C. on a regular basis talking with many Mem-
bers of Congress, trying to make sure that we put our best foot for-
ward  in  getting  people  to  understand  exactly  the  need  to  rebuild 
New  Orleans.  I  know  there  is  a  lot  of  debate  going  on  right  now, 
about  whether  we  should  or  should  not  do  it.  There’s  no  doubt  in 
my  mind  we  should  rebuild  New  Orleans.  When  you  look  back  at 
the history of this country and you look at the incredible land deal 
that this country made to buy Louisiana, and at the center of that 
land deal was New Orleans, the access of the port. And it was one 
of the most incredible land deals that this country has ever under-
taken. 

As you look at how important New Orleans is to the country, you 
look at our oil and gas productions, I don’t think this country could 
do  without  that.  If  you  look  at  the  Port  of  New  Orleans,  that  has 
six  class  A  rail  lines.  I  don’t  think  the  country  could  do  without 
that.  And  you  also  look  at  what  New  Orleans  has  done  culturally 
for  this  country.  The  President  of  the  United  States  basically  said 
he couldn’t imagine America without New Orleans. We have a his-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

tory  of  great  music,  great  food,  great  fun,  but  in  the  middle  of  all 
that  you  have  people,  wonderful  American  people.  They’re  the  es-
sence of what this country is all about. We were a very diverse city, 
we  will  continue  to  be  a  very  diverse  city.  We  are  a  city  that  is 
going to come back, and if I could express any, the top three things 
that  I  think  that  we  need  to  come  back,  from  this  committee  and 
from  Congress.  We  need  comfort  and  verification  on  the  levee  sys-
tems.  We  need  to  know  the  city  of  New  Orleans,  the  residents  of 
New  Orleans  need  to  know  and  have  comfort  that  we’re  going  to 
rebuild the levee system to the category level, hopefully category 5, 
that will protect us from another Katrina. 

Second,  the  City  of  New  Orleans  is  cash  strapped  right  now,  we 
basically are without any incoming revenues, and we need support 
to  allow  us  to  continue  to  operate  over  the  next  6  to  12  months. 
And then finally, we need some unique incentives to attract both 
people and businesses back to this area. We don’t want to be a bur-
den  to  the  country’s  treasury,  but  we  do  think  the  country  should 
support us as we continue to rebuild. 

So,  I’m  happy  to  have  you  here,  I  hope  that  you  have  a  produc-
tive  meeting,  and  anything  I  can  do  to  help,  just  let  me  know. 
Thank you. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, thank you very much Mr. Mayor. We’ve ap-
preciated having Don Hutchinson, your Economic Development Ad-
visor  with  us  on  this  trip.  He’ll  continue  to  be  with  us,  so  I  appre-
ciate your stopping by. 

Mr. NAGIN. Thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Any questions, any gentlemen? We do thank you 
for  joining  us.  And  now  to  Mr.  Steve  Perry,  President  and  CEO, 
New Orleans Convention and Visitors Bureau. 

Mr. Perry. 

STATEMENT  OF  J.  STEPHEN  PERRY,  PRESIDENT/CEO,  NEW 
ORLEANS  METROPOLITAN  CONVENTION  AND  VISITORS 
BUREAU 
Mr. PERRY. Mr. Chairman, thank you very much. Senator Thom-
as,  Senator  Vitter.  We—I  am  here  representing  New  Orleans  larg-
est  industry.  We  are  by  far  the  largest  economic  sector  in  the  city 
of  New  Orleans  and  we  are  by  far  the  largest  employer.  Over 
85,000  people  in  a  city  of  less  than  500,000  people  work  in  our  in-
dustry. In fact, it’s often said that the New Orleans tourism indus-
try in Louisiana is third Fortune 500 Company. 

We are in arguably the most famous mid-sized city in the world. 
And  it  is  famous  because  of  its  tourism.  Because  of  those  things 
that  we’re  known  for  so  much  nationally  and  internationally,  nine 
Super  Bowls,  more  than  any  other  City,  more  Final  Fours,  the 
greatest  Jazz  and  Heritage  Festival  on  the  earth.  But  the  creator 
of  the  most  famous  indigenous  form  of  American  music,  jazz,  and 
of course, culinary arts. There’s no place like New Orleans. 

It’s  also  the  place  where  more  than  half  of  its  city  is  comprised 
of  an  historic  district.  And  that  means  something,  because  this  is 
a  place  truly  different.  And  it’s  a  place  that  has  been  preserved. 
But  we’ve  got  real  challenges  ahead  of  us.  And  what  we’re  here 
today  to  talk  to  you  about,  is  literally  the  economics  of  our  indus-
try. To give you a report on how that largest industry faired, what 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

our challenges are, and to offer you, we hope, some opportunity for 
investment,  that  are  far  smaller  than  many  of  the  numbers  that 
you’re hearing about, but they can in fact, help rebuild the Federal 
Treasury, the State Treasury and the economics of this city. 

I said we’re a $5 to $8 billion industry, that really only scratches 
the  surface.  Five  billion  dollars  of  visitor  spending  comes  in  here 
every  year.  It  fuels  the  jobs  of  85,000  people.  In  many  ways  we’re 
a  lot  like  the  fisheries  industry,  because  we’re  comprised  of  a  lot 
of  small  business  people.  And  those  small  business  people  are  in-
credibly damaged right now. What are the kinds of things that we 
need to get going you know, and you saw on television through the 
MSNBC  reports,  and  CNN,  you  saw  the  graphic  nature  of  the  im-
ages  here  in  the  two  weeks  after  the  storm.  That’s  had  a  powerful 
impact  on  our  market  share  in  American  tourism.  One  of  the  top 
four  markets  in  the  United  States,  we’re  sitting  right  in  the  heart 
of  New  Orleans,  in  the  French  Quarter,  yet  we  were  damaged  un-
believably  by  those  graphic  images,  and  we’re  going  to  need  mar-
keting help to rebuild. It is extremely hard for us to appear before 
committee  of  the  U.S.  Senate  or  any  other  governmental  entity, 
and  ask  for  dollars,  we  don’t  do  that.  We’re  private  sector  busi-
nesses,  we  have  flourished  for  many  years  and  built  tens  of  thou-
sands of jobs on our own. 

But we need a little bit of help right now, to get back going. And 
it’s not hundreds of billions of dollars that we need, it’s tens of mil-
lions  of  dollars.  We  are  very  appreciative  of  the  fact  that  Senator 
Vitter and Senator Landrieu have worked so hard on behalf of our 
industry.  Lieutenant  Governor  Landrieu  has  helped  bring  our 
whole  industry  together  over  the  last  few  weeks,  and  in  fact  we’re 
probably  the  most  organized  business  sector  in  the  State  of  Lou-
isiana  right  now,  and  have  been  since  two  weeks  after  the  storm. 
What is it that we need, and what help do we need to get back? 
We could literally bring with small amounts of investment over $5 
billion  back  into  the  economy  in  the  next  12  months.  The  Mayor 
has laid off over half his city’s workforce because we are the largest 
contributor  to  the  city’s  revenue  base  of  any  group  in  the  City  of 
New  Orleans.  The  same  is  true  for  the  State  of  Louisiana.  And 
frankly,  the  course  of  last  resort  for  us  would  have  been  the  U.S. 
Senate, and the U.S. Congress. It pains us to be here to talk about 
this  and  to  ask  you  for  help,  but  where  we  are  now,  is  we’ve  got 
tremendous  needs  in  the  areas  of  marketing.  Recapturing  market 
share for us, literally just over the next 24 months, will be critical 
to the repopulation of New Orleans, to the building back of tens of 
thousands  of  jobs  and  of  thousands  of  businesses.  Now,  how  does 
it  work  and  what  kind  of  money  are  we  talking  about?  The  little 
company  that  I  lead,  a  501(c)6  corporation,  the  New  Orleans  Con-
vention  and  Visitors  Bureau  is  a  non-profit  private  sector.  But  we 
are the official entity for the marketing, and the branding and the 
re-imaging  of  New  Orleans,  as  it  relates  to  the  business  side,  and 
corporate  meetings,  associations  and  our  general  tourism  market-
place. 

Right now, we have no other source to go to. Our funding is basi-
cally completely eliminated. The hotel tax has been destroyed here 
this fall, and our revenue base of all the small businesses that com-
prise us, has been decimated. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

What  does  it  take  to  rebuild  $5  billion?  For  us,  it’s  $10  million 
to help with a Convention and Visitor Bureau to go forward as the 
City  and  the  state’s  official  entity  which  works  nationally  with  as-
sociations, corporations, to bring meetings here. 

But  what  we  need  in  addition  to  that  is  $10  million  in  incen-
tive—in  convention  marketing,  and  convention  incentive  revolving 
fund  that  will  allow  us  to  take  some  of  the  concerns  out  from  our 
meeting customers. 

As  you  can  imagine  many  of  the  images  that  were  seen  around 
the United States here in September has had a real impact on our 
clients.  We’ve  had  a  lot  of  our  customers  who  have  said  you  know 
what, we’re ready to come back and come back right now. Many of 
the  major  Washington  Associations,  and  Chicago  Associations,  are 
already  telling  us  they  want  to  come  back,  but  many  of  them  are 
not  sure  they’re  ready  to  come  back  yet.  And  it  could  be  3  years 
from now, it could be 4 years from now, and if that’s the case, we’re 
going  to  lose  tens  of  thousands  of  jobs  that  will  make  the  repopu-
lation  of  New  Orleans,  and  the  regeneration  of  our  tax  base  ex-
tremely difficult. 

We need some marketing help now. And we have no other source 
to  go  to.  So  what  we’re  asking  is  that  $10  million  of  convention 
marketing, but $40 million of leisure side tourism marketing. This 
really  serves  multiple  purposes.  Not  only  would  it  bring  $5  billion 
of  visitor  spending  back,  but  it  will  recharge  the  tax  base  of  the 
City of New Orleans, and help the repopulation of this city, because 
it  will  bring  back  the  85,000  working  men  and  women  of  the  City 
of New Orleans. 

As  you  all  know,  people  have  real  challenges  to  come  here.  And 
they’ve  got  to  have  two  things.  They’ve  got  to  have  a  job,  and 
they’ve got to have a place to live. And other people will testify and 
work  with  you  on  how  we  do  the  rebuilding  of  our  neighborhoods 
and communities. But the ability to rebuild our jobs and to give our 
small businesses the ability to move forward is critical. 

Louisiana Rebirth, the Restoration of the Soul of America, a pro-
gram put together by many of the top national business leaders in 
our industry under the direction of our Lieutenant Governor has ef-
fectively  provided  some  solutions  and  some  opportunities  for  Con-
gress to step in and help us help ourselves. 

We’re  looking,  as  Mr.  McDonald  said,  the  Chairman  of  the 
Chamber  of  Commerce,  and  Mark  Drennen,  President  and  CEO, 
Greater New Orleans Inc. Tourism is critical here. Because it’s crit-
ical not only to one of the Nation’s foremost powerful tourism meet-
ings and convention businesses, but it’s critical to the future of peo-
ple  wanting  to  come  home.  New  Orleans  is  not  a  rich  community, 
and because of the power of tourism, we have the restaurant qual-
ity,  the  museums,  the  art  galleries,  the  parks,  the  recreational  op-
portunities  that  are  critical  to  creating  the  quality  of  life  that 
makes business want to be here. 

Without  tourism,  we  won’t  have  the  individuals  who  are  the  de-
positors  in  the  banks,  who  buy  the  automobiles  from  the  car  deal-
ers.  We  will  not  have  those  85,000  people  who  buy  goods  at  retail. 
The  future  of  this  city  depends  on  the  quick  restoration  of  its 
tourism  industry  because  it  drives  not  only  the  economics  of  the 
city,  and  the  jobs  of  the  working  people  here,  but  it  affects  the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

quality  of  life,  and  it  will  determine  whether  many  of  our  busi-
nesses that are not part of tourism chose to come home. 

So what we’re asking for, I think this past week, Senator Vitter, 
and  Senator  Landrieu  sent  a  letter  to  the  Appropriations  Com-
mittee,  and  also  have  worked  to  pair  down  and  to  hone  not  in  re-
questing the billions, but a request of less than $700 million for the 
entire State of Louisiana, and here in the City of New Orleans, for 
the  Convention  Center,  and  it’s  less  than  $100  million  of  damage 
and  needs.  Our  marketing  efforts  of  $60  million  and  help  for  the 
airport to get reestablished as the core of commerce. 

We have the ability to make money for you, and many of the re-
quests you’re getting the money flows out, but doesn’t flow back in. 
The  small  dollars  that  we’re  asking  for  will  make  money  for  the 
Federal  Treasury,  will  reduce  Federal  dependence  on  those  tens  of 
thousands  of  workers,  and  will  provide  you  an  opportunity  to  help 
restore the economics of this city in a way that gives you great re-
turn on the investment. 

We thank you very much for being here, and we’re sorry we can’t 
show  you  the  kind  of  hospitality  we  have  in  a  normal  month,  but 
we’re honored to have you here. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Did  you  say  $100  million  to  repair  the  Conven-

tion Center? 

Mr. PERRY. Sir, we have close to $100 million in actual damages. 
Fortunately we had $500 million of private insurance on the Center 
which  is  a  state  building.  We’ll  have  approximately  $25–$35  mil-
lion in gap on the deductibles. We believe that in fact those dollars 
could  be  applied  against  the  $52  billion  that  Congress  already  au-
thorized,  and  that  in  fact,  we  could  get  that  repaired  and  up  very 
quickly  without  having  another  appropriation,  so  we’re  asking  for 
assistance  there.  We  have  another—here  in  the  French  Quarter, 
and  I  think  as  you  walked  around,  you’ve  probably  seen  the  mili-
tary  vehicles,  the  recovery  vehicles,  the  generators,  and  water 
tankers have done a lot of damage to the sidewalks in the Quarter. 
We  need  about  $17  million,  and  that’s  all.  Really  between  $17– 
$35  million  to  repair  sidewalks  and  curbs  here  in  the  Quarter,  be-
cause the city won’t have the ability to do that. And the state won’t 
have  it.  And  this  is  our  economic  front  door  of  the  world.  And  we 
believe  that  that  money  could  well  come  without  another  appro-
priation if it was authorized to come within the $52 billion already 
awarded  for  the  initial  recovery.  So  past  that,  we  honestly  believe 
that  the  newly  appropriated  dollars  will  have  to—can  be  fairly 
small. And that is the $60 million of marketing, and the money for 
the airport contained in Senator Vitter and Senator Landrieu’s pro-
posal in tourism. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Perry follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF J. STEPHEN PERRY, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

NEW ORLEANS METROPOLITAN CONVENTION AND VISITORS BUREAU 

Overview 

The  primary  catalyst  and  driver  of  the  New  Orleans  economy  is  the  tourism  in-
dustry,  comprised  of  large  and  small  scale  association  and  corporate  meetings  and 
conventions, rotations of most of the major national sporting championships, a vast 
leisure and family destination, large packaged tour series, a popular foreign traveler 
destination,  and  many  of  the  most  important  special  events  in  the  Nation  such  as 
Mardi Gras, the Essence Festival (the world’s most important annual African-Amer-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

ican  culture  and  music  festival),  the  New  Orleans  Jazz  and  Heritage  Festival,  the 
French Quarter Festival, Satchmo Fest, the Sugar Bowl and many, many more. 

The industry is served by more than 2,500 companies and employs 85,000 people 
in a parish (county) of less than 500,000 persons. The entire retail, banking, profes-
sional  and  services  industries  depend  on  the  more  than  85  billion  of  annual  direct 
visitor  spending  and  additional  several  billion  dollars  of  spinoff  impact.  Not  only  is 
the impact direct through visitor spending, but the 85,000 workers employed in the 
industry  are  the  primary  depositors  in  banks,  purchasers  of  the  largest  segment  of 
retail  goods,  and  generally  drive  the  overall  health  of  the  economy  and  the  success 
of its large and small businesses. 

The  return  of  the  tourism  industry  will  determine  the  very  survival  of  the  New 
Orleans  economy  not  only  from  the  corporation  and  tax  generation  perspective,  but 
will be the primary determinant of whether the working people of New Orleans are 
able  to  return  to  the  city,  reestablish  their  lives,  and  bring  their  families  home  to 
live and repopulate the city. 
Immediate Budgetary Needs 
New Orleans Metropolitan Convention and Visitors Bureau 

The New Orleans Metropolitan Convention and Visitors Bureau (NOMCVB) is the 
primary  catalyst  and  sales,  marketing,  and  branding  arm  of  New  Orleans  largest 
industry,  tourism.  It  is  a  private  sector  501(c)(6)  company  governed  by  a  private 
board  of  directors  and  serves  as  the  statutorily  authorized  entity  in  Louisiana  to 
manage and market tourism in New Orleans and is the recipient of state authorized 
hotel  tax  funding.  It  thus  performs  a  vital  public  function,  though  a  private  entity. 
The city’s economy depends on its effective operation. 

The  NOMCVB  is  the  sole  link  of  the  city’s  largest  industry  to  the  international 
tourism  markets,  wholesalers,  packagers,  brokers,  tour  series  operators,  travel 
agents, national and international conventions, meetings, special events, and sport-
ing events representing $5 to $8 billion of annual economic impact and resulting in 
the  employment  of  85,000  New  Orleanians.  Most  of  these  employees  are  in  those 
entertainment  and  commercial  enterprises  which  brand  New  Orleans  internation-
ally in hotels, food, music, and entertainment and drive its economy. 

The  NOMCVB  is  funded  by  a  hotel  tax  that  has  now  been  obliterated  and  by  a 

member dues base that will be non-existent for at least two years. 

The  NOMCVB  operation  must  be  sustained  because  its  sales  manager  base  has 
all  of  the  data  and  relationships  to  all  of  the  worldwide  convention  and  meeting 
planning  and  travel  professional  community.  This  is  an  industry  that  is  primarily 
relationship  driven,  particularly  on  the  convention  and  meeting  side.  If  those  em-
ployees  are  laid  off  and  hired  elsewhere,  billions  of  dollars  of  competitive  informa-
tion and data would leave Louisiana, crippling the entire rebuilding process of New 
Orleans’ largest industry. It would likely be a death knell for the city’s economy and 
the early return of its citizens if our employees were lost to competitors. 

Operational Shortfalls and Needs 

2005 

2006 

The NOMCVB has reserves to carry 
it until March 1, 2006 
$9,000,000 annual operating needed 

Total NOMCVB 

operating needs 

Marketing and Incentives 
Operation REBIRTH Marketing Fund 

(anticipated revenue = 
$2,000,000) 
$9,000,000 (1 year) 

Essential  marketing  dollars  for  the  NOMCVB  and  its  sister  the  New  Orleans 
Tourism Marketing Corporation to re-image and remarket New Orleans leisure side 
tourism  in  light  of  the  catastrophic  events  . . .  the  primary  key  to  rebuilding  the 
10,000,000 visitors and $4 billion of combined leisure impact: 

2006
2007

$40,000,000 
$25,000,000 

NOMCVB Convention Marketing Fund 

To  rebuild  the  image  of  the  Convention  Center  and  remarket  following  the  dev-

astating events and national images. 

2006
2007

$5,000,000 
$5,000,000 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

54 

NOMCVB Convention Incentive/Indemnification Fund 

To  provide  incentives  and  guarantees  to  major  associations  to  remain  in  or  book 

major conventions in New Orleans. 

2006
2007

$5,000,000 
$5,000,000 

Timeline: Emergency operational funding to the NOMCVB of $6,000,000 is need-
ed  on  March  1,  2006.  The  second  $3,000,000  is  needed  on  July  1,  2006.  Without 
these  dollars,  the  city’s  largest  economic  driver  will  lay  off  all  of  its  employees  and 
close its doors, effectively ending economic recovery. 

The  NOMCVB  Convention  Marketing  Fund  of  $5,000,000  is  needed  by  January 
15,  2006,  if  the  multi-billion  dollar  base  of  convention  business  is  to  be  preserved 
and recaptured. 

The NOMCVB Convention Incentive Fund of $5,000,000 is needed by January 31, 
2006,  if  the  multi-billion  dollar  base  of  convention  business  is  to  be  preserved  and 
rebuilt. 

The  Operation  REBIRTH  marketing  fund  of  $40,000,000  for  the  NOMCVB  and 
its  sister  the  New  Orleans  Tourism  Marketing  Organization  is  needed  for  January 
15, 2006. The 2007 dollars are needed for January 1, 2007. 
Ernest N. Morial Convention Center 
Capital Construction Needs 

Repair and renovation of the Ernest N. Morial Convention Center. 

Total $100,000,000 
Minimum Insurance Gap of $25–35,000,000 

Structural  repairs,  Halls  A  and  B,  major  roofing  repairs,  all  equipment,  interior 

surfaces, signage, environmental decontamination. 

Timeline:  All  repairs  and  renovations  must  be  executed  and  the  building  ready 
to open by late spring 2006. Insurance coverage will be deducted when determined. 
Funding needed ASAP. 

It  is  anticipated  that  the  combination  of  deductibles  and  gaps  in  sub-policy  cov-

erage will result in a funding gap of at least $25–35 million. 
Convention Center Operating Needs 

Operating Shortfall for 2005
Operating Shortfall for 2006
Operating Shortfall for 2007

$15,000,000 
$26,000,000 
$25,000,000 

Debt  service  shortfalls  due  to  loss  of  multiple  hotel,  occupancy,  tour,  and  f  &  b 

taxes. 

2006
2007

$34,000,000 
$30,000,000 

Timeline:  Debt  service  issues  must  be  addressed  immediately.  Operating  short-
fall  for  2005  needed  immediately  due  to  loss  of  rental  and  other  self  generated  in-
come.  Calendar  year  2006  funding  needed  in  Quarter  1.  Total  need  in  Q1  is 
$100,000,000. 
French Quarter Infrastructure Rebuild 

The  French  Quarter  has  sustained  serious  infrastructure  damage  to  its  streets, 
sidewalks and curbing system. The introduction of large trucks, emergency vehicles, 
military  equipment,  water  tankers,  generator  systems,  and  the  parking  of  emer-
gency and police vehicles on the sidewalks and fragile streets has resulted in serious 
degradation  of  the  area’s  infrastructure.  The  Nation’s  largest  and  most  important 
historic  district  and  mixed  use  commercial/residential  neighborhood  has  sustained 
highly  problematic  damage.  It  is  also  the  key  to  recovery  of  the  multi-billion  dollar 
tourism  industry.  This  rebuild  must  commence  in  early  2006  to  facilitate  tourism 
rebound. 

Capital Construction

$17,000,000 
Priority Keys to Immediate Rebuilding 

Federal funding to jumpstart New Orleans’ largest industry and employer is crit-
ical to accelerate recovery, allow the return of our citizens and rejuvenate tax flow. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

55 

FUNDING NEEDS TIMELINE (2006) 

New Orleans CVB (NOMCVB) 

Operations 
Convention Marketing Fund 
Convention Incentive Fund 
NOMCVB/NOTMC Leisure Marketing 

Ernest N. Morial Convention Center 

Operations losses 2005–2006 
Debt Service shortfall 
Repairs Insurance shortfall 

French Quarter Infrastructure Rebuild 

$17,000,000 

Summary 

$9,000,000 
$5,000,000 
$5,000,000 
$40,000,000 

$41,000,000 
$34,000,000 
$25–35,000,000 

America’s most romantic, walkable, historic city took quite a blow. But we believe 
it  will  only  be  for  a  matter  of  a  very  few  months.  Only  time  will  tell  the  duration. 
The  birthplace  of  jazz,  home  of  unique  French  and  Spanish  architecture,  and  the 
originator  of  the  most  renowned  cuisine  on  the  planet  has  truly  suffered.  But  its 
government, business and tourism industry leaders are pledging that beginning over 
the  next  few  months  the  city  will  begin  its  efforts  to  be  reborn  better  than  ever. 
The tourism leadership is committed to helping lead the greatest urban rebuilding 
project in our Nation’s history. We have a historic opportunity to be a living labora-
tory  for  taking  disaster,  infrastructure  degradation,  and  social  ills  and  rebuilding  a 
new  city  that  remains  historic  and  unique,  but  is  a  model  for  rebirth  socially,  cul-
turally, and structurally. 

The  historic  French  Quarter  and  nearly  all  of  the  hospitality  infrastructure  sur-
vived,  though  battered.  The  amazing  historic  texture  and  fabric  of  this  unique 
city . . . all  of  those  things  that  draw  millions  of  visitors  from  around  the  world 
resiliently remain. 

Though we will be down for a period, there is a sense already forming among our 
leaders  and  the  people  that  we  will  successfully  be  able  to  preserve  all  of  those 
things  which  have  made  us  world  famous,  and  that  we  will  be  able  to  rebuild  an 
even  more  welcoming  vibrant  city  in  which  to  live,  work  and  do  business.  It  will 
require  all  of  us  to  unite.  The  work  will  be  hard  but  gratifying.  The  challenges  are 
immense. We are up to the task. 

It may be quite a while . . . but one day the riffs of jazz trumpets, the indescrib-
able tempting smells wafting from the kitchens of our great chefs, the aroma of cafe- 
au-lait  and  beignets,  the  buzz  of  great  conventions.  that  foot-wide  magnetic  smile 
of the front bellman, and the romantic strolls through the Quarter will be common-
place  again.  The  spirit  of  the  multicultural  people  of  New  Orleans  is  indefatigable, 
and though we may be bowed and emotionally stretched. we cannot be defeated and 
cannot wait to rebuild the world’s most authentic city. 

All  that  is  needed  to  regenerate  an  annual  $8  billion,  85,000  employee  industry, 
is an investment this January by the Federal Government of $159 million of funding 
for the Convention and Visitors Bureau, the marketing and promotion and re-imag-
ing  of  the  city,  and  the  Convention  Center.  A  stunning  return  on  investment  and 
one that will reap billions of dollars year after year. Without this funding the indus-
try will wither and atrophy. 

Another $17,000,000 is needed to rebuild America’s most famous historic and com-

mercial district, the French Quarter. 

A  small  part  of  a  $200  billion  recovery,  but  one  that  has  the  most  business  and 

human impact of all. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  Our  next  witness  is 
Elaine Coleman, Commissioner of the Downtown Development Dis-
trict. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

STATEMENT OF ELAINE COLEMAN, COMMISSIONER, 

DOWNTOWN DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT 

Ms.  COLEMAN.  Thank  you  very  much  Chairman  Stevens,  and 
Senators Vitter and Thomas. I really do appreciate you inviting me 
here today to speak. 

I  am  a  life-long  Louisianian.  Born  and  raised  in  Louisiana,  but 
I’ve  made  New  Orleans  my  adopted  home.  I’ve  been  here  for  the 
past  24  years,  and  for  the  last  20  years,  I  have  spent  working  in 
downtown  New  Orleans.  After  30  years  with  Entergy  Corporation, 
I  took  early  retirement  last  year  and  I’ve  spent  a  lot  of  my  time 
doing  volunteer  work,  and  I  was  immediate  past  Chair  of  the 
Downtown  Development  District.  I’ll  be  speaking  this  morning, 
honing  in  on  downtown,  but  certainly  anything  I  will  say  today, 
will be in essence throughout the entire region that I speak. 

But  I  do  want  to  focus  on  downtown.  The  Downtown  Develop-
ment District was chartered in 1974 by the State of Louisiana, and 
we’re  responsible  for  physical  and  economic  development  of  down-
town.  We  accomplish  this  by  providing  strategic  planning  and  pro-
fessional economic development services, by helping to fund capital 
improvements  such  as  a  $17  million  Canal  Street  revitalization 
project that was ongoing when Katrina hit. 

We also do enhanced public services downtown such as sidewalk 
cleaning,  and  enhance  public  safety.  The  DDD  is  acutely  aware  of 
the devastating economic and social cost of Hurricane Katrina. Our 
own  downtown  offices  were  flooded,  equipment  and  documents 
were lost and our staff were displaced. 

We  have  also  had  to  downsize  by  cutting  50  percent  of  our  staff 
members because we’re bracing for a projected 50 percent reduction 
in property revenue, property tax revenue in 2006. 

And  all  this  is  happening  at  the  time  that  the  DDD  is  needed 
more  than  ever.  Downtown  and  the  French  Quarter  for  many 
years,  have  been  the  most  important  economic  generators  in  the 
city of New Orleans. We are the center of the city’s hospitality and 
tourism  industry.  As  Mr.  Perry  just  stated,  with  25,000  of  the  re-
gion’s 38,000 hotel rooms, we’re the center of medical research and 
clinical  care,  home  to  both  the  Tulane  and  LSU  Medical  Science 
Centers.  Our  office  and  service  center  sectors  employed  about 
70,000  people  in  other  key  industries  such  as  oil  and  gas  when 
Katrina hit. And downtown, unlike most of our counterparts across 
the  country,  we  continue  to  be  a  major  tourist  and  shopping  des-
tination.  Downtown  can  be  again  the  economic  engine  that  revives 
New  Orleans,  but  there  are  some  things  that  need  to  happen  and 
we’re asking for your help. 

First, local government and agencies such as Downtown Develop-
ment District, must receive short-term alternative funding to allow 
us to continue to operate. The DDD is applying for a Federal Com-
munity  Disaster  Loan  and  we’re  grateful  for  these  funds.  Yet  the 
maximum loan limit of 25 percent of one year’s operating expenses 
will not come close to making the DDD whole as we’re trying to re-
spond to one of the most enormous challenges our lifetime. 

We need Federal grants to the city of New Orleans, to the DDD, 
and  similar  agencies  in  the  disaster  zone  so  that  we  will  have  the 
financial resources to get the job done. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

The  DDD  also  adds  its  voice  to  the  litany  for  those  calling  for  a 
Federal  commitment  to  build  a  levee  system  capable  of  with-
standing  a  category  5  hurricane,  and  to  make  coastal  restoration 
a top priority. 

And  fixing  the  levee  system  is  closely  linked  with  another  DDD 
concern.  Keeping  the  insurance  claims  process  fair  and  rates  af-
fordable for those who do business and live in the devastated area. 
The  DDD  calls  for  the  Federal  Government  to  do  all  that  it  can 
to  eliminate  red  lining,  and  keep  insurers  rates  reasonable.  If  cas-
ualty  and  liability  insurance  are  not  available  in  New  Orleans,  or 
they’re  unnecessarily,  or  unusually,  or  if  they  are  highly  priced,  it 
will spell disaster for our economy. 

Business  cannot  thrive  without  insurance  or  with  uneconomic 
cost  structures.  We  ask  the  Federal  Government  to  intervene  if 
necessary  to  ensure  fair  and  reasonable  treatment  of  businesses 
and residents along the entire Gulf coast. 

And  speaking  of  uneconomic  cost  structure,  I  would  be  remiss 
after spending 30 years with Entergy if I didn’t mention that Fed-
eral  grants  are  needed  to  assist  electric  and  gas  companies  to  pay 
for the restoration of their devastated systems. This is essential be-
cause if customers are asked to pay for these enormous restoration 
costs, rates would skyrocket. Remaining customers would have dif-
ficulty paying such bills and economic development recovery efforts 
would  be  stifled,  not  only  downtown,  but  for  the  entire  region. 
Therefore, Federal intervention such as the precedent set following 
the 9/11 terrorist attacks, when Con Edison was provided with Fed-
eral funds is crucial to this city’s recovery. 

In  addition,  small  business  who  are  hurting  and  can’t  meet  pay-
roll,  or  can’t  meet  mortgages,  so  we  indeed  need  your  help  there 
as  well.  We’ve  already  heard  about  temporary  housing  which  is 
also a major concern. And we’ve also heard about the Liberty Bond 
Program after 9/11 and I know Chairman Stevens corrected us and 
helped  us  to  understand  that  a  little  bit  more.  But  we  do  indeed 
need that program as a way of helping for long-term housing. And 
the Federal Government can also assist in returning residents and 
businesses  to  New  Orleans  by  providing  a  tax  credit  to  residents 
and businesses displaced by Katrina. 

It  is  a  fact  that  every  family  and  business  that  have  been  dis-
placed, have incurred unforeseen costs related to transportation, to 
temporary  lodging  and  facilities,  replacing  personal  properties  and 
so  on.  Families  and  businesses  wishing  to  return  to  New  Orleans 
will  face  additional  costs.  The  Federal  Government  can  help  re-
move  this  disincentive  by  creating  tax  credits  for  businesses  and 
families who’ve been displaced and who return to the affected area. 
This  would  help  downtown  to  retain  many  firms  in  key  industries 
such as oil and gas by encouraging them to return from their tem-
porary facilities elsewhere without paying a penalty to do so. 

And  lastly,  the  Downtown  Development  asks  that  the  Federal 
Government  commit  itself  to  maintaining  Federal  agencies  and 
contracts and services in New Orleans. That has been talked about 
already,  so  I  won’t  go  into  any  additional  detail  about  it.  But  it’s 
especially  important  for  downtown  in  this  area  of  health  sciences 
which is so important to downtown’s success. Please assure us that 
the National Institutes of Health and other agencies do not give up 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

on the many scientists and clinicians working in New Orleans that 
impact the entire country. 

In  closing,  I  thank  you  for  visiting  us  here  in  New  Orleans.  It’s 
important  that  you’re  actually  here,  on  the  ground.  And  I  know 
that  Senator  Vitter  and  Senator  Landrieu  have  worked  very  hard 
along with the rest of the delegation to get you all here, and I know 
that you’ve seen the devastation, and we’re living it everyday. And 
we’re  simply  asking  you  not  for  a  handout,  but  simply  a  hand  up 
as  we  rebuild  the  city.  We’re  committed  to  rebuilding.  We’re  not 
asking you to do everything, but we do know that without the Fed-
eral Government’s help it will be much more difficult. So we’re sim-
ply  asking  you  for  assistance  at  this  time.  Thank  you  very  much. 

[The prepared statement of Ms. Coleman follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ELAINE COLEMAN, COMMISSIONER, 

DOWNTOWN DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT 

Good  Morning  Senators.  I  am  Elaine  Coleman,  a  life-long  resident  of  Louisiana, 
with  24  years  residing  in  the  New  Orleans  area,  and  over  20  of  those  years  spent 
working in downtown New Orleans. After 30 years with Entergy Corp. I retired last 
year and continued my volunteer services as a Commissioner on the Downtown De-
velopment District. 

Thank  you  for  allowing  me  to  speak  to  you  today  on  behalf  of  the  New  Orleans 
Downtown  Development  District  . . .  or  DDD  for  short—which  is  the  oldest  busi-
ness improvement district in the U.S., funded by a special taxing district established 
by the property owners of downtown and city voters. 

Chartered  in  1974  as  a  political  subdivision  of  the  State  of  Louisiana,  the  DDD 
is responsible for the physical and economic development of downtown New Orleans. 
We  accomplish  this  by:  (1)  facilitating  and  expediting  private  real  estate  and  busi-
ness development, (2) by helping to fund capital improvements such as the $17 mil-
lion  Canal  Street  Revitalization  Project,  which  was  under  construction  when 
Katrina  hit,  (3)  by  development  planning,  and  (4)  by  providing  enhanced  public 
services downtown, such as sidewalk cleaning and enhanced public safety. 

The  DDD  is  acutely  aware  of  the  devastating  economic  and  social  costs  of  Hurri-
cane  Katrina.  Our  own  offices  downtown  were  flooded  by  18  to  24  inches  of  water, 
destroying  documents  and  equipment  and  displacing  our  staff.  Our  full-time  staff 
has dwindled from 14 down to 7 due to layoffs and resignations caused by the relo-
cation of staff members to other parts of the country. The DDD has downsized staff 
and programs in order to brace for a projected 50 percent reduction in property tax 
revenue in 2006. 

All this happens at a time when the services of the DDD are more necessary than 

ever. 

Downtown and the French Quarter for many years have been the most important 

economic generators in the City of New Orleans: 

the region’s 38,000 hotel rooms. 

Tulane and LSU health science centers. 

• We are the center of the city’s hospitality and tourism industry, with 25,000 of 
• We  are  a  center  for  medical  research  and  clinical  care—home  to  both  the 
• Our  office  and  business  service  sectors  employed  about  70,000  people  in  other 
• And  downtown,  unlike  many  counterparts  across  the  country,  continues  to  be 
a  major  tourist  and  retail  shopping  destination.  With  three  major  shopping 
malls and hundreds of thousands of square feet of street-level retail, downtown 
has served—and can continue to serve—as the city’s main source of retail goods 
and services. 

key industries, such as oil and gas, when Katrina hit. 

Downtown can be, once again, the economic engine that revives New Orleans. But 

several things must happen for downtown to revive: 

First,  local  governments,  and  agencies  such  as  the  Downtown  Development  Dis-
trict, must receive alternative funding to allow us to devote every bit of our profes-
sional expertise and local knowledge base to overcoming downtown’s challenges. The 
DDD  is  applying  for  a  Federal  Community  Disaster  Loan,  and  we  are  grateful  for 
these  funds.  Yet  the  maximum  loan  limit—25  percent  of  one  year’s  operating  ex-
penses—will  not  come  close  to  making  the  DDD  whole,  and  capable  of  responding 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

sufficiently  to  the  enormous  challenges  we  face  downtown.  We  need  Federal  grants 
to  the  City  of  New  Orleans,  DDD  and  similar  agencies  in  the  disaster  zone  so  we 
have the financial resources to do the good work we are capable of. 

The  Downtown  Development  District  also  adds  its  voice  to  the  litany  calling  for 
an  immediate  Federal  commitment  to  build  a  levee  system  capable  of  withstanding 
a  Category  5  hurricane  and  to  make  coastal  restoration  a  top  priority.  Working  on 
the  ground  with  downtown  businesses  and  property  owners,  we  know  that  this  is 
foremost on our constituents’ minds. It’s about more than peace of mind. It is a crit-
ical economic issue that will stall reinvestment until it is dealt with. 

Fixing the levee system is closely linked with another DDD concern: Keeping the 
insurance claims process fair and rates affordable for those who do business and live 
in  the  devastated  area.  The  DDD  calls  for  the  Federal  Government  to  do  all  it  can 
to  eliminate  redlining,  and  to  keep  insurance  rates  reasonable.  If  casualty  and  li-
ability  insurance  were  not  available  in  New  Orleans,  or  were  unreasonably  priced, 
it  would  spell  disaster  for  our  recovery.  Business  cannot  thrive  without  insurance 
or with an uneconomic cost structure. We ask the Federal Government to intervene 
if  necessary  to  ensure  fair  and  reasonable  treatment  of  businesses  and  residents 
along the Gulf Coast. 

Speaking of an uneconomic cost structure, I would be remiss, if after spending 30 
years  employed  by  Entergy,  if  I  did  not  mention  the  need  for  Federal  grants  to  as-
sist private electric and gas companies to pay for the restoration of their devastated 
systems. This is essential because if customers are asked to pay for these enormous 
restoration costs, rates would skyrocket. Remaining customers would have difficulty 
paying  such  bills  and  economic  development  recovery  efforts  would  be  stifled,  not 
only  downtown,  but  in  the  rest  of  the  region.  Therefore,  Federal  intervention  such 
as the precedent set following the 9/11 terrorist attack; where Con-Edison was pro-
vided with Federal funds, is crucial to this city’s recovery. 

In  addition,  small  businesses  are  also  hurting.  Getting  Small  Business  Adminis-
tration  (SBA)  loan  funds  immediately  into  the  hands  of  downtown  and  other  busi-
nesses  is  crucial.  Many  small  businesses  have  little  or  no  reserves  to  tide  them 
through  disasters  of  this  magnitude.  They  are  losing  talented  human  resources  to 
other  parts  of  the  country  because  they  cannot  afford  to  pay  staff;  they  will  soon 
lose leases or mortgages if they do not resume payments; and many cannot resume 
operations to pay for these things because they have lost equipment and inventory, 
but they do not have the funds to replace them. 

Well  over  100,000  businesses  have  applied  for  loans  and  are  still  waiting  for  as-
sistance. And every day more businesses go under because they have not been given 
this critical lifeline to success. Please help our small businesses to succeed by expe-
diting  the  SBA  process  and  taking  into  consideration  the  unique  circumstances 
caused by Katrina, whereby many have lost all financial and other records. 

The  DDD  also  calls  on  the  Federal  Government  to  do  all  it  can  to  help  us  house 
our New Orleans workforce. It’s impossible to overstate how critical this is to reviv-
ing downtown businesses. Many hospitality businesses have lost 80 percent of their 
workforce  due  to  the  dispersion  of  New  Orleanians  across  the  country.  Many  em-
ployees who would like to live and work in New Orleans once again cannot, because 
there  is  not  enough  housing  to  support  the  number  of  jobs  that  are  left  in  the  city. 
This  is  a  rare  problem  to  have:  too  many  jobs  and  not  enough  workers,  but  this  is 
what  is  occurring  downtown  and  in  other  re-opened  parts  of  the  city.  It  is  clear 
though, that the jobs will not wait forever for workers to fill them. If we do not react 
quickly, jobs and businesses in the ‘‘dry’’ parts of New Orleans will be the next vic-
tim of Katrina. The DDD asks that the Federal Government step-up its deployment 
of  trailers  and  other  forms  of  temporary  housing  in  order  to  meet  the  short-term 
housing crisis. 

To  address  longer-term  housing  needs,  the  DDD  requests  that  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment institute a low-interest loan program for commercial and residential devel-
opment in the disaster area, similar to the Liberty Bond Program after 9/11. Down-
town  is  already  home  to  several  historic  and  emerging  neighborhoods,  and  we  see 
ourselves  as  a  haven  for  many  displaced  New  Orleanians  in  future  years.  We  need 
to get moving now, though, to develop more mixed-use—and mixed-income—residen-
tial  developments  downtown.  The  real  estate  market,  however,  is  in  a  wait-and-see 
mode  right  now.  Developers  and  investors  need  the  strong  vote  of  confidence  that 
a  Federal  low-interest  loan  program  would  signify.  With  this  in  place,  the  high 
ground of downtown can be home to many more New Orleanians in safe, attractive, 
and inviting medium and high density housing downtown. 

The Federal Government can also assist in returning residents and businesses to 
New  Orleans  by  providing  a  tax  credit  to  residents  and  businesses  displaced  by 
Katrina.  It’s  a  fact  that  every  family  and  business  that  has  been  displaced  has  in-
curred  unforeseen  costs  related  to  transportation,  temporary  lodging  and  facilities, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

replacing  personal  property,  and  so  on.  Families  and  businesses  wishing  to  return 
to  New  Orleans  will  face  additional  costs.  The  Federal  Government  can  help  to  re-
move  this  disincentive  to  return  by  creating  tax  credits  for  businesses  and  families 
who  have  been  displaced  and  who  return  to  the  affected  region.  This  would  help 
downtown  to  retain  many  small-  and  medium-sized  firms  in  key  industries  like  oil 
and gas, by encouraging them to return from temporary facilities elsewhere without 
paying a penalty to do so. 

Lastly,  the  Downtown  Development  District  asks  that  the  Federal  Government 
commit  itself  to  maintaining  Federal  agency  offices  and  contracts  for  services  in 
New  Orleans.  Unfortunately,  despite  the  best  efforts  of  local,  State,  and  Federal 
Governments,  New  Orleans  will  lose  many  private  employers  in  the  wake  of 
Katrina.  We  at  the  DDD  hope  that  the  Federal  Government  will  send  a  strong  sig-
nal of its confidence in the future of New Orleans by committing itself to the City— 
by maintaining job sites and contracts, and looking for opportunities to expand Fed-
eral contracting in the region where practical. This is especially important for down-
town  in  the  area  of  the  health  sciences,  which  are  so  important  to  downtown’s  suc-
cess. Please assure that the National Institutes of Health and other agencies do not 
give  up  on  the  many  great  scientists  and  clinicians  working  in  New  Orleans  on  be-
half of the Nation. 

In  closing,  I  thank  you  for  visiting  us  here  in  New  Orleans.  It  is  important  that 
you  are  here,  on  the  ground,  so  that  you  can  see  the  devastation  for  yourselves.  I 
trust  you  have  found  that—even  after  the  devastation  of  Katrina—New  Orleans’ 
warm and generous hospitality is still evident. We appreciate your visit and commit 
to  work  hard  with  the  Downtown  Development  District  to  make  New  Orleans  an 
even  better  version  of  itself  in  the  future.  We  are  committed  to  doing  our  part.  We 
know,  though,  that  we  cannot  fully  recover  without  the  assistance  of  the  Federal 
Government. Thank you. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  Our  last  witness  is  going 

to be David Guidry. 

Mr. GUIDRY. A good Irish name from the Bayou, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Guico is your company. 
Mr. GUIDRY. Yes sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. I apologize. 

STATEMENT OF DAVID GUIDRY, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

GUICO MACHINE WORKS INC. 

Mr. GUIDRY. Thank you. Chairman Stevens, Senator Vitter, Sen-
ator  Thomas,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  be  able  to  stand  be-
fore  you  today  to  share  with  you  our  experience.  We’re  an  oil  and 
gas  equipment  manufacturer,  pre-Katrina  we  had  60  employees 
turning  our  well  heads  in  our  factory  across  the  river.  We’ve  been 
impacted many ways by the storm. 

Our  current  workforce  is  now  down  to  about  20  employees,  up 
from  12  about  a  week  ago.  Our  insurance  claim  is  in  limbo,  our 
bank,  or  the  U.S.  mail  service  held  up  any  payments  to  our  com-
pany  for  nearly  7  weeks,  inhibiting  our  ability  to  make  payroll. 
Suppliers  have  put  us  on  COD  and  the  rumors  are  rampant  that 
Guico  Machine  Works  will  go  bankrupt.  But  when  I  listen  to  the 
problems of the gentleman talking about the fisheries, I have to tell 
you, my problems pale in contrast. 

When I was sitting down, I was thinking about the damage that 
was being done to me. And I decided to deviate from my testimony 
to  share  with  you  something  different.  All  my  life  I  have  been 
taught to believe in the American Dream and the American institu-
tions.  When  I  was  24  years  old,  I  decided  to  pursue  the  dream  of 
owning  my  own  business.  I  was  surprised  to  find  that  America 
thought  it  was  so  important  that  they  had  created  an  institution 
called the Small Business Administration, and it was as if they had 
created it just for me. When I went there, when no one would loan 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

me  a  dime,  it  was  the  SBA  that  helped  us  to  secure  a  $210,000 
loan that started my business. From that, we grew it and we grew 
it,  and  10  years  ago  when  we  needed  to  build  a  new  factory,  we 
went  back  to  the  SBA  and  we  explained  to  them  what  our  vision 
was, and they anted up $1.3 million for us to be able to build that 
factory. 

And  a  cash  crunch  came  about  maybe  4  years  later,  they  came 
back and we were able to borrow another $300,000. I believe in the 
SBA,  they  have  been  there  for  me.  But  what’s  happening  now  is 
quite different. Six weeks after we have applied for a loan, we have 
to  ask  these  questions.  Why  has  no  one  from  SBA  even  contacted 
us  to  say  they’ve  actually  received  our  loan  package?  Why  has  no 
one  visited  my  site  even  to  verify  that  I’m  a  legitimate  business? 
Whether  I  need  sustaining  money,  or  whether  I  need  rebuilding 
money?  Why  is  it  that  the  local  office  isn’t  even  included  in  the 
loop?  When  we  talk  to  them,  they  said  everything  has  gone  to 
Washington D.C. Why is my local banker not included in the proc-
ess?  He  has  been  doing  business  with  me  for  over  10  years  and 
knows  all  of  the  components.  My  credit,  my  character,  and  all  of 
the  things  that  are  used  to  judge  me  in  being  able  to  my  validity 
in being able to survive as a business. 

And  then  finally,  from  the  technology  side,  why  can’t  I  even  go 
online  to  look  at  where  the  status  of  my  loan  is?  When  I  listen  to 
all  the  statistics  that  everyone  said  here  today,  I  may  be  one  that 
has  already  been  approved.  I  may  be  one  that  has  been  rejected. 
But  the  thing  of  it  is  that  I  have  no  idea.  Now  I  have  to  tell  you 
with  all  of  my  heart,  I  believe  that  the  SBA  is  going  to  be  there 
for me, because they always have. The question I have for you guys 
today is this. Will they be there in time? 

I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  visit  with  you  this  morning, 

thank you all for listening to what I had to say. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Guidry follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF DAVID GUIDRY, PRESIDENT/CEO, 

GUICO MACHINE WORKS INC. 

We are an oil and gas equipment manufacturer who was in the middle of the best 
sales  year  in  our  twenty-three  year  history.  Our  company  had  sixty  employees 
churning  out  wellheads  and  related  products  in  our  plant  located  on  the  Harvey 
Canal in Jefferson Parish. Pre-Katrina our business had accounts receivable of near-
ly  $1,000,000  from  sales  of  $400,000  per  month.  However,  after  Katrina  hit,  our 
sales  in  September  dropped  to  zero.  In  October,  sales  were  $80,000.  The  problem 
for  my  business  is  that  for  six  weeks,  the  mail  delivered  no  checks  and  while  our 
customers  are  still  giving  us  orders,  we  have  no  shop  employees  to  fill  them.  We 
are  down  from  60  employees  to  12  because  we  are  having  trouble  making  payroll. 
However, we have a facility full of materials and machinery that is sitting idle. 

Suppliers  put  us  on  COD,  core  management  employees  had  to  be  paid,  and  loan 
relationships had to be met. Deferments were later offered, but the auto drafts had 
already been taken. My community bank was underwater and is in no better shape 
than  my  business.  The  Small  Business  Administration  (SBA)  and  its  disaster  loan 
program  is  our  only  way  out  of  this  situation.  Three  weeks  after  Katrina  hit,  our 
business attended a seminar at Southeastern University regarding the disaster pro-
cedure process. Our application for SBA disaster assistance went out one week later. 
Other  than  the  reports  we  hear  from  SBA  representatives  at  small  business  gath-
erings, we have heard nothing back from them. I have had three different prior loan 
relationships with the SBA and could not have built my company without their help. 
Their  thoroughness  and  due  diligence  is  to  be  applauded  as  a  government  agency 
really helping businesses in normal times. However, Katrina is anything but normal 
times.  I  have  applied  and  been  approved  for  normal  SBA  loans  and  they  do  a  good 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

job  on  those,  but  in  this  emergency  situation,  the  SBA  is  failing  me  and  my  busi-
ness. 

I am an active member of several business organizations and have chaired several 
of  them  in  the  region.  I  cannot  tell  you  how  many  struggling  businesses  are  count-
ing on ‘‘the Cavalry’’ to arrive in time and help us. But, rather than seeing ‘‘the Cav-
alry’’ come down here and help, instead the running joke is that SBA disaster fund-
ed  loans  are  like  UFO’s.  Everyone  knows  that  they  are  out  there  and  there  have 
been  sightings  of  some,  but  I  do  not  know  anyone  who  has  actually  seen  one.  That 
is  why  I  was  happy  Louisiana  started  their  bridge  loan  program.  Although  I  have 
heard  nothing  back  from  the  SBA  for  over  a  month,  I  applied  for  a  bridge  loan 
through the State of Louisiana program and got it within seven days. This program 
goes through local banks, so I just went into my local bank, a bank that knows my 
business  and  already  has  my  credit  history,  and  they  got  me  a  response  quickly. 
That is how things should work, businesses need immediate capital to make repairs, 
make payroll and get back on their feet—in two to three months many of these busi-
nesses will be gone, maybe forever. 

Let  me  contrast  my  experience  with  the  Louisiana  bridge  loan  program  with  my 
experience  with  the  SBA  disaster  loan  program.  To  date,  we  have  received  no  ac-
knowledgment  that  the  SBA  is  even  in  receipt  of  my  loan  package,  not  to  mention 
any  word  back  as  to  when  I  can  expect  to  get  any  funding.  We  knew  to  send  our 
loan  package  certified  mail,  but  how  many  business  knew  this?  At  a  minimum,  for 
the  sake  of  customer  service,  the  SBA  should  have  an  acknowledgment  sharing 
some idea of the process and the length of time should have occurred. Perhaps, after 
receipt  of  a  loan  package,  the  SBA  could  arrange  a  timely  site  visit.  This  way  they 
could have proof of a storefront to slow fraudulent claims, and then they could give 
an assessment of whether a re-building loan or life sustaining loan is needed. 

Also,  perhaps  the  SBA  could  allow  businesses  to  use  present  banking  relation-
ships  to  help  in  the  underwriting  of  the  loan.  Along  the  same  lines,  I  suggest  they 
use the local SBA office for greater input, as they know the local business and local 
landscape.  Maybe  they  could  form  an  ‘‘express  line’’  process  for  prior  SBA  cus-
tomers. You already know these guys so maybe that could help in the future to get 
businesses with a history with the SBA to process their loans quicker. For the next 
disaster,  this  would  help  out  affected  communities.  If  some  businesses  get  loans, 
this  would  help  other  businesses  in  the  area  while  they  are  waiting  for  their  loans 
to come through. 

Another suggestion that I have is to provide online tracking of the status of your 
loan.  This  way  you  could  track  when  it  is  received,  when  it  is  being  processed,  and 
when  you  could  expect  to  hear  something  back.  They  have  online  banking,  online 
package  tracking,  the  SBA  should  allow  businesses  to  track  the  process  online  as 
well. The current system is not providing us with any information, and more impor-
tantly  any  certainty.  Our  business  is  making  day-to-day  decisions  based  on  the 
availability  of  funds.  I  applied  for  $1,500,000  and  need  some  certainty.  I  have  no 
idea  if  I  will  receive  that  amount  or  if  I  will  get  nothing.  But  at  this  point,  given 
how  things  are  going,  I  have  to  plan  as  if  it  will  be  nothing  so  my  business,  my 
family  and  my  employees  can  get  by.  I  do  not  have  a  clue  on  when  the  money  is 
coming, if it’s coming, so I cannot plan and cannot spend a dime. If I had some cer-
tainty,  I  could  make  a  business  plan  but  this  is  just  crazy  not  having  funds  and 
any certainty as to how/when I can expect to hear back! 

Thank you. 

ans, yes. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  thank  you  very  much.  Mr.  Perry,  what 
you’re seeking is promotion dollars really, right? In connection with 
your association? 

Mr.  PERRY.  Yes  sir,  on  behalf  of  all  the  businesses  in  New  Orle-

The CHAIRMAN. I’m—I’ve got to tell you, I’m not an expert in this 
area.  Someone  previously  testified  that  nonprofits  are  not  eligible 
for disaster grants. Is that your understanding? 

Mr.  PERRY.  We  believe  that  that  is  correct,  but  in  working 
through the office of the Lieutenant Governor here, which is statu-
torily charged with the oversight of the tourism industry, there are 
mechanisms for us to work in partnership to do that. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  what’s  your  suggestion,  as  to  who  should 

get the money? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

63 

Mr. PERRY. We believe that the most appropriate so that it would 
be fully audited by the Louisiana auditors and by Federal auditors, 
would be to flow through the office of the Lieutenant Governor, be-
cause  then  you’ll  have  all  the  checks  and  balances  that  would  be 
appropriate to see where the marketing dollars were spent and for 
what purposes. 

The CHAIRMAN. I see. Are you satisfied that the Convention Cen-
ter  will  be  restored  in  time  for  these  conventions  if  we  can  assist 
you in getting them back? 

Mr.  PERRY.  Sir,  we  believe  sir.  We  are  working  on  a  very  tight 
timeframe  right  now.  We’ve  lost  over  $2  billion  of  business  during 
this  period.  We’re  shooting  to  open  June  1st  of  next  year  with  the 
American  Library  Association,  a  21,000  member  organization,  to 
kick  off  the  new  season.  But  we’ve  lost  many  of  our—we’ve  lost 
many of our customers obviously as you can imagine over the next 
year. If we are able to get these dollars in for the Convention Cen-
ter,  we’ll  be  able  to  have  it  opened,  and  fully  restored  and  ren-
ovated,  and  the  impact  of  that  in  the  next  24  months  probably  is 
in  the  $5–$6  billion  range,  just  on  having  the  facility  back  online. 
Tremendous  impact.  And  for  the  Mayor,  what’s  so  problematic  for 
him is with our industry effectively shutdown right now, his entire 
revenue  base  is  damaged.  And  that’s  why  he’s  had  to  lay  off  so 
many people and can’t provide the basic city services. 

We’re  trying  to  find  a  way  to  pay  for  it  ourselves.  And  so  that’s 

why we’re asking for that amount of Federal assistance. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  Mr.  Coleman,  we  all  ap-
preciate your statement, DDD is obviously very lucky to have your 
experience.  I  did  not  know  that  CON  ED  had  gotten  money  di-
rectly.  My  staff  has  looked  this  up  and  we  find  that  there  was 
money  provided  to—we  appropriated  funds  to  Housing  and  Urban 
Development  for  the  Lower  Manhattan  Development  Corporation, 
which  was  to  reimburse  the  utility  companies  for  what  you  sug-
gested,  uncompensated  costs  associated  with  restoring  services. 
The amount of money involved in that was $250 million. Have you 
an  estimate  through  DDD  of  how  much  money  would  be  needed 
here? 

Ms.  COLEMAN.  Are  you  asking  specifically  about  the  utility  com-

pany? 

The CHAIRMAN. The utility companies, yes ma’am. 
Ms.  COLEMAN.  Right,  I’m  wearing  two  hats.  Regarding  Entergy, 
what  I  have  seen,  what  has  been  asked  for.  I  have  retired,  so  I’m 
not  as  close,  but  I  do  talk  with  them  all  the  time.  I  believe  they 
are  asking  for  a  little  over  $400  million  for  the  restoration.  When 
you  look  at  what’s  happened  in  the  City  of  New  Orleans,  it’s  the 
entire  customer  base  of  Entergy  New  Orleans  that  was  impacted. 
Not a portion of it, but the entire customer base lost. The company 
lost  approximately  70  percent  of  its  customers.  And  we’re  working 
to  restore  those  that  are  able  to  take  service.  But  the  restoration 
costs  are  enormous  and  that’s  why  the  company  is  asking  that 
there be some type of Federal relief so that customers will not have 
to bear that burden. It would be very uneconomic, we could not try 
to  bring  business  here  if  we  didn’t  have  a  rate  structure  that  was 
competitive. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

64 

The  CHAIRMAN.  I  think  you’re  right,  there’s  a  substantial  prece-
dent  there  in  terms  of  the  New  York  action,  and  we’ll  look  into 
that,  and  hopefully  be  successful  in  assisting  you.  Senator  Vitter. 
Senator VITTER. I wanted to ask Steve Perry. Steve, we’re talking 
a  lot  about  the  9/11  comparison,  what  precisely  was  done  for  New 
York  tourism,  marketing,  and  branding  after  9/11  and  in  what 
amounts?  And  I  want  you  to  specifically  exclude  the  National  Air-
line  piece,  which  I  would  put  in  a  different  category  to  make  the 
comparison  a  little  fairer,  but  what  was  done  for  New  York  tour-
ism, marketing and branding after 9/11? 

Mr. PERRY. It was virtually the identical $40 million for the mar-
keting  and  branding  side  that  we  are  asking  for,  it’s  even  more 
critical here, as you know Senator Vitter, because tourism is impor-
tant  in  New  York,  but  it’s  just  a  tiny  piece  of  their  economy.  Here 
it’s  disproportionately  large.  $40  million  came  from  the  Federal 
Government  on  a  series  of  grants  through  both  the  City  and  the 
State  entities  that  were  received  in  through  the  Empire  State  Or-
ganization.  And  frankly,  that  combined  with  Mayor  Guiliani’s 
pitches helped restore tourism very very quickly to New York City, 
and in fact, New York City’s tourism base right now is the strong-
est  it  has  been  in  probably  25  years.  Here  it’s  disproportionately 
critical,  because  so  many  of  the  employees  in  our  tax  base  depend 
upon it and because so many of our customers are literally in here 
this  month  making  decisions  as  to  whether  to  come  next  fall,  or 
even  the  spring  of  2007.  So,  the  tide  is  going  to  turn  in  the  next 
90  to  100  days  and  that’s  why  it’s  so  important  for  us  to  get  this 
money for assistance as soon as possible. 

Senator VITTER. In the New York case after 9/11, were they also 
helped by any donated air time, or other in kind contributions that 
went  toward  a  national  marketing  campaign,  and  if  so,  is  that 
same sort of private sector contribution available here? 

Mr.  PERRY.  It  is,  we  have  already  begun  exploring.  I’ll  give  you 
an  example.  The  New  Jersey  Association  of  Broadcasters,  I  mean 
how far away could that be from Louisiana, have offered to give us 
$250,000 of free radio time in the State of New Jersey. We’re doing 
this  in  nearly  every  state.  We’re  going—we’re  doing  everything  we 
can to help ourselves right now. We’re going to every other—every-
one of our peers in other states and cities. We’re going to every na-
tional  trade  organization  in  our  business.  We’re  going  to  all  of  our 
national  customer  bases.  Those  associations  that  meet  here  regu-
larly.  And  Senator  Vitter,  we  are  asking  for  every  contribution  we 
possibly can to help re-image and re-brand us. 

Senator  VITTER.  So  therefore  it’s  fair  to  say,  any  Federal  dollars 
could be leveraged significantly and used as a base on which to add 
on these sorts of private sector contributions. 

Mr.  PERRY.  We  have  a  multiplier  effect,  and  when  you  think 
about the $40 to $60 million that we’re talking about, just for New 
Orleans  alone,  there  are  not  many  times  the  Federal  Government 
can  think  of  investing  $40  to  $60  million  and  getting  $5  billion  of 
economic impact in return. And for us it’s the life and breath of our 
businesses now. 

Senator  VITTER.  David  Guidry,  I  really  appreciate  your  com-
ments about the SBA because that has been a big focus, and quite 
frankly, a huge frustration of mine. And we’ve heard that from you, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

65 

unfortunately  we’ve  heard  it  from  a  whole  lot  of  business  folks.  I 
just  want  to  repeat  that  tomorrow  morning,  the  Senate  Chair  of 
the  Small  Business  Committee  is  having  a  hearing  exactly  about 
the  frustrations  you’re  talking  about:  Slow  time  line,  lack  of  ap-
proved  loans,  et  cetera,  so  I’m  certainly  hopeful  we’re  going  to 
begin  to  get  SBA’s  attention.  But  could  you  also  speak  to  this  pro-
posal  for  bridge  loans,  because  it’s  my  understanding  that  even  if 
the SBA were working in a very timely manner, their normal menu 
of  loans  and  options  would  have  some  gaps  in  it.  In  terms  of  the 
current  needs  of  small  business  on  the  ground  here,  and  that’s 
what  this  bridge  loan  proposal  is  designed  to  fill  in,  could  you 
speak to that a little bit. 

Mr.  GUIDRY.  Yes  sir.  The  uncertainty.  And  guys,  I  want  you  to 
walk in my shoes for a second. OK. I’m trying to plan the destina-
tion  of  a  company  that  employs  60  people.  And  we  need  to  figure 
how  we’re  going  to  be  able  to  make  it  through  what  we  consider 
this  next  6  months.  And  obviously,  the  choices  that  we’re  going  to 
make  will  have  a  lot  to  do  on  the  amount  of  capital  we  will  have 
available  to  us.  The  90-day  suspension  of  payments  that  nearly 
every long term creditor we have will run out, in the end of Decem-
ber. 

We have those immediate needs of maintaining what we call our 
intellectual  capital.  The  top  people  in  the  company  that  keep  us 
running.  Then  the  second  component  is  incentives  to  help  to  lure 
our people back. We have some folks that are in Houston that will 
be lured back via housing, lured back via some economic incentives, 
and  even  our  ability  to  be  able  to  compete  with  what  has  just  be-
come  this  wild  wage  scale  that  has  occurred  inside  New  Orleans. 
So  a  bridge  loan  that  would  help  us  to  be  able  to  stem  the  tide  of 
the  bleeding  that  occurring  in  the  company  right  now,  knowing 
that  the  cavalry  will  come  in  90  days,  180  days.  Or  even  if  I  just 
know that the cavalry won’t come. It will allow our decision process 
to  make  our  company  survive.  Because  we—I’m  an  entrepreneur, 
I will survive. I’m not interested in business grant. I’m a for profit 
operation.  OK.  Whether—if  I  could  get  a  loan  from  the  bank  that 
would be fine. It’s just that SBA has always marketed itself as hav-
ing this disaster loan component. A safety net that we just always 
felt that we could count on. 

Well,  we’ve  done  our  part  in  the  disaster  side,  OK.  It  is  now— 
to  like  this  safety  net  was  going  to  kick  in  for  us.  And  so  it’s  the 
uncertainty. The bridge loan, speedy, it involved people in the proc-
ess  who  know  me.  It  was  done  via  our  bank  which  made  it  a  lot 
simpler. And I’ve got to tell you our bank knows which—our banks 
here  in  the  area  know  how  to  perform  what  we  call  battlefield 
triage. Which companies are savable. Which companies need work-
ing  capital  to  exist  just  90  days,  which  companies  need  it  for  180 
days.  And  everybody’s  not  going  to  survive  and  the  local  banking 
industry  knows  that.  And  the  SBA  has  done  itself  a  disservice  by 
not employing that institution. 

Senator  VITTER.  Do  you  have  any  particular  insight  to  why  the 
SBA  has  been  so  slow  moving  on  this,  is  it  just  being  purely  over-
whelmed  by  the  numbers  not  having  the  people,  or  what’s  going 
on? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

66 

Mr.  GUIDRY.  I  don’t  know,  you  know.  The  running  joke  on  the 
SBA  funded  disaster  loans  is  like  UFOs,  we  all  believe  they’re  out 
there.  There  have  been  even  sightings  of  some.  But  I  don’t  know 
a soul who’s ever seen one. And so we—I can’t speculate on it Sen-
ator, it’s kind of mind boggling to be honest. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Mr.  Guidry,  I  was  in  Alaska  at  the  time,  the 
1964  earthquake,  and  had  a  small  business,  a  law  firm,  and  the 
house  was  substantially  damaged.  I  applied  to  the  SBA  and  for 
each—for  a  loan  for  each  operation  and  was  turned  down.  And  a 
little  while  later,  well  they  got  it  back—I  petitioned  for  a  review 
they got back to looking at it. And it was the sheer number of peo-
ple  involved.  So  I  hope  you  don’t  lose  hope,  I  didn’t.  And  I  went 
back  again  and  got  my  loans  and  survived  obviously.  But  these 
people are now dealing with a disaster area from Mississippi, Lou-
isiana, Florida, Texas, and Alabama. All these disaster areas all at 
the  same  time.  So  it’s  a  massive  problem  to  deal  with  individual 
applications.  And  I  learned  that  it’s  a  problem  waiting.  So  I  hope 
you  not  lose  heart.  And  I  hope  that  they  will  come  around.  We’re 
going  to  have  that  hearing  tonight.  But  very  clearly,  the  numbers 
involved in these disasters now, are the greatest in history. I hope 
we  all  keep  in  mind  that  there  are  human  beings  at  SBA  too,  and 
they are just overwhelmed. 

Senator Thomas? 
Senator THOMAS. Mr. Chairman, thank you so much for allowing 
us  to  come  and  be  here.  This  has  been  an  excellent  experience  for 
us.  We’ve  heard  a  lot  about  the  problem,  and  of  course,  we  have 
some in our states, not nearly the size of this one, so it’s an experi-
ence. And you’ve done a great job in helping us understand it. I ap-
preciate your comments about SBA. I hope we can move along with 
these  kinds  of  things.  Mr.  Perry,  tourism  is  a  major  thing  in  my 
state.  It’s  one  of  our  three  highest  things,  so  I  understand  what 
you’re saying. So I’m going to go back and feel very strongly about 
assistance  here  and  doing  the  things  that  we  can  do  to  be  helpful, 
and I think most people do. 

Senator  Vitter  has  done  a  great  job,  and  Senator  Landrieu  also, 
in promoting what needs to be done here and helping us to under-
stand it. 

Just  for  your  own  information,  you  need  to  understand  as  we  go 
back, it’s not going to be as easy a job as you might think. I mean 
take a look at what we’re doing now, we’re talking about the high-
est  deficit  we’ve  had  in  this  country  for  a  very  long  time.  We’re 
talking  about  that  we  just  last  week  reduced  spending  by  $35  bil-
lion, and so we’re trying to keep a hold of spending and we should. 
We  have  to  do  that.  We’re  trying  to  keep  the  economy  strong  by 
not  raising  taxes  and  so  on  to  do  that.  So  we’re  looking  at  health 
care  costs  that  are  going  to  be  going  up.  So  all  I’m  saying  to  you 
is, I think that we’re committed, but it isn’t going to be the easiest 
thing  in  the  world  to  be  able  to  do  this.  And  when  we  do  it,  we 
will  provide  these  things  basically  that  you’re  talking  about  here. 
I  think  we  have  to  have  accountable  spending,  we  need  to  know 
where that money’s going, who’s responsible for it. We’ve had some 
experience  in  these  kinds  of  places  where  the  spending  has  not 
been  watched.  And  I  think  that’s  very  important,  people  feel 
strongly about that. We need to make the best choices for spending 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

67 

so  that  what’s  spent  here,  and  you’re  going  to  be  very  key  to  that, 
as  to  what’s  most  effective  for  now  and  for  the  future.  And  there 
has  to  be  leadership  in  this  process  so  that  somebody  is  account-
able and somebody is responsible. And from our standpoint, one of 
the  keys  is  going  to  be  accountability  and  what  the  Federal  Gov-
ernment’s doing. That’s part of our job as well. 

So  you  know,  I  see  it  kind  of  like  a  family  or  a  business.  When 
you  have  an  emergency  you  have  to  deal  with  it,  and  take  care  of 
it. At the same time you have to take care of your family and then 
you  have  to  start  looking  for  ways  to  offset  those  costs.  And  those 
are kind of the challenges that we’re going to have. So I just want 
to  thank  you  all  for  what  you’ve  provided  for  us,  I  feel  much  more 
comfortable, as I go back and working with Senator Vitter, to work 
forward  to  trying  to  give  some  assistance  to  you  all  to  get  your 
economy back in place. 

Thank you so much for your efforts to help enlighten us. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  I  also  want  to  thank  the  court  system  for  allow-
ing us again, to use this room for our hearing. We’ll be leaving here 
in  a  few  minutes  and  take  our  helicopter  trip  and  see  more  of  the 
damage.  I  said  yesterday,  I’ve  seen  typhoons  and  hurricanes,  and 
earthquakes,  and  tsunamis  and  great  fires  that  covered  million  of 
acres.  But  I’ve  never  seen  anything  like  that  devastation  we  saw 
yesterday. 

So  we’ll  be  working  with  you,  but  I  don’t  know  how  to  say  this, 
but Rome wasn’t built in a day, and you can’t rebuild New Orleans 
in  a  day  either.  It’s  going  to  be  a  long  haul,  but  we  will  be  with 
you all the way. Thank you very much. 

[Applause]. 
[Whereupon the hearing was adjourned] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

GULF OF MEXICO FISHERY MANAGEMENT COUNCIL 

Tampa, FL, October 7, 2005 

Hon. THAD COCHRAN, 
Chair, 
Senate Committee on Appropriations, 
Washington, DC. 
Hon. TRENT LOTT, 
Member, 
Senate Committee on Finance, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senator Cochran and Senator Lott, 

Thank you for your letter asking the Gulf of Mexico Fishery Management Council 
to recommend projects to rebuild fisheries and their associated infrastructure in the 
Northern Gulf of Mexico. 

At our October meeting in St. Petersburg, Florida, the Council discussed your re-
quest  and  developed  the  attached  list  of  recommendations.  All  three  Council  mem-
bers  from  Mississippi  attended  the  meeting,  and  our  discussion  was  greatly  in-
formed by their experiences. 

The Gulf of Mexico Fishery Management Council is taking deliberate action to ad-
dress  overcapitalization  and  overfishing  in  several  Gulf  fisheries.  Shrimp  and  red 
snapper  are  overcapitalized.  Red  snapper  is  also  overfished.  In  addition,  the 
charterboat  sector  is  overcapitalized,  targeting  reef  fish  and  mackerel.  Inventories 
are incomplete, but many vessels in these three fisheries have been damaged or lost 
in  the  northern  Gulf.  A  voluntary  buyout  of  vessels  and  permits  in  these  fisheries 
would  help  fishermen  who  choose  to  exit  the  fishery  following  the  storms,  and,  at 
the  same  time,  would  reduce  overcapitalization  and  support  recovery  of  overfished 
reef fish. 

The  storms  damaged  trawling  gear,  and  a  replacement  program  providing  nets 
with the most effective turtle excluder devices (TEDs) and bycatch reduction devices 
(BRDs) will reduce bycatch in the shrimp fishery. 

Docks, fish houses, ice plants, and freezers have been lost and damaged, and fish-
ermen  are  scrambling  to  find  places  to  land  their  fish.  Federal  relief  funds  could 
fill the gap between insured losses and the funds needed to rebuild docks and high 
quality handling facilities that will bring Gulf seafood to customers. 

Over the next months, fishermen could be employed to work with NOAA and the 
Coast  Guard  to  locate  and  remove  hurricane  debris  from  state  and  Federal  waters 
and conduct research on the effects of the storms. Longer term, fishermen can work 
as observers, collecting crucial data to improve fishery management. 

The Council has identified vessel monitoring systems, electronic logbooks, and im-
proved  bycatch  reduction  devices,  as  important  tools  for  responsible,  science  based 
management  of  the  shrimp  and  reef  fish  fisheries  in  the  Gulf  of  Mexico.  Our  man-
agement plans call for vessel owners to purchase these tools, which will be difficult 
for  fishermen  in  financial  crisis.  We  also  have  a  strong  need  for  observer  data  in 
these two fisheries, and have asked NOAA to fund observers. Congressional funding 
of  these  management  tools  would  be  a  tremendous  boost  for  sustainable  fishery 
management in the Gulf of Mexico. 

Thank  you  again  for  considering  the  attached  recommendations,  and,  thank  you 
for  your  leadership  on  these  issues  at  this  moment  of  crisis.  Our  Gulf  Council  and 
NMFS  staffs  can  provide  rough  estimates  of  costs  for  many  of  these  recommenda-
tions,  and  I  encourage  you  to  work  with  them  as  your  committee  explores  way  to 
restore and recover Gulf of Mexico Fishery Infrastructure. 

Sincerely, 

JULIE MORRIS, 
Council Chairman. 

(69) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

70 

RECOMMENDATIONS TO CONGRESS ON GULF OF MEXICO FISHERY RESTORATION 
PROJECTS—ENDORSED BY GULF OF MEXICO FISHERY MANAGEMENT COUNCIL, 
OCT. 6, 2005 
Overall  goals:  Compassionate  relief  response;  restore  fishing  infrastructure;  ad-
dress  overcapacity  and  overfishing  through  voluntary  buyouts  and  gear  improve-
ments; employ fishermen in clean-up and research; provide retraining for fishermen 
leaving the fishery; add improved management tools to the fishery. 
Restoration and Recovery of Fishing Infrastructure 

1.  Fully  fund  a  voluntary  buy-back  program  for  vessels  and  permits  in  federally 
managed  Gulf  fisheries  with  limited  entry.  Vessels  bought-back  would  be  scrapped 
and permits would be permanently retired. The Council’s first priority is for shrimp 
vessels  and  permits,  second  priority  is  for  red  snapper  vessels  and  permits,  and 
third  priority  is  for  charterboat  vessels  and  permits.  (Shrimp  Amendment  13,  cur-
rently  under  Secretarial  review,  will  limit  entry  by  a  moratorium  on  permits,  but 
implementing  rules  will  not  be  effective  until  2006.  Congress  may  need  to  expedite 
the moratorium.) 

2.  Provide  funds  for  replacement  of  hurricane  damaged  gear  (not  including  ves-
sels) with best available gear to reduce bycatch and minimize habitat damage (tur-
tle excluder devices)—TEDs—and bycatch reduction devices—BRDs, etc.). 

3.  Provide  funding  to  dealers/processors  to  cover  the  gap  between  insurance  pay-
outs  and  the  cost  of  rebuilding  damaged  and  destroyed  fish  houses,  freezers,  and 
related infrastructure using best available technology to improve handling and proc-
essing  of  Gulf  seafood.  Ensure  that  fishery  infrastructure  persists  in  strategic  geo-
graphic areas to support the managed Federal fisheries in the northern Gulf. 

4.  Provide  funding  to  NOAA  for  a  two-year  sonar  project  to  map  hangs  and  loca-
tions  of  hurricane  debris.  Also  provide  funding  to  contract  with  fishing  vessels  to 
remove hurricane debris from state and Federal waters. Finally, provide funding to 
remove damaged and destroyed fishing vessels, with special attention to fire and en-
vironmental hazards from vessel fuel leaks. 

5.  Provide  job  retraining  for  fishermen  who  want  to  voluntarily  leave  the  Gulf 

6. Provide funding to the southeast Cooperative Research Program to support re-

search carried out over the next three years by commercial vessels. 

7. Waive cost recovery in red snapper IFQ for three years by providing direct allo-

cation to NMFS for administering the program. 

8. Waive minimum income requirement to renew permits for three years for fish-

ermen whose vessels or fish houses were damaged or destroyed. 
Rebuilding for Sustainable Fisheries Management 

1.  Provide  funds  to  pay  for  VMS  for  all  federally  permitted  commercial  reef  fish 

grouper IFQ. 

2. Provide funds to pay for VMS for all federally permitted shrimp vessels. 
3. Pay for three-year observer programs in the Gulf EEZ commercial shrimp fish-

ery and commercial reef fish fishery. 

4.  Provide  funding  to  train  shrimp  fishery  observers  and  reef  fishery  observers. 
5.  Provide  funding  to  speed  the  implementation  of  the  red  snapper  IFQ  and  the 

6. Provide funds for replacement of all shrimp trawling gear in the fleet with best 
available  gear  to  reduce  bycatch  and  minimize  habitat  damage  (TEDs  and  BRDs, 
etc.). 

Additional  comments:  Many  Gulf  fish  stocks  depend  on  northern  Gulf  coastal 
habitats.  A  comprehensive  program  of  habitat  restoration,  particularly  restoration 
of  vegetated  wetlands  and  barrier  islands,  will  be  important.  In  addition,  seafood 
consumers  need  to  be  reassured  that  the  majority  of  Gulf  seafood  is  unaffected  by 
Hurricanes Katrina and Rita—the seafood reaching markets has been tested and is 
safe for consumption. 

fishery. 

vessels. 

Dear Louisiana Senators, Congressmen and State Officials: 

We  are  writing  to  you  as  a  group  of  tuna/swordfish  fishermen  with  homeports  in 
Dulac,  Leeville,  and  Venice  comprising  a  total  of  about  40  commercial  fishing  ves-
sels, our dock dealers and related businesses. Venice is essentially ‘‘wiped out’’ from 
Katrina  as  far  as  fishing  is  concerned  now.  While  the  damage  in  Leeville  is  exten-

November 7, 2005 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

71 

sive  from  both  Katrina  and  Rita,  Dulac  was  horrendously  flooded  with  4  to  5  feet 
of water from Rita. 

Prior to Hurricane Rita’s arrival, Dulac was officially declared a mandatory evacu-
ation town where the majority of the fishing boats dock. And sure enough, local offi-
cials  were  correct  100  percent.  While  a  mass  evacuation  puts  extensive  responsibil-
ities on elected officials such as providing the means to get the community out both 
safely and timely, the right decision saved many lives, as we all know from Katrina. 

Lives are saved, but many businesses are not. 
The  financial  impact  of  these  two  monsters  on  our  businesses  is  exponential.  We 
know that the budget situation is very tight and that you are doing everything that 
you can to help Louisiana in the face of this. But we are not asking for every dollar 
we have lost. We are writing to you today as boat owners, deckhands, dock dealers, 
trucking  companies,  and  others  desperately  seeking  whatever  immediate  financial 
assistance  you  can  find  to  help  us  rebuild  our  lives.  Through  our  fisheries  associa-
tion,  we  know  you  have  been  working  hard  on  this  and  we  are  very  thankful  for 
your  kind  efforts.  We  just  want  to  make  sure  you  are  aware  of  our  particular  fish-
ery’s situation. 

We,  as  Louisiana  fishermen,  supply  more  domestic  fish  from  tuna/swordfish 
longline fishing boats to seafood wholesalers around the country than any other Gulf 
State.  Our  Louisiana  fleet  comprises  at  least  half  of  the  overall  U.S.  Atlantic  tuna/ 
swordfish  fleet.  Our  captains  and  crews  are  scattered  around  in  evacuation  centers 
throughout the Gulf States, primarily in Houston. Those who have returned cannot 
go  fishing  until  their  families  have  shelter.  Some  await  insurance  surveys  before 
they  can  return  to  work.  Because  their  New  Orleans  homes  were  destroyed  or  ren-
dered  uninhabitable,  they  have  no  opportunity  to  return  to  fishing  without  aban-
doning  their  families.  As  a  major  fish-supplying  region,  Louisiana  cannot  afford  to 
lose these hard working fishermen. 

As Louisiana fish dealers, our fish houses have had nearly no production for over 
three  months.  Insurance  will  not  cover  our  losses  because  our  buildings  remain  in-
tact. But no production is still out of business. 

• We desperately need immediate mobile trailers so our captains, crew and fami-
lies  can  return  home  and  to  work.  If  necessary,  such  trailers  can  be  placed  on 
existing dock dealer properties in Dulac and Houma. 
• We  desperately  need  the  necessary  insurance  surveys  of  our  New  Orleans 
homes completed as quickly as possible. Some captains and crews are forced to 
remain onshore just in case the surveyor arrives. 
• We  desperately  need  at  least  temporary  relief  from  restrictive  fisheries  regula-
tions  such  as  the  restriction  on  using  live  bait,  incidental  swordfish  trip  limits 
and closures to protect what is now a fully recovered swordfish stock. These re-
strictions  are  unnecessary  while  we  strive  to  rebuild  our  lives  and  businesses. 
Just  like  the  shrimpers  and  oyster  boats,  we  also  have  a  lot  to  recover  and  we 
know  that  it  involves  a  lot  of  work  ahead  from  us.  Please  don’t  let  anyone  forget 
about our longline fishery including the Louisiana Seafood Promotion Board. We are 
a  very  important  fishery  and  we  are  also  working  very  hard.  But  we  desperately 
need  your  help  to  provide  us  with  the  means  to  recover.  We  heard  that  the  Com-
merce  Department  declared  our  fishery  as  a  disaster  so  we  could  receive  help  but 
we haven’t heard anything from them since. 

We  are  also  proud  members  of  the  Blue  Water  Fishermen’s  Association  who  con-
tinue to work hard to represent our interests to you. If you need more information, 
please contact the Executive Director, Nelson Beideman at 609–361–9229, P.O. Box 
398  Barnegat  Light,  NJ  08006,  e-mail  nelson@bwfa.org.  If  he  cannot  answer  your 
questions, he can make direct contact with any of us. 

We  thank  you  so . . . so  very  much  for  thinking  of  us  during  this  difficult  time. 

As  seafood  truckers  and  related  service  and  supplier  businesses,  we  need  the 

boats to go back fishing and the fish houses return to activity. 

Respectfully, 
Dock Dealers 

Ken Trinh, Jensen Tuna, Inc., Dulac/Houma, LA 
Vinh Tran, St. Vicent Seafood, Inc., Leeville, LA 
Tuan/Khai Nguyen, Sharko Seafood Int’l, Venice, LA 
Steven Le, Steven’s Seafood, Inc., Dulac, LA 
Steven Loga, Warehouse Food Group, Dulac/Gretna, LA 
Larry Loga, Tuna Fresh, Inc., Venice, LA 
Michael Nguyen, TUNACO, INC., Dulac, LA 
Archie Dantin, Griffin’s Seafood, Leeville, LA 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Boat Owners 

72 

Mien Nguyen, F/V Night Star II, New Orleans, LA 
Peter Tran, F/V Queen Mary, New Orleans, LA 
Tuc V. Nguyen, F/V Red Fin, Gretna, LA 
Tung ‘‘Jim’’ Nguyen, F/V Peaceful Lady-Red, Chalmette, LA 
Han Nuoi, F/V Master Ray, Chalmette, LA 
Duong Nguyen, F/V St. Joseph & Peter, New Orleans, LA 
John Le, F/V Sea Queen III, Houma, LA 
Tom Huynh, F/V Morning Star, New Orleans, LA 
Michael Pham, F/V Thuan Loi, New Orleans, LA 
Cuc Huynh, F/V Kim Thanh II, New Orleans, LA 
Peter Nguyen, F/V Blue Sea I, Kenner, LA 
Suong Tran, F/V Tran Brothers, Gretna, LA 
Phan Nuoi, F/V Kim Nhi, New Orleans, LA 
Loi Nguyen, F/V Capt. Robinson, Cut Off, LA 
Thien Nguyen, F/V Queensland, New Orleans, LA 
Anna Biu, F/V Lillian, New Orleans, LA 
Khanh Huynh, F/V Miss Lena, New Orleans, LA 
Andy Nguyen, F/V Capt. David, Kenner, LA 
Diem Le, F/V Victoria, New Orleans, LA 
Ban Van Nguyen, F/V Cecilia II, New Orleans, LA 
Tu Le, F/V Sea Queen, Houma, LA 
Hoa Nguyen, F/V St. Maria, New Orleans, LA 
Lan Tran Nguyen, F/V Our Lady of Lavang, New Orleans, LA 
Suong Quang, F/V St. Peter, Gretna, LA 
Hung Viet Tran, F/V DeQueen, New Orleans, LA 
Phuc Truong, F/V Kim Thanh-PN, New Orleans, LA 
Luu Nguyen, F/V Capt. Luu, Dulac, LA 
Dong Tran, F/V Kenny Boy, New Orleans, LA 
Kinh Tran, F/V Capt. Michael, Dulac, LA 
Thien Nguyen, F/V St. Joseph, New Orleans, LA 
Tony Nguyen, F/V St. Benedict, Houma, LA 
Hanh Tran, F/V Alexander, New Orleans, LA 
Ba Truong, F/V Capt. Mike, Houma, LA 
Kinh Tran, F/V Capt. Johnny, New Orleans, LA 
Phuong Nguyen, F/V Lien Hiep, Woodlawn, LA 
Trinh Nguyen, F/V Star Sea, Woodlawn, LA 
Minh Dinh Nguyen, F/V Captain Paul, New Orleans, LA 

Trucking Companies 

Terry Gold, Panda Trucking Express, Houma, LA 
JJ Conway, Seacap Trucking, Inc., Jessup, MD 
Meade/Harry Amory Trucking Hampton, VA 

Diesel Fuel Suppliers 

Al Waguespack, Waguespack Oil Co., Thibodaux, LA 
Jean Lamont, Tri-State Oil Co., Belle Chasse, LA 

Diesel Fuel Services 

Tien Le, LL & T Ice & Fuel, Dulac, LA 
Electronics Supplier/Services 
Ron, EMT Electronics, Inc., Houma, LA 

Mechanics 

Richie/Joe, S & H Diesel, Inc., Houma, LA 
Robert Lirette, Lirette’s Diesel Service, Chauvin, LA 
Gary, Diesel Tech, Inc., Houma, LA 

Diving Service 

Timmy Price, Diving Service, Chauvin, LA 
Scott Diaz, Scott’s Diving Service, Dulac, LA 

Drydock and Shipyard 

Donald Bourg, Bourg Marine Services, Dulac, LA 
Steven, Bayou Grand Marine, Dulac, LA 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

73 

Hardware Supplier 

Sandy/Chris, Bayou Hardware, Inc., Dulac, LA 

Generator and Parts Supplier 

Dave Landry, M & L Engines, Inc., Houma, LA 

Fishing and Tackle Supplier 

Eva, Alario Brothers Marine Supply, Inc., Westwego, LA 

Foam Insulation 

Charlie LeCompte, LeCompte Insulation, Inc., Houma, LA 

(Also  there  are  numerous  Deckhands,  out  of  state  Tuna  vessels  who  use  Lou-
isiana  ports,  and  many  additional  tuna  boat  service/supply  companies  in  Lou-
isiana and out of state, whose names can be provided upon request.) 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  07:01 Dec 16, 2010 Jkt 063021 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\63021.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

